BOOK I.
CHAPTER I.
WE have seen that a sort of constitution had been
formed; or rather government constituted; for the
Captain
had been chosen Governor, and the blind lawyer
appointed chief justice. A sense of self-preservation
had led to this. For it had been found, that in a
situation
of things approaching to a state of nature, the weak
were a prey to the strong, and oftentimes, among the
strong, there was much wrong done, not being
sufficiently
afraid of each other, when the corporal powers
were nearly equal; and, until it had been ascertained
which had the mastery, much maiming had prevailed.
It had been customary for individuals to league together,
to defend themselves; and there was much gouging and
biting on both sides, when a contest of the few had
arisen
.
Settlement against settlement was pitted; and
district against district, oftentimes with much battery,
and blood-shed. Calling out for help was usual
amongst
the combatants, and it was accounted
dishonourable
not to interfere, by those not engaged.
An honest man walking home one evening, and,
whether
from intemperance or sleep, nodding as he walked,
which being mistaken by a ram for a menace, he was
butted, as the phrase is, and overthrown, calling out,
is there none of the down county boys here? This
may serve to give an image of the state of society at
this period. It will serve still more to illustrate this,
when I relate the following anecdote. A lawyer, or
at least one who called himself such, of small stature,
and delicate structure of body, being applied to by a
client, who having no money, but being of a strong body,
offered to do all his fighting for him; that is, for the
pettifogger. That will not do, said the wary advocate;
for you may not be at hand always to protect me, from
an insult, much less from assault; but if you will
permit
me on some occasion to overpower and beat
yourself
that is, to seem to do it, as your prowess is
incontestible
,
it will secure me ever after; for no one will molest
me. It was agreed; and a sham battle being fought,
the advocate, as was agreed upon, got the better. But
the whole coming out in due time, when the laws
began
to be established, the bruiser, as he had been called,
prosecuted the advocate; who pleaded an assault
demesne
,
and relying an the maxim, volenti non fit injuria,
he was acquitted; and on the civil action, no damages
were found against him.
It was on this principle, and, in this state of things,
that the Captain had been elected Governor. For,
coming
to the settlement attended by his posse, Will Watlin,
Tom the Tinker, Harum Scarum, and O`Fin the
Irishman
,
a damp was struck upon the hearts of the
insurgents
in different places, which the people seeing,
recurred
to this new power for safety. Will Watlin
having
pulled up a grub, and entering the town, called it a
switch, as I have seen represented on the stage in some
dramatic composition; the people thinking that if that
was a switch, what would his baton, or cudgel be? O`Fin
the Irishman had, in fact, entered with a log on his
shoulder
,
which he called his shilelah, and threatened death
and destruction to all that came his way. Harum
Scarum
had a branch of an oak tree, which he trailed after
him; and Tom the Tinker approached with a club,
which he called his hammer. It was much larger than
the club of Herculus is painted, and though he had not
the strength to wield it with equal ease, yet, poised upon
his right shoulder, it had the appearance of a weapon
that would do much execution. Teague, the bog-trotter,
though with great difficulty, drew after him a piece of a
pine log, which he said he had been tired wielding, and
knocking down people with. The Captain had a staff,
not as large as a weaver's beam, but far surpassing the
size of a common walking stick. From these
appearances
,
there had been no resistance made; and in due
time the country thought it advisable to put themselves
under the protection of persons whose object it seemed
to be to keep the peace, and maintain the laws. The
Captain had been chosen Governor. But in writing
the chapter of the last book of this work, I had run over
a great space without entering into the detail, or
minuti
of events. For that, and no other reason, it may
appear
to want verisimilitude of incidents to support the
probability of the narrative.
Premiere de Rois etoit un soldat hereux,
Says Voltaire: and though it may be disputed whether
knowledge is power, yet no one can deny, but that
wattles
and hearts of oak have a great tendency to procure
submission.
But the Captain himself was uneasy under this
usurped
authority; and the people began to talk of his
resembling
Bonaparte. There were those who threw out
hints that he had an understanding with that emperor.
It was much agitated in beer-houses, whether he was
not under
French influence.
He denied it, and stood to
it, that he had no correspondence with the tyrant.
Is it possible, said he, that I could have much
attachment
to Bonaparte, who has no attachment to
me? For I am well persuaded that he has never heard
of me; nor can he possibly regard what government, or
kind of government, I have over a few ragamuffins
assembled
,
or rather scattered, in a distant quarter of the
globe. It is true, I did happen, coming along, to speak
a few words of French, at least they told me it was
French, which I had got from a parlez-vous, a carrier,
that spoke a certain lingo to his horses; because being
used to his vocabulary, they understood no other
language
;
but it was in the most perfect simplicity of
mind; and I am not sure that it was French that I did
speak; or rather that he spoke; for what I said was in
imitation of certain sounds, rather than words of his, as I
could catch them from the rapidity of his pronunciation.
But why need there be a noise made about it. I am
ready
to lay down my oak stick, which has been the badge
of my government, whenever any one of you chuses.
Let it be laid down, and with that he flung it across a
potatoe patch, as far as he could throw it. Now, there
it is, said he, and you are a free people. But what are
you the better for that? Was it not to keep you from
having broken heads that I took up the government.
You talk of Bonaparte usurping the government. What
government did he usurp? Had not the people of France
found out that there was no government, and could be
none short of a despotism? The constitution of 1791,
had given way. That of 1793, had gone to the tomb of
the Capulets. Was there not one of 1795? If so, It had
also gone. The only two of the directory that had any
talents, or integrity, Barthelemi, and Carnot, were
deported
to Cayenne. The better part of the council of
500, and of the council of ancients, I mean the best men
of these bodies, were carted in iron cages to the sea shore,
and sent off in frigates. Could there be said to be any
freedom at this time? What was it that induced Abbe
Sieyes, and other wise men who had been tired of
making
constitutions, to send for Bonaparte to Egypt to take
the helm of the state vessel? For, pursuing the figure,
when the vessel is at the mercy of the waves, tost and
ready to run upon the breakers, is it usurpation to take
the helm, and steer her in safety? Comparing small
things with great, myself to Bonaparte, did I usurp any
authority, when you yourselves called upon me, being
at loggerheads, to take the government. But as I have
more concern for you, than you have for yourselves, I
will retain it a little, with a view to preserve order and
regularity among you until you get a constitution, if by
that means you can secure your liberty.
This speech being ended, it was agreed to consider of
a constitution.
It was debated in the beer-houses, whether a
despotism
was not best; or the continuance of the present
constitution. But it was carried nemine contradicente,
that something new should be adopted. It was agitated
how a republican government should begin. Doubtless,
it was answered, by a convention of the people. It was
asked, how should that convention be brought about? It
was answered, in the same mode and by the same means,
as what is called a camp-meeting: This is a gathering
of fanatics, of which we have seen examples, in almost
all parts of the United States. But would there not be
danger of the same tumblings, and jumpings, and
contortions
of body, and agitations of mind, as at those
congregations
No; because the female part of the society
would be excluded. These are not only convulsionists,
but the cause of convulsions becoming general among
the multitude, by sympathy of feeling, and extasy of
vision
.
Keep these away, and the meeting might be kept
sober, unless indeed spirituous liquor was introduced.
And when serious business was on the carpet, this might
be excluded, allowing a few days of intemperance, in the
manner of the ancient Germans, before the council had
begun. It was agreed that a general warning should be
given to meet under bushes, and tree-tops by such a day,
not in conclave, or divan, but in a general convention of
the people, to deliberate on the frame of a constitution.
But were they all to convene, every male, of whatever
age, embracing infantia, which ends at the age of
seven years; Pueritia, which terminates at 14;
Adolescentia
,
which lasts until that of twenty-one years; or
juventus
which may be considered as ending at the age of
thirty-five; or the virilis tas, which is complete at
twenty-eight, and lasts the whole life of man. Senium,
or old age, commences at fifty-seven. Was this age
to be excluded by reason of imbecility from the
deliberations
of perfect men?
Another question arose; was every man that wore a
head, tag, rag, and bob-tail, to assemble, and have a vote?
In contemplation of law, at the formation of our
republic
,
it must be so. And though, in fact, it never was the
case, yet the principle stands immovable, and all must
be supposed to have a voice. We the people, admits
of no exclusion. But are people to be admitted that have
no understanding? Who can undertake to say of another
that he wants sense? Intelligence cannot be weighed by
the pound or ounce, or measured by the ell or the perch
Who is to make the selection from the mass? It was
agreed, therefore, that all who chose to meet, should
convene
.
Advertisements to this effect were put in the
gazette, having a journal or public paper in town; and
cards and handbills were affixed upon trees, and barn
doors, and chalked upon fence rails, and those who could
not write proclaimed with the voice, the general
assembling
of the people.
The day came, and the hills were covered.
Those upon the low grounds shouted up to their
superiors
on the hills; and the hills vociferated to those
below
But great confusion ensued, by interruption and
discussion. Some order became necessary, and the
reducing
the multitude to a smaller compass; but this
could not be done, until a part wearied out, and wanting
food, departed to their homes. There were but about a
score of persons remaining when the next day
appeared
.
Having taken some refreshment of food, these set
about the business. But half asleep, they were
incompetent
,
and had to take a nap before they could renew the
task which they had undertaken. It was now debated,
whether these present could be considered as representing
those that were absent. This was plain; for all had had
an opportunity, and might have attended if they would.
The question was now agitated, should they have a
constitution
?
Upon this there was a diversity of voices.
Said an honest fellow, what have we to do with a
constitution
?
Why form one? Will we stick to a constitution
when we have made it? A constitution is like a nose of
wax; it is twisted by the party that is predominant. It
might not however be unadvisable to have some outline
of a constitution; some groove within which to move,
some shape and form of the machine of government. If
the people cannot all convene; or if they do convene,
cannot act without confusion, as the late experiment had
abundantly evinced, it would be necessary to have some
means of reducing them to a narrower compass. Let
there be primary assemblies, meetings of the people in
particular districts, and let these elect and send
representatives
to a secondary assembly. Let these secondary
assemblies select from amongst themselves, and depute
to an ultimate body, who shall from time to time meet
and frame the laws. Judicial officers must exist distinct
from the legislature; executive distinct from both.
Who shall appoint these officers, and in what manner it
shall be done, must require some designation, or rule laid
down. The nature of the government itself must be
determined
on; at least some name must be given it,
whether
it shall be called a republican government, or an
aristocracy, or monarchy.
Vol. IV. B
CHAPTER II.
THERE is in the moral world, what may be called
an influenza, as well as in the natural. I leave it to
physicians to treat particularly of the influenza in the
natural
world; though disquisitions as to the origin, and
history of an epidemic is more within the province of
the natural philosopher than of the physician; this last
having to do, more with the treatment, and cure of
diseases
,
than with the history; though it must greatly
conduce to a knowledge of the remedy of a disorder, to
know its origin, and cause, and progress. Hence it is,
that no man, whose mind, from nature, or from education,
or both, has not been led to investigate causes, and
effects
,
in the natural world, can be a great physician. In
laying this down, I reason in my own mind from
analogy
.
For though my knowledge of this subject is not
extensive, I mean of the subordinate necessity of
general
information to particular science, in the case of a
physician; yet I can have some conception of it, from
what I do know, and can more confidently assert in the
case of a jurisconsult, and politician. By politician I do
not mean a diplomatist, having a knowledge of affairs
of state, or that has been employed in correspondence
and communications with foreign ministers; or in the
relations and conventions of states with each other.
It is a higher science, that I have in view, the
arrangement
of a form of government for a people; the making
salutary laws. Here it is that I find myself on a
commanding
eminence; when in imagination, I can reach it,
surrounded with the great of the world. To them is
owing all that distinguishes man from man; whether
they have moulded systems that are the offspring of
accident
in their beginnings, or, that, on original ground
they have built fabricks; I will acknowledge that almost
all systems of liberty, have begun like almost all other
things, that are great, from nothing; and have been
gradually
moulded to permanence, and durability. And
while the unceasing activity of the passions have led to
such changes, as have established, or preserved liberty,
the same cause has invariably led to the dissolution of
free governments. It therefore becomes a matter of the
nicest observation, and most comprehensive judgment,
to know where to rest. Nevertheless in the most
settled
state of things, and most happy establishment, if
some one like Ehud, blows a trumpet for a change, he
will have followers. It may be impossible to trace the
very point in the community at which a wild idea took
its rise, or what passion in the individual gave it birth,
but its progress, like the influenza, may be traced; and
its gradual march from north to south, or from east to
west, and its deleterious effects. It is immaterial whether
it is the common law that is to be abolished, or the right
of suffrage extended to beasts. No matter what the
innovation
,
it will have partizans. What we have
depicted
therefore ought not to be set down as incredible. I
would not wonder if it should come to be seriously
agitated
some years hence, unless this burlesque prevents
it. For you might as well express surprise at a man
under an influenza having a fever, as at the multitude
under a political impression, being thrown into delirium,
and phrenzy. In a case of such madness, direct
reasoning
will be of no avail; but the turning the course of the
thought aside by the substitution of some other; not
perhaps
questioning the practicability, much less the
expediency
of the proposition, in vogue, but suggesting a
more eligible mode of execution. If divisions can be
sown amongst the innovators as to the ways and means,
they may be diverted from the principal object. Thus
in the case of bestial suffrage, admit that quadrupeds
have a right to human society, yet the question may be
made, whether a gradual, or an immediate emancipation
may be advisable. After this, another ground of
discrepancy
may be laid, suggesting with what species of the
brutal kingdom it may be proper to commence the
reform
.
Some who speak first, will say an elephant, and
then a Rhinoceros; when all voices are heard, there
may be found as many opinions as there are voices.
Quot hominum, tot capitum. By good management it
may be brought to a wrangle whether votes shall not be
in proportion to bulk, strength, or swiftness. To oppose
the giving a vote at all will be unwise, but the giving it
in a different way and manner from that proposed, or if
some strong and monstrous inconvenience can be
pointed
out, immediately about to fall upon themselves, such
as was hit upon, on this occasion, of their changing
places, and turning beasts, and being yoked to carts;
knocked on the head; or taken in traps, it may succeed.
For this is not barely touching the pocket, but affecting
the person. It is affecting it sensibly; for the tugging at a
trace up a hill presents an idea that is intelligible, and
immediately
repulsive. Much more the being shot at with a
rifle, and the hide taken off as you would a bear-skin. No
man will run a risk of a change of affairs, if a bare
possibility
of such a reverse as this, can be brought into
view.
I am well aware that there are readers; that is, there
will be readers, if they do read, and come to the sense of
these last sentences, who will say, what is this, but
nonsense
?
But to such I beg leave to put this question, and
let them answer me after much thought and due
deliberation
,
whether it is not what every one cannot do;
to
talk nonsense eloquently.
I know of no author in
which this is more exemplified, than a book much
praised
,
but in which I have never been able to discover a
single ray of sense; and that is Bolinbroke's
idea
of a
patriot king. And as a parallel to this, I give another
as it appeared to me at the time I cast my eye upon it,
which was in early life; and which book is always
spoken
of as a model of stile; viz. Shaftsbury's
Characteristics
But the truth is, I could not ascertain the point
of his observations. I take the chapter that I have just
written to be somewhat of the same cast. But as
Learned Commentators view
In Homer more than Homer knew,
the critics may draw something out of it. But if they
should not be able to extract a sentiment, let them
confine
their observation, to the stile, which, at our entrance
on the task of writing this book, we declared to be our
primary object. I will acknowledge at the same time,
entre nous, that stile is what I never could exactly hit,
to my own satisfaction. And in the English language,
that of Hume, Swift, and Fielding, is the only stile that
I have coveted to possess. For I take it they are
precisely
the same, according to the subjects of their
writing
But the easy, the natural, and the graceful, is of
all stiles, whether of manners or of speaking, the most
difficult to attain.
CHAPTER III.
IT being understood that a constitution by ten, or
even twenty men, would be a thing of bad fame, the
decemviri
among the Romans having got a bad name, it
was agreed that the small remnant there convened should
proceed no farther than to call a convention of delegates,
the time, places, and manner of chusing, which, was
pointed out.
Tant molis erat romanam condere gentem.
It was necessary that information of this should be
communicated. But as a journal, or gazette might not
reach all; or if it did reach them, they might not be able
to read; runners were dispatched, Tom, Dick, and
Harry
,
to carry the intelligence. The Captain's posse
comitatis
Harum Scarum, O'Fin the Irishman, &c. having
hand-bills struck off, were ordered on their travels
though bush, brake, and wood-land, to circulate
advertisements
.
Due notice having been now given, and on the day,
a chosen few having been selected from the primary
meetings, which by the bye, were not always very
numerous
;
for in some places, the father chose the son,
and in other places, the son the father; these, I say, being
met, proceeded to debate on the principles of the great
magna charta of a constitution. And as at Runnymede,
it was literally under an oak, or rather a grove of oaks,
that they were convened, a matter of debate was
whether
every thing that wore a head should have a vote in
chusing legislators. It was restrained to the male kind;
of course females were excluded. But should boys
come in? That was the question. Not unless full
grown boys. But at what age does the body come to
its growth? Not until the age of 28, says Doctor
Jameson
,
a physician of Cheltenham, in his treatise on the
body, does it come to its full growth. It spreads until
that time. But impatience to have the rights of men
prevailed with some delegates, and they were of opinion
to dock off seven years, and to fix the age of virility at
21; for that was the age of the common law, in most of
the other states.
B 2
But should the suffrage be universal, or with a
qualification
of property? not real property; that was out of
the question: for every check ought to be put upon the
engrossing the soil, as the population of the country
depended
upon restricting to a small share. Camillus had
but four acres, said the Latin schoolmaster, and well
cultivated, that might suffice any one. At all events it
was not good policy to hold out any encouragement to
engross land.
But it was agreed that every man should have a vote
in proportion to his stock. For this was originally the
meaning of the word chattels. We shall hear more of
this anon; for it led to an opinion in the sequel, that
beasts themselves should vote.
Cujum pecus? an millibi?
Said the Latin scoolmaster.
But except as to the qualifications of electors, it
was determined there should be no constitution; but
that, bound by no girdle when the representatives
convened
,
they should legislate at free scope without restraint,
from preconceived rules, and set forms shackling the
understanding
;
but that it should be a pure democracy; a
real republic. All hands aloft was now the word, to man
the state ship.
O' navis qua tibi creditam
Said the Latin schoolmaster.
The Captain was re-elected Governor;
The blind Lawyer appointed Chief Justice;
O'Fin the Irishman Sheriff;
Teague O'Regan Secretary of State; and
Tom the Tinker Cryer of the Courts.
All things were going on smoothly, and there bade fair
to be much harmony in the commonwealth.
CHAPTER IV.
THE principle of universal suffrage was much
agitated
at this time: whether every poll, as the word
imports
should poll, or have a vote; or that
property
should
also vote. If property alone, the question would arise,
whether
soil
only; or also goods and chattles. If soil
only, to what quantity or quality, shall the suffrage be
attached? An hundred acres of soil of a bad quality, may
not have the intrinsic worth of one of good. How should
an inspector, or judge of an election, determine on the
quality, unless the owner brings a sample with him,
as the man who had his house to sell, brought a
brick. This would be an inconvenience; and would
render it impracticable to escape frauds. For a man
might dig a sample from his neighbours, and pass it for
his own. And as to quantity, the occupier of the
greater
quantity, is the most worthless citizen; at least the
one who occupies more than he cultivates; because he
neither eats the hay, nor lets another eat it. It is
preposterous
that
soil
should vote; a dumb field, a dead
tree with a crows nest upon it; an hazle bush; a
morass
,
or a barren mountain; or even a hill with a tuft of
oaks upon it. These are all inanimate substances; how
can they vote? For goods and chattles something might
be said; a
live beast
particularly; as the animal could
speak, not with a viva voce vote, like a man; more
humano
,
like a human creature. But with some guttural
sound from the throat, or fauces, which might be called
its own; and not like the tree with a turkey buzzard on
it; and which is not its own voice. I mean that of the
tree, said the speaker, who was running on in this
manner
;
and yet it is advocated, that stocks and stones that
go with the soil shall have a vote. There might be some
reason in improvements voting; a brick house or a dutch
barn; but none at all in the
mere brutum tellus
of an
estate.
This led the way to an hypothesis, that property in
moveables should alone entitle; and this, after some
debate
,
began to be narrowed down to property in
living
animals;
especially to useful quadrupeds, and those of
full growth, and who had come to years, I will not say of
discretion, but of maturity. From the light thrown upon
the subject, the right of suffrage to grown cattle had
become
so popular, that there was no resisting it; not that
viva voce it was proposed or thought of that,
inarticulating
speaking creatures should speak out, or name their
representatives, nor even that they should give in a
ballot
,
but that they should be brought upon the ground to
shew their faces, that there might be no imposition, the
voters alleging that they had cattle when they had not.
But it was not to every owner's beast that it was
advisable
to extend the right; but only to the more valuable
animals; or such as were of a good breed; Virginia
horses
that are fit for the saddle or the turf.
It may seem very strange; but actually the thing
took; and at a polling some time after, it began to be
carried into effect that beasts should be constituents, and
have their representatives. It was not the principle, but
to the individual beast that some exceptions took place;
as for instance, an English bull was brought upon the
hustings to give his vote. We will have no English bull
said the inspectors. Not that a brute beast is not
entitled
to a vote; nor that a bull cannot vote, or be voted for;
but this is an
English bull.
No English bull can vote.
You might as well bring an Englishman himself, to the
polls. It is in right of the bull-keeper, or rather
bull-owner
,
that the bull claims the suffrage. If an
Englishman
himself, not naturalized, is excluded, how can his
bull or his horse, or any other quadruped be admitted?
It would be sufficient to set aside the election if his
ticket
was introduced. A bull indeed! The name of John
Bull is appropriate to an Englishman. An Irish bull is
quite another matter; John Bull shall have no vote
here.
In the mean time, a man on an iron-grey horse rode up
to the window, which was open for receiving tickets, and
unequivocally insisted on a vote for his horse. Vouchers
stood by, who averred that he was foaled in the county,
that, horse and colt, they had known him many years;
that as to his paying taxes, they could not so well say,
unless his labour on the farm could be considered as
paying
tax.
In the mean time, the horse putting his nose in at the
window, taking it for a rack, an inspector gave him a
fillup
on the snout, which resenting; the owner wheeling
round, the horse wheeling under him, he rode over one
or more of the bystanders who were in the way.
Certain
it is, the horse was a meritorious horse, having seen
service in the campaign under General Wayne against
the Indians in 1793. Nevertheless, they that had been
rode over did not brook the affront, or put up with it
unrevenged
;
for calling out horse, horse, to which some
added the word stolen, as fame increases as it goes, it
was echoed along the lines
stolen horse;
upon which the
man was apprehended, and carried before a magistrate,
who not having heard of the right of beasts to vote,
thought this story improbable as he related what had
passed at the window of the election house, and for want
of proper bail he was committed. It may be material
to mention that the horse's mane and tail were black to
distinguish him from a grey horse that belonged to
another
person. I have known several that knew the horse;
but who were not present on the occasion to which we
refer, and so, will not undertake to vouch for the
truth of it, not having charged their memory with it, or
taken a note of it at the moment it occurred. Or it may
be, they do not chuse to recollect it, or give information
on the subject, thinking it prudent not to involve
themselves
on elective disputes, as there is no knowing, when
parties run high, how far the bare vouching for a fact
may involve one. Such is the result of strong
passions
when not under the controul of reason and
reflection
Weak persons are always the most positive,
because
they cannot afford the acknowledgment of an
error
It will not do to admit fallibility; for there is no
knowing how far the inference may be drawn.
Another man came up who brought a sheep to the
polls; a merino ram, who, he said, was entitled to a vote,
having resided in the country, since he had been brought
in by Humphreys, representing him to be of the breed
of the great Fezzen ram, though there were those who
thought it might be what is called a yankey trick; not
but, that all Americans may be capable of substituting
a thing for what it is not; and all are called Yankees
by the British; but New-England men are
distinguished
;
and called Yankee Doodles.
The ram is not entitled to a vote said the inspector,
nor ought he to be permitted to put in a ticket, were
he of the breed of the golden fleece guarded by the
fiery dragons whom Jason overcame; and brought
away the wool; no; not if he was the very ram that
was caught in the thicket; or that Daniel saw in his
vision coupled with the he goat. But he is a Spanish
ram born under despotism, how can he be
expected
to give a republican vote; of papist origin, he
may bring the inquisition with him; coming here
to vote. Besides, this is a very real sheep, that is
offered; and not one whom we call a sheep in a
figurative
sense of the word. Where we call men horses,
or asses, we do not mean always that they are so, puris
naturalibus, without overalls on, with the horn and
the hoof about them, but shadowing forth the same thing
under a veil of metaphor, as the case may be. But
not on this ground altogether do I reject him; and
because he has wool on his back; but, because he is
of barbary origin. The Moors brought the breed into
Spain. You may cast a
sheep's eye
at the window as
long as you please, master ram; but not a vote shall you
have as long as I am here. I do not know whether you
are not a half breed, and no genuine merino. So away
with him, as the song says,
To the ewe-boughts, Marian.
Another person coming up, brought a large ox, which
he called Thomas Jefferson; not out of respect to the
ox, but to the man, as having a good name and
reputation
.
Make way, said the voters, for Thomas Jefferson.
We will have no Thomas Jeffersons, said the inspector;
he is out of his district. I assert the contrary, said the
owner; he was calved in this settlement. He is called
the mammoth ox, and I had thought of driving him to
Washington; but that I knew, however he might be
made a present to Jefferson, the congress would eat
him, as they did the mammoth cheese; so that the
president
would scarcely get a slice of him. For there are
parasites in all countries; and the worthless are chiefly
those who dance attendance upon men in office; and how
can it be avoided to invite them to partake of civilities?
You will certainly allow a vote to Thomas Jefferson
No; not if he was the real Jefferson from Monticello,
said the inspector. How can I tell but he may introduce
the same politics? That is true, said another; break
judges, abolish taxes, dismantle navies, build gunboats,
lay embargoes, depress armies, pay tributes to barbary
powers, issue proclamations, wear red breeches, receive
ambassadors in pantaloons and slippers, collect prairie
dogs, and horned frogs, dream of salt mountains, walk
with Pedimetres, and be
under French influence.
We
will have no Thomas Jefferson. You may drive off your
ox. He shall have no vote here.
No doubt the judges and inspectors, being men of
sense, saw the absurdity of carrying the principle so far
into practice, as to admit the representation of property,
by this property being itself, and in its own individual
existence
,
the constituent. But not thinking it safe, or
practicable, to resist this temporary phrenzy, and
misconception
of things, by a direct resistance, it became
necessary, by indirect means to avoid it. To lay it down
in the face of the multitude that these new voters had not
a right, would not have been endured; but parrying it
by questioning the right in a particular case, gave no
umbrage. It was saving the principle, though it denied
the exercise. The man that had rode down the
bystanders
,
and was taken up for a horse thief, was
pardoned
by the governor. This was done to get quit of
the investigation; the governor thinking it for the
credit
of the country that there should be nothing said about
the occasion, and manner of the felony; or the mistake
under which the imputation had arisen.
But, party spirit at this time had begun to run high;
some insisting on the right of suffrage to their cattle;
and others considering it a burlesque. You might have
seen shilelahs in the air, and several bullocks were
knocked down that were brought up to the polls. A lad
was tumbled from his palfry as he was riding him to
water, under an idea that he was bringing him to aid the
adverse ticket. The lad was somewhat hurt by the fall,
and the steed ran off, and could not be caught again
until
salt was shewn him, and oats in a hat, some one crying
cope, cope. The ram that had been offered, seeing
arrive
the sheep, cried ba; and it was insisted that he had
given his vote, which the candidate against whom it was
taken down, resented; and hit the tup a stroke, that, in
the sailor's phrase, brought him on his beam ends.
The blow, however, which was aimed at a pig in a poke,
which a man was carrying home, and which was heard
to squeal; struck the man himself: What, said the
assailant
,
are you bringing here the swinish multitude to
vote?
Nevertheless, it was not so much the admitting
quadrupeds
,
but unqualified cattle that became the subject
of the controversy; intelligent persons arguing that it
was a thing shameful in itself, and unjust. Because it
was a fraud upon the whole community, that stragglers
should be brought forward, which the individual
concerned
in the fraud reconciled to himself on the
score of serving the party: That it required some
refinement
to be aware of the indelicacy of urging an
improper
vote. Was it reasonable to suppose that a horse
creature could give an independent vote, that was in the
power of his owner to be stinted of his oats, and rode faster
or slower as he thought proper, on a journey? Was it
reasonable to expect that the ox would think differently
on political subjects from his master? Should he venture
to dissent, a crack of the whip or the spur, would bring
him to his senses. Even a rational creature, that may
be supposed to have more fortitude, is usually in
subjection
to the master, in matter of opinion, where he is a
slave. It is for this reason that slaves are excluded.
Whatever might plausibly be said as to the expediency of
extending the privilege of citizenship to those animals
that are fer natur, and are at their own hands in a
forest, it is quite another matter as far as it respects
domesticated
animals, that have no will of their own, but
are under dominion, whether subjugated to a plough or
a team. The wild animals that roam, have some spirit
of independence. They would starve before they would
tamely submit themselves to arbitrary rule, and
government
.
Hence it is, that traps are used. It requires
shooting to bring some of them to terms. But an ox
may be goaded into acquiescence. He does not drink
whiskey, it is true; and for that reason, it cannot
be said that whiskey will purchase him; but is there
nothing to be done with good grass? The inticements are
various that might be held out to allure from the
independence
of his own judgment.
As to horses voting on the occasion we are speaking
of, so far as matter of fact is concerned, I admit it has
been denied. For, that though a great number of horses
were seen to be ridden up; yet it is usual to go on
horseback
to elections, especially when the voters have to
come from some distance; so that the mere circumstance
of being on the ground, is no conclusive evidence of
having
given a vote; and this I am the more careful to note,
as in the case of a new government, that like an
individual
,
has a character, in some measure, to establish, it is of
moment, that what is groundlessly alleged, be explained.
At the same time, I am aware of the impolicy of
denying
a thing in toto where there is any foundation;
were there no other reason that would induce an
historian
to adhere to the truth. For even where a man is
pressing a matter that is difficult to be believed, and he
has nothing in truth to concede, he will yield a little,
skilfully
,
in order to give the impression of candour, and
secure belief to the more important points. How much
more does it behoove a writer to be careful of insisting
on the freedom from all blame on the part of those
whom he advocates, lest that he bring in question the
veracity
of his relation, where he has every thing on his side.
I do not therefore say positively, that the inspectors and
judges of the election, in some districts, were not
deceived
,
and their vigilance baffled; or that they did not
connive. For that would be saying too much,
considering
the nature of affairs. The most vigilant cannot
always
watch; and the most severe in their notions of the
rights of persons, may indulge. But, granting that some
horse creatures did vote, with their riders on their backs,
does it follow that the inspectors had notice of it; or
that the persons who usually stand by and vouch for the
right of suffrage to the individual, were not to blame.
They may have announced their names as rational
persons
;
and under that idea, may have got their votes
taken. I have been the more careful in throwing out
these hints, because if it were once admitted that such
votes did pass, unless surreptitiously, and sub silentio,
it might grow into precedent. And we well know, that
in matters of political and legal law, precedent has the
force of authority. It may be suggested as not fairly
presumable that inspectors and judges could be deceived.
I have seen too much of elections not to think that
practice
to be unfair, where an individual, powerful for wealth
or family, is a candidate, or where there is a contest of
party somewhat violent; and unprincipled and daring
individuals
,
will take their stations, and act as common
vouchers
on an election day, as to the name, age, freedom, or
estate of the person who offers a vote. He will be
supported
by pugilists, or persons prepared with clubs, who
though they do not actually strike, will menace with this
appearance of force, and intimidate those who might
dispute
the vouching that is given. I consider all this
as immoral and unbecoming a good citizen. But I
Vol. IV. C
have seen even inspectors and judges intimidated by
this shew of hostility; and I would not wonder if I were
to hear that under this awe, in some places, improper
votes were taken. Not that I would excuse this
timidity
of officers, as lessening it from a misdemeanor, to a
mere neglect of duty. I reprehend both the overawing
and the being overawed in the discharge of a public
trust.
But in justice to the character of the country, I incline
to think after all that has been reported to the contrary,
that instances of beasts voting were more rare than is
imagined; and that a considerable foundation of what has
gone abroad on this head, was the epithets bestowed by
the contending parties calling one another beasts; such
as horses, asses, sheep, buffaloes, oxen, and the names
of other cattle. All this metaphorically, just as persons of
a less polished education, where they dispute on literary
or theological subjects, call each other geese, sucking
pigs, or turkey-buzzards. I have heard even well bred
persons speak of their antagonists after a warm debate,
as wood-peckers and mire-snipes. In political
controversies
,
it is no uncommon thing to bestow the epithets
of jack-ass. I have heard even an accomplished lady,
use the term monkey, speaking of an individual of the
other sex. It would be endless to enumerate such
instances
of the application of terms, that do not in
themselves
import the natural form or metamorphose of any
person.
CHAPTER V.
THE day of the election being over, people applied
quietly to their usual employments, those of them that
were in a capacity to discharge the duties of their
functions
.
Some of them were not capable. And amongst
these the visionary philosopher was not in a condition to
present himself at the levee of the Governor; but was in
the hands of the surgeon, having received a blow with a
bludgeon, as he was leading up a merino ram, and
insisting
for a vote.
The Governor himself had been indisposed the whole
day of the election, but being now recovered, and the
legislature
about to meet shortly, it behooved him to think
of an address to the representative body. This he was
at a loss, whether in the mode of the kings of England,
personally, reading the speech himself or having it read
for him, in his presence, or whether to adopt that
introduced
in these states, since the revolution; or rather in
this, a later period of the republican history, by sending
a message, that is, a written document to be
communicated
by the Secretary.
The message has the advantage in this, that it is a
departure from the English precedent, which of itself
carries reason. But there is more in it when we
consider
that it is more convenient. Because when a man
makes a speech orally, it is not all of it that can be heard
in the crowd that usually assembles on the occasion of
an inauguration. And when it is heard, it is not all of
it that can be recollected. Many things escape the
memory
.
Whereas when it is by way of written
document
it can be heard to his satisfaction; not that it would
be decent to encore it on the floor of the house; but
members can recur to it from time to time, and read it
themselves. In that case, they are not kept so long
standing on their feet, as when it is heard slowly, and
with much ceremony of bringing it forward in the first
instance. For the waiting the arrival of the Governor
that is to deliver the speech; and the arrangements that
must be made for the places of the other officers of
government
,
and the body of the representatives, is tedious;
and it ought to be a principle in public, as it is in
private
life, to consult ease where it answers no good
purpose
to take trouble. Almost all unnecessary ceremony
is displeasing to a man of sense. The finest expression
that I have met with on this head, is in the Arcadia of
Sir Philip Sidney. There was ceremony without
being
ceremonious.
I have some impression in my mind of having quoted
this very expression somewhere else in this or some
other book, but I cannot recollect with certainty, nor
have I time to turn back and examine. It is very
possible
that I repeat the same ideas in many places,
but what of that, if a good thing is twice said. This
beautiful remain of the genius of that time, is addressed,
if I remember right, to his sister the Marchioness of
Pembroke. It is of her that the Epitaph is written.
Underneath this marble hearse,
Lies the subject of all verse;
Sidney's sister, Pembroke's mother
Death, ere thou hast kill'd another,
Wise, and good, and fair as she;
Time shall throw a dart at thee,
You will say this is a digression. There is no doubt
but it is. But can it be said that I indulge myself much
in this way? On the contrary, are there many writers
that stick closer to their subject than I have in general
done. Besides I would not write a syllable of what I
am now writing, were it not that it is thought necessary,
that I should not leave my book at a short angle; but
round it off, by giving it something like a natural
conclusion
.
And the truth is, as my ideas are in a great
measure exhausted; I mean those that are near the
surface
;
I have not time to fish for such as swim in deep
water; or to wait, having taken all that were of a larger
size, until the small fry grow bigger. So that whenever
a thought leads me into a quotation, I do not make a
scruple of conscience, to run after it; especially if I
have any reason to think, upon the small reflection I can
give it, that the quotation will be better than the original
idea that might have taken place of it. So far as
respects
my own taste, I read with great pleasure
oftentimes
a book, which has not a single idea in it from
beginning
to end, except in the quotations. The only
question that is made, will be, is the quotation from a
good author; or does it amuse, or instruct. Nor in
reading good moral observations, or anecdotes of great
men, do I care whether they are in a connected series,
or strung together like Swift's Tritical dissertation on
the faculties of the human mind. The apothegms of
Plutarch are somewhat in the same way. The chapters
of Athenus, and the noctes attic of Aulius Gellius, are
of the same rambling sort of composition. Montaigne's
essays also; and some of the introductory chapters of
Henry Fielding. The fact is, that as a regularly bred
cook will shew his skill in the culinary art, by making
a savoury dish out of a bit of soal leather; or a whole
entertainment out of ordinary materials; so, it may
depend
upon the manner, more than the matter of what
is said, whether it be acceptable. Unquestionably there
are but few that have the rare talent of saying things
agreeably; and I am not sure that I have shewn that
art in any degree in this book. But what hinders
aiming
at it, by those who feel a benevolence of heart, and
wish to please. If any man is amused by any of these
images that I am endeavouring to paint, he will be
under
obligation to me, though he may refuse to
acknowledge
it. It is allowable towards the end of a book to
digress; and in the manner of old age deal in
narrative
.
Though I will acknowledge that I have seldom
met with old men who were not apt to digress too much
in their narrations. That old men are more talkative
than those of earlier years, is characteristic.
Garrulous
old age. But that they are apt to digress is not
so generally noted; though it would seem to me to be
the case, and were it put upon me to account for it,
looking into nature at my own age, I would resolve it
into the multiplicity of ideas as one cause. They are
numerous, and press for utterance; and when a certain
set have had an outlet in part, the speaker suspends
awhile the prosecuting them, and goes back to fetch
others. It would be like Charon in his boat upon the
river Styx, were there an island in it, ferrying a
number
of the shades half way; leaving them on the island,
and going back to bring others that distance, who are
crowding on the shore, and anxious to cross. Or like a
mechanic, that has a great number of customers, and
cannot satisfy, but by beginning the work of several, and
C 2
carrying it on by pieces; having it in his power to say
to all that their work is on hands.
But I return to say something on the subject of
ceremony
,
the point from whence we digressed. For the
forms of taking place, or seats, or at least the coming
into the government house, partakes something of the
nature of ceremony in polite assemblies, on other
occasions
.
All attention to which, and the trouble of it, is
avoided by the transmitting what is to be said, in the
shape of what is called a message, which may be
carried
by the secretary and laid on the table.
Having adopted the mode of address by message, it
was prepared, and transmitted to the legislature, now
convened. We have been furnished with an extract of
some part of it, which we shall now introduce.
CHAPTER VI.
IT will not be understood, that I am to give the
whole message, at full length; which would be
unnecessary
,
as I think it is full time, that in the addresses,
or messages of Governors, in most instances, the
common
place parts might be omitted; such as what
respects
improvements of roads, encouragement of
domestic
manufactures, and the making a new militia law,
felicitating
on abundant harvests; or complimenting the
administration of the general government, which comes
also under this head. There are many like common place
subjects which it were tedious to enumerate, but which
may, in this instance, be considered as disposed of. We
hasten to the main matter which the Governor touched
upon, the particular situation and affairs of the new
government
.
I cannot do better than just to make an
extract
in his own words. It is the concluding part, and
the plainest in point of expression. For there is a
certain
stateliness and dignity in the stile of such
compositions
that is excusable in the initiatory, or
perambulatory
part, that need not be observed so punctiliously in
what relates to real business Tropes need not rise so
rapidly, nor need these be taken so much from lofty
objects
in nature; such as billows of the ocean, or
tempests
on the land. All may be simple, like that of
information
,
or opinion given in common cases.
The extract which we give relates to a matter which
may be supposed to have occupied the mind of his
excellency
,
the innovations projected by the visionary
philosopher
and which had got some footing in the minds
of the people, respecting a change in the extent of
suffrage
at elections, and the right of being elected,
consequent
upon it. For if any but those under the
denomination
of rational persons, could elect, other than
rational
persons might be elected. For, similia a similibus
gignuntur. But that he might not give offence, by
attacking
a prejudice abruptly, he approached the subject
circuitously, by talking of the promotion of knowledge,
and the establishment of schools. But I continue to talk
of the message, rather than to give it. Here it is, that
part of it that we have spoken of.
I would not be understood as meaning to insinuate,
even in the most distant manner, a deficiency of natural
understanding, or any extraordinary want of information
in the members of your honourable body. I am the
more careful to suggest this, because of the known
prejudices
which the inhabitants of the sea-coasts entertain,
in favour of themselves. Because, from the greater
opportunities
they have of ships arriving, they may have
information of the affairs of Europe, sooner than we
have, they may be disposed to attribute this, to a greater
facility of apprehension. And because, they have schools
and colleges of an older foundation, and more accessible
from the propinquity of situation. Hence they are led to
think that their possessing more scientific knowledge is
owing to themselves, and not to this advantage. The truth
is that in point of talent, so far as this includes the
capacity
of acquring learning, or judging solidly, I take it the
ultramontane people are before those of the cities or of
the towns, and settlements on the sea-coast: not that in
this case I resolve it into a superior strength of the brain,
so much, as into the circumstance of better air on the
mountains than in the cities; unless indeed I except
those just on the sea-board, and where they have the
benefit of the salt breeze. It may not be that they
possess
stronger, but only clearer brain. For if the
marshes
and the low grounds, overflowed in some part, with
the rivers, infect the atmosphere with damps, and
vapours
,
that affect the body, how can the brain, which is
a part of the body, escape, being muddied with what
naturalists call the effluvi, and physicians, the miasmata,
which are the cause of this? Are the draught cattle of
these places, of the activity of those of the hills? Our
horses are a smaller breed, but they are more alert on a
journey. Our wild beasts in general, are more agile in
their movements, and seem to have more resources of
cunning, and foresight than the tame; but even
domesticated
quadrupeds with us seem to be like the human
species, in the same regions; that is, of a superior cast
to the denizens of the low country. No wonder, for the
barometer will shew the difference that exists in the
gravity of the atmosphere. And running, and jumping
itself, is more favourable to clearness of head, than
standing
behind a counter, and casting up figures. If I were
to take one of these so employed in order to enlighten
him, the first thing I would do, would be to apprehend
him by the locks, and to set him on the top of a hill, to
look about him for a while. I would shake him well,
before I would set him down to his lesson. A man's
ideas in a shop, are in proportion to the size of the room;
he thinks narrowly, if not meanly, who has not more
than a few yards of prospect for the greater part of the
twenty-four hours in the day. We acquire the
magnitude
of surrounding objects, and our conceptions enlarge
by the space that presents itself. Why is it that all
great generals look for the rising and upper ground in
engagements? It is because it improves courage. The
mere circumstance of striking to more advantage, from
the higher part of the inclining plain, is not all. There
is a great deal in the bare imagination. The paradox of
the schools, crede quod habes, et habes, is not true;
but thinking that you can conquer, goes a great way to
give the victory. And the soldier that has his head
higher than his adversary, is led naturally, by a kind of
incalculable impulse, to think that he can subdue him.
I do not wonder, therefore, if upon these reflections, and
ascribing too much to such secret operations of the mind;
derived from the elevation of a range of hills, the
visionary
philosopher that has come amongst us, may have
been encouraged to think that even our beasts might be
capable of an extraordinary cultivation. At the same
time, whatever may be my prepossessions in favor of a
reform, I have not been able to entertain sentiments
equally
saguine with some worthy citizens, on this
particular
I consider it rather the offspring of a disturbed
mind of some sea-coast politician, that has broached this
doctrine, or would induce a community to adopt the
hypothesis
;
and this, not so much out of respect to the
powers of mind with us, as complimentary to their own
vanity, who have been able to excogitate the
imagination
.
If it is not rather meditated as an insult, being as
much as to say, the difference is so small between you
and your cattle, that there can be no conclusive reason,
or cogent argument, why you might not be put upon
the same footing. For as the parallax of remote stars
seems small, and we consider them to the naked eye,
as together; so it is in the light of an imputation of
inferiority
in the human species here, that I have taken
up the suggestion. For why did they not begin with
their own beasts in the lower country, to ameliorate their
condition, and extend their rights? They have been
visionary
enough, in all conscience, with their
abolition of
the common law,
and other innovations; but they have
not come so far as to talk of naturalizing cattle, strictly
speaking; though some of their naturalizations have
been of very uncouth persons. It is not sufficient that the
heat and moisture of the climate may produce yellow
fever
in their towns, but that political pestilences spread
from thence. However able you may be as a body, yet
if a few bullocks, hide and tallow, were actually mixed
among you, by means of the intrigues of these people,
you might become the subject of ridicule, instead of
admiration
;Noif
pards and bears are to be admitted to
appear, or officiate in any department of representative
capacity, it ought to be at the bar, where noise may be
better tolerated, and growling may pass for ability. The
late disorderly elections in the districts, was owing to
this very proposition of giving beasts votes; whereas
in the opinion of most persons, if any were sober, on that
day, there were beasts enough on the ground, if I may
be allowed to call them so, in a comparative way of
speaking
,
who, on these occasions, can reconcile it to
themselves
to cheat and to wrangle in support of the frauds
they have committed. It is in this sense of the word
that the Apostle Paul speaks, when he says, he fought
with beasts at Ephesus; not as some take it, that he
was exposed to wild beasts, in the amphitheatre,
according
to the barbarous custom of the Romans. If all the
election laws that can be framed are ineffectual to
restrain
breaches of the peace, even now, while men only
are allowed the privilege of voting, how would it be, if
the elective franchise was enlarged to creatures that
have claws, or horns, or hoofs. The biting, and the
gouging would be encreased; and there would be so
many tame animals at least beaten, and bruised, that
they would be unfit for the services of agriculture which
will leave the husbandmen without the means of tilling
their ground, or getting in their crops. On all these
considerations, the scheme, or project, as it may be
better
called, appears to me fraught with inconveniences;
and to be a reform, at this time, not practicable.
The abuses of the late election, whether any in the
way of improper votes admitted, it would not become
me to insinuate, nor do I insinuate, as to what may have
taken place, but what has been advocated as a possible
reform. You are yourselves judges of the legality of
your own elections; and seeing neither tails among you,
nor manes on any of your shoulders, I take it for
granted
you are all men, and have been elected by such. For
though an hundred or two horse votes may have been
counted; or a kid, or a merino ram here, or there, may
have got his nose in the dish, it does not follow that it
has made the difference of a representative in any one
case. The purity of the elective franchise, is the first
gem of liberty; it is the bud at which it breaks forth. If
the frost of fraud blights, no fruit springs from the tree.
The prevention of fraud is the object of the laws; but
the distinguishing the objects of trust, is equally
important
.
That must remain with the citizens at large.
The message of his excellency, couched in these
wary
words; was, nevertheless, unfavourably received by
the members present, and those of the country attending.
The contortions in the visages of them, expressed
disapprobation
.
The words aristocracy were muttered.
The physiognomy of some had the appearance of one
whom an inexpert barber was shaving with a bad
razor; there was screwing, and twisting of the
features
;
and a wry countenance at the greater part of the
words read.
CHAPTER VII.
FROM the right of suffrage, to the right of
delegation
,
the transition was easy; and hence the idea of
admiting beasts to a vote in elections, naturally led to
that of beasts being voted for, and elected to a
representative
body. Why not, said an advocate for this
policy
Because said an adversary, they cannot
speak;
brutum pecus that have no utterance; not even to say
aye, or no. That is the very reason, said the other,
that it behooves to chuse such delegates. What do we
not suffer from the verbiage, and loquacity of
members
?
A measure of peace or war cannot be carried but
over
the belly
of a thousand harangues protracted to an
immeasurable length, by orators that know as little of the
subject as a whipperwill, or a jaybird; and yet chatter
continually so as to prevent the question being taken.
Commend me to a brute beast, a buffalo, or sheep that
would chew the cud, and hold its tongue. If there were
at least a mixture of those, there would be fewer
speakers, and take up less time. Unless you
gag a member, he will speak even though no one
would wish him to open his mouth, unless to take a
quid of tobacco. If an elk, or a horse were to speak,
he would make the speach short, if we were to infer
from that pithy speech made by Balaam's ass; coming
to the point at once, and saying all in a few words, that
most of your human orators now-a-days in deliberative
bodies, would chuse to say in a speech of many hours.
These would seem to make conscience of giving
quantity
for quality, and this is the only apology that can
be made for interminable rhapsodies. Nor is it enough
that they waste time in speaking, but they must write
out what they have said and trouble the public with
conceptions in the papers; crude as they would seem
to be, and tire some to read. If any one should
undertake
to travel through them; it can only be such
as have much leisure on their hands, and at a loss to
know what to do with their time. But the mischief
is not altogether to be avoided by the not reading
them, because the journals are taken up with such
effusions in the place of
which
something better
might be selected for the public. There is a double
advantage in a brute animal to whom nature had
denied
the power of speech, in being a member of
congress
because in this casethere is usually denied to
such, the talent of writing speeches. If a member,
conscious
to himself of not excelling in extempore
eloquence
should hold his tongue, like a dum creature,
yet it is ten to one but he will write speeches that he
has saved from his prolixity, yet the press is
made to groan under the oppression of his verbosity.
Give we a young colt that will say little, rather than a
jackanapes of the human species that will be eternally
on the floor. I am for sending a few asses, not
figuratively
,
but literally, to our council, who will bray, but
will do no more than bray a reasonable length of time,
and suffer the more intelligent of the members to
arrange
and carry through the business. No ass brays
more than a few minutes at a time, unless you pinch
it, or occasion it uneasiness in some way. Whether
is it more against nature to send nominally something
else; but, in fact an ass?
If a beast of the forest should go to the house, he
will not be continually turning his head round to listen,
and to hear what other beasts say of his speeches, or
his vote. He will be more independent of his
constituents
that are running at large upon the hills, or
in the pasture, nor will the idea come into his head, that
he is bound by their instructions; a thing
inconsistent
with the delegating representatives to
think
where
they will have a better opportunity of knowing what
is for the good of the commonwealth. If this doctrine
is correct, it is the constituent that stays at home that
is to
think,
and the representative that goes to a public
body, not to think at all; at least not to make use of
his thoughts; which by the bye, is an argument for
beasts going, and men staying at home. Will the
desire of popularity induce your wild, or tame cattle
to make long speeches or to regard what Tom, Dick,
or Harry may say about their votes? they may be
led to prolong the session for the sake of oats and corn,
which they have in their mangers; but, it will not be by
many words that this will be done. One cause, at least,
of the mischief will be struck away. The desire of
members to retain their seats, and procure a re-election,
will not exist so strong with the denizens of the woods
Vol. IV. D
and fields, who will naturally not have the same
attachment
to a house, as human creatures that are
accustomed
to be within doors. On all these grounds, there will be
more independence in our councils, and less subservience
to popular opinion. Individuals will not be continually
looking out to see which way the wind blows; nor will they
covet place, and preferment so much, looking out to be
ambassadors; or to have other appointments abroad, or at
home. I am for keeping at home, at least a portion, of
the
servile pecus,
and sending real cattle to the public
bodies. One advantage farther; there would be no
canabalism
in the blockheads of the human shape that are sent
with them, knocking down a member bullock at the end
of a session; nor would there be an inconvenience in
riding
a colleague horse home. Sir, said an adversary, your
ject seems to be to burlesque a representative
government
.
I deny it, said the advocate; it is to burlesque
the abuses of elections, and of the elective franchise.
If people go to employ a mechanic, or manufacturer of
any sort, they look out for a capable person; one skilled
in the art, or occupation, and with science and
experience
requisite for the thing to be made, or the object to be
accomplished. But, to manage the affairs of a nation,
nothing more is sought than simply the being of a party;
or the being capable of being made so by some master
of the drama at home in a village or district. It is
never
enquired whether he has two legs or four, provided
he answers the purpose of a junto in a neighbourhood.
Hencewhat?
Words that breathe, and thoughts that burn.
No; stupidity or local selfishness; and words, in order
to hide in the rubbish, the want of ideas.
If that is the case, said the adversary, and you do not
mean to advocate the giving beasts suffrages, or sending
them as representatives, I have no quarrel with you.
What these people will do, into whose hands it has been
put, is more than I can tell. It is said to be an easy thing
to raise the devil; but to lay him, requires all the art of
the free-mason with a wand, circle, and a black cat.
I do not think it would do any great harm if it was
tried, said the advocate. The truth is, I am so much
dissatisfied
with this mischief in sending incompetent
persons
to represent us in legislative bodies, talking a long
time and saying nothing, or worse than nothing, that I
must either laugh or cry; and I think it is as well to
laugh; to be Democritus, rather than Heraclitus. But
if there is any remedy for this evil, it must be ridicule;
and I am willing to try my hand a little at it. If a cow
or a horse was chosen, people would begin to think; by
pushing the thing to an extremity, the contrast is better
seen. If a dumb beast should obtain a majority of
suffrages
,
it would be asked why he did not obtain such a
seat; and it would be answered, because he was dumb;
and in that case could not be a long-speaking member.
But is there no remedy for these things upon
principle
?
said the adversary. I know of none, said the
advocate
unless the having fewer members, might curtail a
little, there not being so many to take up time; or the
putting muzzles on them like young calves; but that
would keep them from eating as well as speaking.
Ridicule, by sending a young bull to the house,
because
he would hold his tongue; except bellowing a
little, will, I take it, be found the ultimate remedy. A
very few members, were they so disposed, would take as
much time as the greater number, unless there were so
very few that they could not relieve each other when out
of breath. Loquacity is the fashion of the day; and I
wish to bring taciturnity back again, which has been out
of date almost since the school of Pythagoras. I will
have, at least, a reasonable proportion of dumb creatures
put up at our elections, and sent to the representative
bodies.
This was a dialogue, aside, between the advocate for
the eligibility of beasts, and the individual who opposed
it; it had little effect, one way or the other, not being in
the presence of the multitude.
CHAPTER VIII.
THE people were naturally led from the idea of
property giving the right of suffrage, to that of the
property
itself exercising this right; and herds and flocks
propria persona, coming forward viva voce, or with a
ticket; and this by an association of ideas, introduced
that of being capable of being elected. But it did not
occur to them until suggested, that the representative is
chosen, or in contemplation of the constitution,
supposed
to be chosen for his superior knowledge and
information
over that of the constituent. At least it ought to be
a principle upon which the selection is founded. And
in the original of the English constitution, we find the
representatives were called the wittena gemote, or the
assembly of the wise men. Nor when it was suggested,
did it stick much with them. Nevertheless, they
thought it not amiss to give the beasts some education;
provided their nature was improvable, which, from what
was heard of the learned pig, could not longer remain
doubtful.
Man differs more from man, than man from beast,
says the poet. This being the case, it might be tried
how far a four-footed creature could be taught the arts
and sciences, or instructed in the principles of morality,
or the rules of good breeding; not to go so far as to
constitute
colleges, and academies for their use; but
common
reading and writing, or, perhaps, arithmetic as far
as the rule of three.
There are philosophers who assert, with great
plausibility
,
that the highest powers of reasoning, are but a
gradation from vegetable life. If so, it must be a
greater
start from the tendril of a vine to a vernacular
substance
than from the creeping thing to that which walks
on all fours. From thence to the human species, is a
leap not more extraordinary. That man may have been
once an oyster, was the opinion of Darwin; but that he
might have been at least a ground squirrel, was the
opinion
of the visionary philosopher. Of this character I
have already made honourable mention, in my
introduction
to the history of the beasts voting. He was sanguine
in the undertaking to instruct and civilize the brutes.
Nay, to fit them for offices, and the discharge of trusts
in the community. He had caught a young panther,
and, with a chain about its neck, had put it to study law
with a young man of that profession, who wishing to get
forward in business, thought it would do him no harm,
though it might not do the panther much good.
There were those who bore testimony against this,
being
of opinion that lawyers were bad enough, even when
made of the best materials. They were supported in
this opinion by some reflecting persons who could not
conceive that this animal could ever be made capable of
explaining a matter to a jury; or stating a point of law
to the court. What is it, said the philosopher, whether
he may ever be able to explain himself intelligibly at
the bar. Cannot he grin, bite, squeal, and shake his
tail? Is it with sense, that a jury, or a court, are always
moved most? I wish to prove that reason goes but a
little way to make learned counsel. The main matter
is to satisfy the client; who will be oftentimes better
pleased to lose his cause in the hands of one that will
make a noise, than to gain it by him who says little. At
least he will have less scruple in paying him. For he
will not say, you had not much trouble; you said but a
word or two; not considering that a rifle shot, is more
certain and deadly than any quantum of sound.
An ecclesiastic was at hand, who had an antipathy to
vociferators, being himself a man of a weak voice; and
took this opportunity to express himself against
declaimers
.
It is true, said he, the sound of rams' horns blew
down the walls of Jericho; but that was a most
extraordinary
blast.
And not to be drawn into precedent, said a lawyer who
was by.
It was an extraordinary blast, continued the
ecclesiastic
.
But the human voice is stronger than any wind, said
the visionary philosopher. No wind blowing will shock
an army like that of the shout of a main body about to
engage, though since the invention of gunpowder,
except
among the savages, shouting is not in practice.
D 2
The blowing down the walls of Jericho with the sound
of a ram's horn, resumed the ecclesiastic, was a most
extraordinary
blast. But recollect, that in another part of
the scripture it is said, the Lord was not in the
whirlwind
,
but in the still small voice.
CHAPTER IX.
WERE it imposed upon me as a task, by some
republic
,
to educate a number of young persons to be orators,
in order to introduce a good taste for public speaking,
I would begin with the understanding. What? not with
the heart; it will be said. I take that to be the same
thing. For I know no difference between good sense,
and virtue, except that the one is the judgment of what
is virtuous, and the other the practice. I take a knave
and a fool to have only this difference, that the fool is a
knave in his transactions without meaning to be so; the
other intends it. Or, if this way of putting the
argument
will not be understood, I say that every man who
knowing the right, intends the wrong, is not wise; that
is, a fool. Above all things, give me a good judgment
as the foundation of morals: and the communicating
knowledge is strengthening the judgment.
I admit that there is such a thing as being of a bad
stock; and the moral qualities are as communicable as
the physical constitution, or the features. Hence it is,
that I would look to the stock in the selection of
subjects
;
but still more to the physiognomy of the youth
himself. For I think it possible that Curran, who cannot
but have a good heart, yet may be of a germ from one of
the worst stock that ever trod the bogs. I should have
a great curiosity to trace his ancestry. I say, I cannot
think but that he must have a good heart; because it is
impossible for a cold heart to be warm; and a heart to be
warm that has not a love of virtue. His eloquence is to
me prima facie proof at least, that he is benevolent.
But pursuing my observations on the main point, I
say, to form an orator I would cultivate the
understanding
.
What is eloquence, but good sense expressed in
clear language. The vox, et preterea nihil; voice
without sense, is provoking. I grant that sound may do
a great deal; but it is but as the rushing wind. The
effect
of a persuasive speech is like the moving force of
waters. The tide rises without noise; but the effect is
irresistible.
By the precepts of one whose experience has enabled
him to judge of these things, a bad habit may be prevented
or corrected. But it is the application only that can
confirm
the precepts. Hence it is that there is no forming an
orator, but when the attaining some object by the
speaker
elicits his powers. A man that has his life at stake,
and what is next to this, has his daily bread to get by his
mouth, will not miss the thought, the word, the pathos
to accomplish his purpose. Hence it is that the bar is
the only school in our government for real eloquence.
In the deliberate assemblies, the speaker is thinking of
his constituents, and is a slave sent forward to serve a
party founded at home. I would sooner drag a cart than
be a representative upon such conditions. Hence it is
that a man of talents has no prospect in a public body,
but to make himself unpopular; unless on some
occasion
when the people are alarmed for themselves, and
party and intrigue is put down by the danger of the
occasion. It is thus in a storm, or other perils in life,
abilities are in request. At other times they are the
object
of envy, and combination to bring down.
Application to any science, and the acquisition of
knowledge in general, is a drudgery in the first stages;
and hence it is natural for the youth to excuse himself;
and to hope that by the more easy exertion of his lungs,
and the blowing of his mouth, he can supply the defect
of thought. It is vexatious to the person who has
laboured
to acquire knowledge, and has been led to
depend
upon the effect of solid reasoning, to find that
blustering
will go as far as it does; but it ought to be his
consolation
and he will literally find it the fact, that of solid
talents, it may be said, as it is said of truth, great is the
force thereof, and it will prevail.
Magna est veritas, et prevalebit.
For solidity in mental talent is truth; and the
appearance
of intellect where it is not, is the false.
One of the best things that I ever heard by a lawyer
to excuse himself to his client for having misled him in
defending, or bringing a suit, I forget which, where he
ought not; was, on the honest man saying, did you not tell
me
I had the law on my side?
And did I not tell the
court so too? said the lawyer. Did you? said the
client
.
Yes. The man could say no more. It would have
been unreasonable; especially as the advocate had made
as much noise as any one could reasonably expect in
asserting his conceptions. But had he been informed
properly in his profession, his embarrassment might not
have occurred, nor his presence of mind rendered it
necessary
;
which, as it is what one cannot always
command
it may be well to be without the necessity of it.
Not that I mean to say, that any powers of intellect can
anticipate what may be the way of thinking of a court
and jury. There is such a thing as a by stander thinking
differently from both. But that in general the public
judgment, both as to merits of the cause, and the
ability
of those who manage or dispose, goes according to the
truth. This is a consolation to the industrious; and the
diligent student who places his dependence on solid, not
on shewy qualifications.
At the same time, the garnishing is not to be
neglected
.
The voice is capable of formation in point of
sweetness
as well as force. In point of sweetness, by diligent
attention, and lending the ear to those who speak
musically
;
in point of force, by exercise alone. It is as
necessary
to observe the key at which to begin to speak, as
for a musician in singing; so that he may retain the
command
of his voice under every passion to be expressed.
It is to be observed that reading well is a different talent
from speaking; and does not altogether depend upon
equal cultivation. I leave this to be accounted for; I
only repeat the fact.
Action is the last; the ancients thought not least
advantage
of a speaker. That can be true only of the oratory
proper for a popular assembly. That must be
extremely
guarded and chastised, that is used at the bar. For
the least suspicion in the minds of a jury, that the
passions
are attempted, will excite distrust of even a good
argument, and injure it. At the same time, while
human
nature is susceptible of the impressions of grace
and dignity, the manner of an orator must have a great
effect. Hence it is that I recommend even attention to
dress; not so much in the cloth, as in the fullness, and
flowing of the vestment, which appears to make the
orator
loom more.
I have an impression of having treated upon these
particulars in the preceding pages, and that I may seem
to repeat. But if any one finds fault, I charge him home
with an expression of the scripture, line upon line,
precept
upon precept, here a little, and there a little. It
may be said that some of my lines, and precepts, and
littles, may be pretty good; but that there is a great deal
of trash. That this may be the case, I have
acknowledged
heretofore. But would the more valuable be
read without the less? I applied to a hatter the other
day to make me a hat; and requested him to make me
one entirely of beaver, and not to mix racoon. The truth
is, I thought he would charge me as much for the one as
the other, and therefore I might as well have the best.
But he informed me that a little racoon mixed with the
beaver would make a better hat than one all beaver. It
may be so with my book, which is calculated for all
capacities
;
and a mixture of images drawn from high and
low life, with painting serious and ludicrous, may
conduce
to the being more read; and lasting longer in the
world. Or should it not be read, and that object fail, it
is amusing to one's self to indulge variety; to discumb
and to rise.
CHAPTER X.
A Yankee trick in the mean time had been
discovered
,
disgraceful to the land of steady habits, even though
it was at the expense of the English government; and
they might be considered as deserving no favour, and
scarcely fair dealing. But it is one thing to merit
punishment
,
by retributary injury, and another, to have the right
of inflicting it. Hearing that the scalps of families of the
United States, were in request in Canada, a premium
being paid for these, by the
British government,
two
young men of Connecticut, having entered into
partnership
,
devised the scheme of cutting up into patches of
a proper size, with the hair on, the furs of muskrats,
and martins newly flayed, with a view to make the
appearance
of green scalps; and to vend them to
John
Bull.
They were called to an account before the Chief
Justice; they justified themselves on the ground, that
the British government in Canada were in the habit of
counterfeiting treasury notes, and bank bills of the
United
States; and why not forge or counterfeit scalps, in
return? Could John Bull complain that false scalps
were passed upon him, for which his premium in gold
and silver was received; since this was done without
actually
scalping a human being. The Chief Justice did
not see well what could be said to this defence. It
was a kind of retaliation, and might have the effect of
lowering the price of scalps, and thereby reduce the
demand
,
which would in that degree lessen the taking
them. It might also contribute to breed a difference
between
them and their scalp-taking auxiliaries, or allies,
by an imputation upon Tecumsey as privy to the fraud.
For scalps having got into the market, it could not
readily
be distinguished what had been sold by the Indian
tribe, or by brother Jonathan trading with his cart. On
these foundations of public policy, the young men were
acquitted
,
and dismissed, but it was recommended to them,
to be cautious in the business, and not to scalp any human
person by mistake, especially of that settlement. If they
should scalp a few Johnny Bulls of their own country,
who justified old John in all things, it would not be so
much matter. But to license such a thing on the part
of the government would not do; or even to go so far as
to give it countenance; because in carrying the thing
into effect, great abuses might take place. If it could
be confined to leaders, O P, &c. &c. &c. it
would be of little moment. Old Bull, it is true, might
resent the fraud doubly, as taking his own scalps to palm
them upon him for those of the democrats.
A little round Englishman, who had been tooth-drawer
to a lap-dog, but was now in this country, said it would
have been determined otherwise, according to the law of
nations, by a court in England.
CHAPTER XI.
IT being some time since the preceding part of this
memoir has been published, and an opportunity given of
hearing the strictures, and criticisms, that have been
made, or that passed upon it; it has not escaped the
knowledge of the author, that some have thought the
particulars, in some instances, extravagant, and
bordering
on the incredible; which is contrary to the maxim
of sticking at least to an appearance of truth. But how
can any one undertake to say what is extravagant, or
what is incredible? Who is there at this day, who will
call in question the truth of the rise and progress of the
Corsican adventurer; and yet this borders upon the
marvellous
.
At a future day, when the lights of history have
been obscured, who knows but his adventures, when
written, may be laid on the same shelf with that of
Amadis
,
of Gaul; Don Bellianis, of Greece; or a small book,
entitled, the history of the seven Champions of
Christendom
?
It is in the cards, to use a phrase taken from the
gamblers, and not at all improbable, that his fall may be
as rapid, and not less extraordinary than his ascent.
*
*
This was written some years ago. In fact, the greater part of
this volume is printed from scraps furnished by the author, from
his port folio, in consequence of our signifying an inclination to
publish a new edition of his work.
It is perhaps somewhat owing to a defect in the
narration
,
that an air of improbability is thrown upon a
history
by not entering sufficiently into a detail of the
transactions
.
There is a remarkable instance of this, in the
history of the American war, by Ramsey, in which he
notices the capture of three vessels, and 1500 men of the
British by a stratagem. Perhaps not 1500, for I have
not the book before me; but certainly some hundreds.
All this by four of a Georgia regiment, and an old
negro
,
a waiter. It was in all the Gazettes of the time;
but the details were not given. It is also mentioned by
General Lee, in his memoirs; who, though he gives
some particulars, yet is not minute in his statement of
the circumstance. There is no doubt of the fact,
however
;
nor would it appear doubtful to any one, provided
Vol. IV. E
the circumstances were minutely stated, which led to the
success. But it is not consistent with the object of this
work, to introduce this narrative by way of episode. I
mention it only as an instance, that the improbable is not
always false. The study of brevity, is a cause of the
omission of incidents; an unwillingness to detain the
reader
.
And yet the great charm of ancient historians, is the
minuteness of painting. But I will say for myself, and
at the same time, it may be an apology for other
historians
,
that the extreme study of brevity arises
frequently
from too much sensibility to public opinion; too great
a fear of wearying the reader. We are not sure that
what we relate is of sufficient importance to engage
attention
;
and we endeavour to crowd the more into a
narrow space. This is an attempt to make up by
condensing
,
what the material itself wants in its quality.
But the want of probability has not been an
observation
in the mouths of all readers of this work. On the
contrary, it has been thought by some, that the incidents
have been all common and natural, that there is nothing
improbable in them; and that the triteness of
occurrence
,
rather than the unusual, and extravagant, ought to
be the objection. What extraordinary can there be, say
some, in such a creature as Teague O'Regan receiving
appointments to office, or being thought qualified for the
discharge of the highest trusts? Do we not see
instances
every day of the like? Is it possible to say how
low the grade of human intellect that may be thought
capable of transacting public business? It will be seen
in the subsequent part of this narrative that the joke has
been carried farther than the lowest possible capacity of
what is found amongst men; not just a block of wood,
for that would be assigning intellectual functions to an
inanimate substance. And yet, even this has not been
without a parallel in the history of the human mind, as
to what has been one subject of the belief of nations. Did
not some even make gods of stocks and stones,
assigning
to them celestial natures, and placing them above a
mortal existence? Under this impression some have
been forward enough to tell me, that, so far from my
bog-trotter being a burlesque upon human credulity, and
pretension to office, that the bulk of men in office are
below even his qualifications; and that if I were to go
into any deliberative body, and pull out the first man that
occurred to me, nine times out of ten I would find that
I had a Teague O'Regan by the tail. I have no idea
that things are just brought to this pass,
notwithstanding
there may be colour for the allegation. For
undoubtedly
there is nothing in which men are less disposed to
question their fitness, than in what regards the
endowments
of the mind. A horse not a hunter, will not leap
a five-bar gate, nor attempt a ditch of the same number
of feet in width, unless he is greatly pushed by the rider.
For the animal will have the sagacity to look and
compare
the distance with what he has been accustomed to
surmount. But such is the sanguine temperament of
the human mind, that who is there that does not think
himself equal to any undertaking? This is the moral of
this book, and the object of setting the example of the
bog-trotter before the people; not as what is universal
in every instance of a candidate for office; but as an
instance
of what is too common, and which ought to be
avoided rather than imitated. For be assured, that so
far as my observation goes, it is not the way to
happiness
,
to court an advancement by a rise that is
unnatural
or to think of being respectable by the mere
possession
of office, or delegation. The point of honour in
such case, is rather that of a private station. But it is
experience only, that, with an individual, or with the
public
,
can sufficiently establish a conviction of this truth.
It will be said, why has the narrative been so long
suspended? For it is now some years since the history
had been brought down to the Captain with his
pedeseque
coming to the settlement; and the sequel of the
history
begins at that point. The fact is, it was not
suspended
,
as to the writing; but only as to the publication.
For it will be seen that the incidents had not only
occurred
in the years 1805-6, but that they had been
committed
to paper, with the observations accompanying them,
nearly at that time. For it was in those years that the
convulsion of public opinion took place, with regard to
the formation of a new constitution; and that we had that
great struggle in this state to preserve ours; with
analogy
to which, the disquietude of the public mind, in the
new government, has been depicted. For the passions of
men being always the same, under like circumstances,
they will shew the like ebullitions. It must be admitted
that under this new government, the reverses, as they
may very properly be stiled, were much more
extravagant
.
And if it is considered as having a relation to
what has happened, elsewhere, or has actually happened
any where, it must appear outre, as the French stile it,
and beyond the life. And therefore in the application,
I give notice, that it is to be taken cum grano salis, or
with a reasonable drawback. Nullum simile est idem;
nor does every picture run upon all fours. There is a
likeness, and a better likeness; a resemblance, and an
exact picture. But a caricatura is not to come under
the rules of painting from the life, or to the life; but on
the contrary, of giving you to know what is intended;
but at the same time, shewing you something different
from the thing itself; in other words, suppressing the
beauties, and giving the faults. For, where the graces,
and the deformities are mixed in the object, you are apt
to fall in love with the deformities, for the sake of the
graces. The use therefore of the caricatura, is to put
the deformities by themselves, that they may cease to
be the object of imitation. Did any one ever see an
imitator
who did not copy the defects, even though he did
not mean to do it? I say nothing of Alexander's
courtiers
having their necks awry; for that is a common place
illustration. But I myself once knew an orator, a man
of great powers, who had a kind of grin when he spoke;
this, accompanied by some very noble flights of fancy, was
rendered pleasing by what followed; but when catched
by the imitator, was displeasing. So that what took
place in this state, being followed, and carried to excess
in the new government, would seem scarcely the same,
though it might be evident that it was the same, not in
degree, but in kind. But it is with a view to serve
future
times, that these things are handed down. For the
cupidity of man still continuing the same, the like
convulsions
at no distant day will occur, and unless well
managed, will terminate in the overthrow of liberty.
For it is only by the permanence of establishments that
are constituted on the basis of freedom, that liberty can
be preserved. And if constitutions once come to be
played with, like battle-dores, there is an end of stability.
Every new man, must have a new constitution; for he will
wish one to suit himself; and he will have no doubt but
that he can make one, that will at least have in it what
he wants.
Will there be any end to the projects of innovators, in
matters of law, and government; especially where the
most uninformed are equally entitled to an opinion with
those of the greatest experience, or the deepest thought?
And to exclude any from the right of having an opinion
in public affairs is impracticable, consistent with the
enjoyment
of liberty. The principle of the right must be
acknowledged; what is more, it must be preserved, and
cultivated. It is only by
reason, or by ridicule, that what
is excessive in the exercise of the right, and erroneous
in the deductions of the mistaken, can be corrected.
In the propagation of a new religion, or in a new
tenet of a particular faith, what is moderate will be less
likely to prevail in the opinions of men. The absurd is
always the most popular, and this upon the principle
that artificial tastes are stronger than the natural; and
what produces the greatest excitement, is most pleasing
to the mind. Hence it is that mere morality, and the
dictates of nature and truth in the conduct of men, are
undervalued in comparison of the dogmata of fanatical
faiths. Unintelligible reveries are better relished in the
pulpit than just reasoning on the principles of right and
wrong in the actions of men; and incomprehensible
theological
disquisitions are put into the hands of young
people, as more substantial food for the mind than
precepts
of moral truth, which every step in life will bring
into practice, and explain.
E 2
CHAPTER XII.
THE altercations which took place, were almost
general
with all ranks of the community, for the
perfectibility
of man and beast. And whereas some taking the
side of the men, and others of the beasts, dwelt
pretty
much at large in their harangues, upon the want of
talent, in the bulk of the community to execute offices,
or discharge trusts; so with others, whose argument was
the indiscriminate capacity of all persons, it was
contended
that there was no man so destitute of natural powers
as not to be fit for any office. Nay what is more, that
even less than what men in general possess, might
suffice
.
As it is the nature of all contraries to run to
opposite
extremes, so it was even at length carried so far
that some undertook to sport an opinion that even that
degree of mother wit which some beasts possess, might
suffice. In the heat of debate, in the warmth of
argument
,
it was insisted on that the experiment ought to be
made. Why did not the Governor appoint some
quadruped
to office, and see the result? Was there ever
any thing ascertained in matters of government, but from
experience? Experience was the test of government.
We did hear of horses and sheep being in office. This
was meant as abuse; and might be the cause why a
prejudice
had been entertained in making these actually,
and bona fide officers of government, or members of the
legislature.
It contributed much to give currency to this way of
thinking, that about this time there came a visionary man
from the seat of the general government, who was
called
the visionary philosopher; and well indeed he might
be so called; for he had adopted the opinion of the
practicability
of the civilizing beasts, and making them
members
of the community. It was with a view to reduce
this system to practice, that he had made an excursion
to the new country, conceiving that prejudice in favour
of the old system, would be less likely to be in a new
country. He had been several months broaching the
matter
amongst the common people, which is always the
way with innovators, before he thought proper to wait
upon the Governor, and to broach it. This he had at
length done. The Governor, as we have seen, was a
man of that mildness of character that he did not
decline
a conversation on the subject, though he thought
it extremely absurd. But affecting to listen to his
reasonings
,
he answered him at length with some
abruptness
but in a tone of voice softened as much as the
nature
of the reply would admit.
It is a wild project, said he; but I see it must be
tried
.
The people will have their way, and restraint will
but dam up the current, and produce a flood that will
produce an inundation, and carry all before it.
CHAPTER XIII.
NOTWITHSTANDING the governor's opinion
seemed to be against him, yet the visionary philosopher
still persisted in his idea that the brutal nature was
capable
of cultivation, if not in moral qualities, yet so far
as respected the acumen ingenii or the powers of the
understanding
.
He had before this time, turned his
attention
to the instituting an academy, where he had a
number
of animals, of different species, and amongst them
some squirrels which he had put to study Algebra.
Harum
Scarum, thought, he had better have begun with
music, and taught them to play the fiddle. No jibe,
or jeer could move the visionary man from his purpose.
He argued that it had been the case with all experiments,
that the bulk of mankind were incredulous to the first
essays
.
And hence it was that in medicine, quacks had led
the way in all improvements. In the profession of the
law, precedent had enslaved. In mathematics, Erra
Pater
that wrote the book of knowledge, was thought a
visionary
man, though since his time greater credit has
been attached to the casting nativities. The diving bell
was an invention of Sir William Phips of New England,
and no one had faith in the success of it until he actually
explored the galleon at the Bahama Islands, and shewed
the treasure he had got from it. Paracelsus died with
the secret in his mouth, of the elixir of longevity,
owing
to which accident, it is perhaps, that men do not live
now to the age of a thousand years. Parrots, jays and
black birds have been taught to speak; and why not
squirrels and racoons?
With these reasonings in his head, he was busy in
structing certain quadrupeds in their gesticulations, and
grimaces, that had the appearance occasionally of
disputants
.
The chattering which some of them exhibited,
sounded not a great deal unlike,
Bocardo, cesario, ferio, baralipton,
Terms which logicians use.
A number of horned cattle in an inclosure, he was
engaged
in disposing to take the floor in turns like
members
of a legislative body. He had employed a
stenographer
to take down their speeches in short hand. With
these he could use the same liberty that he had been used
to take, with members of the human species, which was
to make the speeches; or at least to new model them in
such a way, as to be a caricature, or an improvement.
Stenographer, said I; for I had the curiosity to visit this
menagerie; when you make a speech for a bear, as for
instance
,
for that Bruin which I see chained, you will be
careful, to make it rough, surly and congruent to nature.
The lowing of the cow, and the roaring of the bull, must
be translated, into loud sounds, very different from the
mewing of the cat, or the squealing of the pig.
By all means, said he, every thing in character. Now
said I, with respect to a legislature of beasts, it will not
be thought a matter of ridicule, to paraphrase what is
said as spoken by a buffaloe; or to insinuate the
insignifience
of a member by calling him a ewe or an ass; or to
designate his heaviness in a debate by saying he is a
horse; for in this case, all things will be without figure,
and the truth.
However, the people thought the man deranged; and,
it would seem to me, not without reason; especially
when he had incurred considerable expense, in
purchasing
up subjects of tuition. He had trappers in the woods;
and horse jockies employed to pick up lively colts that
might seem to be of parts, and scarcely a drover passed
through the settlement, with black cattle or swine, but
he was bartering for a calf, or a shoat.
Application had been made to a magistrate for an order
to confine him on a habeas corpus: he was brought before
the chief justice, and made his defence.
Chief justice, said he, though you are blind, in a
certain meaning of the term, yet I flatter myself, you can
see pretty plainly into this matter. It does not follow that
because a man is deficient in one sense, he is destitute of
another. On the contrary it is well known by observers
of human nature, that where one sense is denied, the
remaining
become stronger. Even where an arm or a
limb is lost, of the human body, the arm or the limb
which remains, acquires an increase of power as if to
supply
the want. Would Tiresias have ever passed for a
prophet if he had not wanted outward sight; or would
Meonides, have written his rhapsodies, or Milton his
divine poem?
So much the rather thou celestial light shine inward,
and the mind through all her powers irradiate; there
plant eyes; all mist from thence, purge and disperse.
Not that I suppose that a man has equal advantage in
describing an object, who has never seen it, but takes
his impressions from the description of others. For it
must be rare, if a thing at all in nature, that a man can
be a poet who is born blind; but having lived to a
considerable
age with his eye-sight, and received all the
images
of things upon his mind, from the originals
themselves
,
it may be possible for him; nay it may be with
advantage over others, that he can recollect these, and
become more familiar with them in a reflex view, than
if he was disturbed with the images themselves
renewed
from without. Certain it is that a man can think more
deeply and closely, with his eyes shut, than if he opened
them on surrounding objects. Darkness and silence
are favourable to contemplation.
Philosopher, said the chief justice, you do not seem to
be a plain man in regard to thinking closely. You
wander
from the point. You are to be informed that you
have been taken into the keeping of the law, not as a bad
man, but as one standing in need of a protector,
conceiving
you under the calamity of being a little deranged in
your nervous system, from a fever possibly, or some
cause, which constitutes a malady, not a crime. The
enquiry
is whether you are in your right mind; a
suspicion
to the contrary of which is excited by your
congregating
cattle and wild beasts, in order as you say, to
civilize
them, and make them members of society.
Experiments of this kind have with great difficulty
succeeded with the savages. And indeed, where they
have succeeded, it has been chiefly to the southward,
where the system is more relaxed, and the temper mild.
It appears madness in the abstract, to talk of
humanizing
brutes, that are behind savages, and at a great
interval
.
That I deny, said the philosopher. Haud magno,
intervallo
said
the latin schoolmaster.
I say that many of the human species are not before
the brutal.
Man differs more from man than man from beast.
These things are figuratively spoken, said the chief
justice. In poetry or prose, the meaning is no more
than that a portion of our species, have so far degraded
themselves by obedience to the sensual appetite, that
like beasts they lose the face erect to heaven, and
constantly
looking down upon their tables, without mental
enjoyment; or, that from a neglect of the cultivation of
moral reason, they may seem to want but the horn or the
hoof, to be like the cattle that graze the commons. This
is no more than the sentiment of Plato, which with the
expression in which it is clothed, is given by Longinus,
as an example of the sublime.
I am not just so far lost to reason, said the
philososopher
,
as to take figures for realities. I know that a
figure is but a short simile; or fable hit off in a few
words; and that orators, or satyrists among the poets,
or philosophers in their moral essays, by their burstings
and castings, mean no more than to dissect insignificance
or degradation, or sensual indulgence. It is not their
intention to communicate the idea that men actually
become
quadrupeds; though I have seen some not far
from it. But still this does not affect the question, how
far the nature of beasts may be improvable. But
admitting
the absurdity of the attempt, and that it carries
with it a presumption of derangement of the brain, is the
insanity prejudicial to the community? It can be but time
thrown away, which supposing me a man beside myself
cannot be of great value. I purchase all my stock that I
employ my pains upon, with the exception of a few that
have been bestowed to me. I had a present made me
of an elk from the mountains. This I am forming for an
ambassador, for which if he does not turn out fit, he can
be disposed of to a museum. Why should it be thought
impossible to instruct the four-footed creatures, and
render
them capable of suffrage, if not of office? I have a
great deal of trouble with them in my school, it is true,
for they are apt to play truant. A young fox broke off
the other day, and I have not been able to recover him.
The discipline which I find it necessary to enforce is
not the mildest. I use a pretty rude ferule; and I have
occasion to exert authority, to quicken parts and
application
.
If I succeed, in bringing these sans culottes to be
good citizens, I shall have deserved well of the
republic
;
and if I should fail, no one's labour is lost but my
own. Experiments in every other way are indulged;
and even patents granted, where the invention has but
the appearance of succeeding. Why may I not be
allowed
to turn my attention to the making a justice of the
peace out of an elk, or a judge out of a buffaloe, if the
thing is possible? Especially, as instead of making a
demand for my production, if I should be so fortunate
as to be able to furnish these out of my manufactory, it
will cost the state nothing for the education, and as to
the officers themselves, the forage will be less
expensive
;
in some cases a few tufts; in others, a little grain
will suffice. If a horse-judge is invited to dine, a peck of
oats, of grass or corn, and a bundle of hay in the stable and
truss of straw to litter him at night, will be all that will
be wanted. This will be a great saving to poor rogues
that may wish to have it said that a judge dined with
them; not that they care for the judge, but that people
may think they have the law on their side. I say that
hospitality
in this way, will be less expensive, and economy,
if not a moral, is at least a political virtue.
But independent of these contingent advantages and
barely possible, if you please, advantages, the money
circulated
in the settlement by this instruction; or a
college
of any kind which cannot but bring money, must
increase
the value of property.
This last argument was popular, and struck the croud,
de circumstantibus. Several counsel present, as friends of
the court put in a word, catching at popularity, and gave
their opinions that they knew of no statute in the case; and
that, by the common law, every man had a right to traffic
in such purchases; and that no enquiry could reasonably
be made when a man bought a pig, whether he meant to
make a scholar of him, or a barbecue.
The chief justice inclined to be of the same opinion,
and the prisoner was enlarged.
CHAPTER XIV.
IT is a melancholy consideration to consider how
nearly the brutal nature borders on the human; because
it leads to a reflection that the difference may be in
degree
,
not in kind. But on the most diligent
consideration
that I have been able to give the subject, it would
seem to me, that no reasonable doubt can exist of there
being a distinction in kind. The brutal creation is not
improvable
beyond a certain limit; and that limit is
reached
at an early period, without pains taken to inform. The
mind of a beast grows up to its size as naturally as its
body. And though the capacity of a man of a very
heavy
nature may seem not a great deal beyond that of a
sagacious quadruped of some species; yet it is capable
of continual enlargement; and, at the latest years of his
life, until perfect superanuation, is susceptible of new
impressions
.
If the strength of judgment in comparing
objects, cannot be improved; yet the sphere of
thinking
can be extended. His ideas can be infinitely
increased
What carries with it the appearance of virtue, in a
faithful quadruped, seems to be the feeling of its nature,
and not the result of any reflex sentiment of duty and
obligation
.
Except certain noises, peculiar to their natures, and of
which all of the species are possessed, as soon as they
receive
existence, and which is an untaught language, we
have no evidence of ideas in their minds annexed to
sounds. Much less is there a capacity of a variation of
articulation to any extent, worth mentioning. A
traveller
of good sense, who has seen the Cafrarian; or
whatever
other species, under the denomination of the
creature
man, at the lowest grade, would not despair if
it was imposed on him as a condition to reserve
himself
from slavery or death, that he must take a young
person
from amongst that people, and teach it any language,
or science, or abstract principle of knowledge; but if it
was made the condition that he should take the
seemingly
most intelligent of the quadrupeds of the countries he
has visited, and teach any thing like what is called a
rational
acquisition, he would say the attempt is not worth
Vol. IV. F
making, it is impossible. The seven wise masters
or mistresses of Greece, alluding to a popular book
under that title; the philosophers of antiquity, or of
modern times, employed for an indefinite space,
would never teach him more in reality than he
possessed
in the woods from whence he came. He might
be taught to connect certain movements of the body with
those shewn him; and by imitation led to make them,
under fear of a whip, but that is all. It is humiliating to
think that brutes of whose post-existence we have no
hope, have even so near an approach to our natures.
But it is consolatory that there seems to be something
like demonstration that they are so far behind: that it is
not in degree of intellect, but in kind, that they differ;
and that that difference is so immense, that it is not
unreasonable
to entertain the idea of a totally different
destination
This is reasoning from the laws of nature as to
the destination of the human mind, and on which the
philosopher
must dwell with pleasure, as aiding what
those who believe in revelation adduce as the grounds of
their faith. For there can be no philosopher, who,
whatever
doubts he may have of religion, can be without a
wish that it may be true. What is it more than being
certain of what, even supposing it not to be revealed, yet
the imagination of a man would contrive for himself as
painting his glory, and his happiness? What is that which
we call revelation, but a system of ideas representing a
prospect ennobling to our natures; and which, if not
revealed
,
must at least be the conception of great and good
minds intent on what would constitute the grandeur and
felicity of the creature man.
We have no means of getting at the exercise of the mind
of a beast; so that we cannot say what may be the limit of
their cogitations. But no one observing them has ever
been able to trace any thing like an idea of what they
have been; or a fear of what they may be. No
uneasiness
of mind seems to hang upon them from this source.
Yet this anxiety is given so strong to our nature that it
is the constant subject of our thoughts: our reasonings
concerning it are infinite; our aerial castles which we
build, even where they are the mere effect of
imagination
,
are without end. We people all nature with
beings
for ourselves, even where we are not. What
might have been the agonies anterior to the time of
Moses, in Egypt, and other parts of Africa, we cannot
ascertain; but from the history of the Jews, we have
considerable information relative to that of Syria; at least
of Palestine, the part of Syria, more immediately
adjoining
.
The heathen mythology, particularly so denominated,
presents an immense scope; and which, with the poets,
is yet preserved. It is a part of a learned, or even of a
polite education, to be made acquainted with this
system
in order to understand the allusion of the fine
writers
ancient and modern. What an immense exercise,
and employment of the human mind must it not have
been to build up such a system. However false we may
suppose this peopleing with celestial powers, or earthly
divinities, it cannot but be consolatory to reflect that it
makes a boundary at all times distinct, between the
human
mind, however in darkness, and that of what we
consider
the mere animal creation.
We have but partial and obscure information of the
systems of other nations, contemporary with the Greeks
and Romans. But we see in what we have of these, the
like evidence of activity, pressing beyond the bounds of
what we see before our eyes, and fashioning to our minds
images of existence. The nature of these, is usually a
proof of the duration and refinement of a people.
Where the imagination was limited by the doctrines of
revelation under the Mosaic, or Christian dispensation;
as to the unity of the deity, and ministers of good or
evil to man, how unlimited have been the excursions of
the fancy, and the subtleties of the intellect, in the
subdivisions
of credence. The Talmud and the Targum of
the Jews present us an immense field. The polemic
divinity of the christian schools, is more within our
knowledge
;
taught in some section of the church, to the
catechumeni
or propounded, in the pulpits. These
disquisitions
shew the wonderfully metaphysical nature of the
human mind.
On the contrary, there seems to be no trace of hope or
fear, with regard to futurity, in the mind of a brute. I
have observed with great attention, and I could never
discover
any symptom, in the smallest degree, of that
horror
which is felt by man at the view of a dead body.
This horror arises from the ideas associated
with
the
view, that it is the remains of a man. The revulsion of
mind which is felt at being in the dark, especially with a
dead body, seems not in the most distant degree,
participated
with any of the hairy or feathered tribes, neither in
respect of dead creatures of their own species, or of the
human. No shyness of a church yard, has ever been
remarked
.
Tales of apparitions, are told in the hearing
of domesticated animals, without the least symptom of
that fear of being left alone which afflict families where
there are nurses, whose memories are stored with
relations
of this nature. Memoirs of the Fairy kingdom,
have no effect upon a dog, or a cat.
But where is the heaviest of the creature called
human
,
that is not affected? Nay, perhaps, liable to be
affected the most. There would, therefore, even
from this small ground of argument, be reason
to infer that whatever may be said, in figures of
speech, or however really man may degrade himself;
yet, in the scale of being, the lowest is by an infinite
distance
in his nature, above a beast.
That gregarious animals are susceptible of a kind of
civil government, is certain. But their regulations seem
to be a law of their nature; at all times the same;
without
changes in any country, or at any period. I do not
remark this, as refuting the reveries of the visionary
philosopher
,
but as going in deduction to the establishment
of the above position. As to the philosopher, I have
dwelt long enough upon his reverie, which I thought
might amuse young persons, and I omit what further
occurred
,
the contrivance of Harum Scarum, and Will
Watlin, to confirm him in his hypothesis. This was to
dress themselves in hair and bear skins, and to pass with
him by running upon all fours, for educated cubs that
had been taught languages. These were frolics of
which the governor did not approve; for it is not
becoming
to be amused at the expense of persons deprived
either of the gifts of reason, or of the goods of fortune.
It might not perhaps be blameable to be diverted at the
mistake of some weak people, who were imposed upon,
and became alarmed at the idea of their being candidates
for the legislature, at the next election, and sent forward
to take a seat. This was what the wags threatened in
their disguise; and when the caprice of suffrage was
considered, who could tell but that the apparent
quadrupeds
might make good what they spoke.
CHAPTER XV.
IT had struck ingenious persons that the popular
opinion of beasts speaking, and being taught to speak,
might be turned to some account. Hence it was that
two young men with a cart, from New England,
coming
through the settlement, and vending tin-wares, or
exchanging
them for other articles, in order to sell again at
a profit, projected the idea, of inveigling some rustic
simpleton, and dressing him in the skin of a wild beast,
put him in the vehicle, and pass him for a speaking
Panther
,
or cat of the mountain; or what else they might
think most likely to take with the multitude.
Accordingly
being in quest of some straggling individual, they
got sight of the bog-trotter, and dogging him to a
hayloft
,
into which he had crept to take a nap, they cast a
noose about his neck, and dragging him to their
receptacle
,
put him in their cage. A panther's skin which
seemed to accord with the colour of his hair, was thought
a suitable disguise with which to invest him; and this
they had at hand, having in the course of this exchange,
procured it amongst other peltry, which they had in a
bale on the top of their carriage. They found he could
speak, but in a dialect which they did not well
comprehend
;
nor perhaps could other people, and therefore the
more suitable, as they thought, for their purpose, as
having
the appearance of articulation, but of a beast not
yet brought to express himself with a correct idiom of
any language. For these itinerant traders being from
the eastward, and what are called Yankies, did not
understand
the vernacular of the west of Ireland, of which
country Teague was.
Having cased him in the panther's hide, they
exhibited
him as one of this species, and giving him a touch of
the whip now and then, and causing him to exclaim, in
the language of complaint, they proved to a
demonstration
,
that a beast might be taught to speak.
The bog-trotter, in the mean time, had been missed,
and something in the nature of a hue and cry had been
raised on his account. Being found in the possession of
the vagrants, they were questioned on the nature of their
property by the officers who had detected them; though
F 2
this was not until they had had him in their custody
several
days, and had made money by the imposition. The
detection of the fraud was unavoidable, being exhibited
to so many, some of whom had been acquainted with the
bog-trotter, and knew the peculiar idiom of his brogue;
so that suspicion first arising of the kidnapping, it came
to certainty by the investigation. The robbers, as they
might be called, were apprehended by a warrant from
the chief justice, and brought before him. The
attorney
general, Harum Scarum, was very warm on the
occasion
and disposed to prosecute them, though not being
well skilled in the law, he could not well tell for what;
or in what shape to send up the indictment; whether for
larceny, or burglary, or arson. But he gave the act and
deed, many hard names, which he had heard of in the
law. The chief justice thought it but a trespass, in
legal
contemplation, though of a very aggravated nature,
and could not but lay a ground for an action of damages.
Young men, said he, you are from a country of
steady
habits;
but these are not the habits in which it behooves
to be steady. I have heard much of the
religion,
or
rather
hypocrisy,
of your country. They tell me you chuse
a chaplain when you go to steal a pig, for a thanksgiving
day; or plot against the government. Not that I
undertake
to censure your
stealing a pig,
provided it is for a
religious purpose; because it is amongst yourselves,
and these are matters with which those that are without
may not have a right to meddle. But your stealing a
man from himself, and from the community to whom he
may be useful, though, in law, it may not come under the
denomination of stealing, under all circumstances, and
where it is not to take him out of the country, yet is at
least a very aggravated trespass, and in what is called
a civil action, may subject to very high damages. And
this, I say not as anticipating the trial of the cause, if a
suit should be brought, but with a view to a compromise.
You are not aware of the injury to the individual which
must depend somewhat upon the dignity of the person
trespassed on; and the injured in this case, is no less a
person than one who has been a candidate for a seat in
congress, and might have been a successful candidate,
had he submitted to the canvass in his favour for that
delegation. But he has been actually in the capacity of
a judge, and sat upon a bench. It is not long since,
that the people of this country would have made him a
major general, but for his own modesty that declined it,
which I could wish others had done, who had, perhaps,
less brain to be shot away by a cannon ball. It is
alleged
that he was wrought upon by his fears in declining
the commission, as it might subject him to greater
danger
,
with his uniform and his epaulets in an
engagement
Riflemen, or what the Europeans denominate
sharp shooters, might take him off when he came to
reconnoitre
,
or was discovered in the advance of an
engagement
But what is it, whether fear or modesty led
him to decline the honour, so it is that he was thought
worthy of the command, if the governor had thought
proper to give him the commission, or he could have
reconciled
it to himself to have accepted of it. I mention
these things, not as approving the making bog-trotters
generals, or advancing them merely because a chance
circumstance has given them the eclat of fortune. For
in war fortune avails much. Nor do I undervalue
natural
talents; for I can suppose a man drawing a plough,
with his gears on, and to have his traces cut, and turned
loose in a command, and far surpassing in the talents of
a commander, another who has had all the science and all
the experience that military schools and campaigns can
give. But a presumption of abilities cannot but arise
from education, and experience. There is something
like certainty in the one, there is but accident in the
other. But dropping this, I return to your
misdemeanor
;
not what the law calls a misdemeanor; for that is a
crime,
and this at least borders on a crime; but
unquestionably as respects the community, you have
been guilty of a great indecorum. I admit, you would
not think it an offence, or at least a great offence,
in your land of steady habits, where the second table of
the law has been almost struck out of the decalogue,
and the ceremonies of religion, and observances of these,
have taken place of justice to man. It would be of less
consequence, if you cheated a little in the way of your
trumpery that you vend, or exchange through the
country
.
But to purloin a valuable member of society, even
if you did not mean eventually to detain him, is a
transgression
not easily reconcilable to a pure conscience and
a good mind. But it is a maxim of the law, as well as
of the gospel, or rather the law has derived it from the
gospel, talk with thine adversary whilst thou art in the
way with him. This is the foundation of our
imparlances
in the law, or the time given to speak with; so
that as there is a tavern, or what is called an ordinary
there, not far off, I would recommend it to you, young
men, to take the bog-trotter aside, and, after eating and
drinking together, you might perhaps come to terms.
Agreeable to the hint given, the young men took the
bog-trotter away to the public house, in his panther's
habit as he was, and the presumption is, that a
compromise
did take place; for, in the language of law writs,
there was no more clamour heard on that head for defect
of justice.
The like finesse, but in a different way, though with the
same view of making money out of the phrenzy of the
country, was practised; a couple of speculating men, the
one in the dress of a man, the other in the costume of a
beast. For it had been agreed that the one should
personate
a publican, or inn-keeper, the other, who was the
smaller man, should pass for the bar-keeper; and, to
disguise
the human form, he was invested with the skin of a
wild cat. The tail had remained appended to it, and as
the physiognomy of a cat somewhat approaches to that of
a man, the skin drawn over the features, with the same
orifice for mouth and eyes, unless to a very nice
examination
,
there was no difference. The multitude of those
that came to see the hotel, would not admit of the
possibility
of a metamorphose, but insisted that the
barkeeper
was a real cat of the mountain. The faculty of
speech, which it evidently had, made it the more
interesting
.
For, as to having speech, there was no doubt;
it spoke several languages, German and low Dutch,
French and English. But whether it was a real beast or
not, was the question. If it was a beast, and could speak,
all admitted that the problem was solved, and it no longer
remained an hypothesis, that there were beasts who spoke
naturally, or that they could be brought to speak. There
were amongst the incredulous, doubtless, some men of
understanding and sagacity, and who reasoned from the
laws of nature, and the analogy of the parts, there being
no organs of speech to a brute creature; but abstract
reasoning was borne down, by the testimony of the fact,
the majority affirming, and actually believing, that it was
a cat, and nevertheless was endued with the faculty of
articulate speech. The inn-keeper, who affected to be
a person of veracity, averred that he had known him
when he was first brought from the mountains, an
active
skipping cat, without the smallest cultivation, or
capacity of articulating a syllable, save in its own
mother
tongue, and a kind of mew that cats have; but that
in the course of three years that he had had him as a
waiter in France, Holland, Germany, and England, he
had acquired sufficient of the languages of those
countries
to converse, or at least to understand sounds, and
answer calls in German, French, &c.
There was not a word of truth in all this, I mean in
the bar-keeper having been a cat, any more than a
turkey-buzzard
,
but the whole a fiction of the man who
passed for land-lord, acquiesced in, and sanctioned by
him who passed for bar-keeper, and this to their mutual
interest, and by their joint contrivance. And,
nevertheless
,
it was as firmly believed for a considerable length
of time as Redheiffer's perpetual motion, a thing not less
against the laws of nature, than even the speech of beasts.
As in the case of Redheiffer, so also here, the press was,
in some instances, on the side of the credulous, and there
was at least one editor who
menaced all the invectives of
his journal against any one who should presume to
express
a doubt of the fact.
All that existed short of
Redheiffer's
case,
was the appointment of a committee by the
legislature, to ascertain and make report. Even at this
day, when the bubble has burst there are those who will
excuse their belief, by saying that if the little bar-keeper
was not a cat, he was at least as nimble as a cat. So that
if they cannot get him to be what they had taken him to
be, they will have him something that resembles it.
When the Governor came to interrogate Teague as to
the treatment he had received in the tin cart, and the
manner
in which he had been apprehended, and put in it.
He gave the following account.
By de holy faders, said he, I was tired trotting about
de country, and just tought dat I would turn in, and slape
a wink in a hay loft, when dese spalpeens, de one wid a
shilelah, and de oder wid a whip, told me I was a wild
baste dat could spake. I said, de devil a bit o' me was a
wild baste more dan deir honours, but an honest
Irishman
from de county Drogheda. Wid dat one knocked
me down, and de oder gave me a cut wid de whip, and
marched me into dat cart yonder, and kept me dere two
days, and made me spake to de paple, as if I was de
panther
dat had been skinned, but not to tell dat I was de
bog-trotter; treatning to shoot me dead if I should own
dat I was de governor's sharvant. I had de devil's own
time, bad luck to dem, wid deir raw mate dey trew into
my cage, save once or twice a dumplin, to shew de
paple
dat I would ate like a Christian baste; which I had
learned, at de same time dat I was taught to spake wid
my tongue, as dey said. I could spake wid de tear in
my eye, but de devil a word I dared to say; or to tell fat
I was, more dan dif I had a potatoe in my mouth. De big
fellow o' de two would order me out of de cage, to shew
de paple dat I could stand on my hind feet, and dance
like a human crature, as well as spake something. But
we made all up wid a good treat, as de old gentleman,
de chief justice, his honour recommended; and if dat
had not been in de way, I would have broke deir heads
for dem, widout more compassion dan I would a snake
or a tarrapin.
The governor recommended him to be cautious of
going into barns or hay lofts, or rambling far, as this was
a new country, and the times were troublesome. It
could not be anticipated, what it might be put into the
peoples' heads to do with him, or with any one else,
or what projectors, or itinerant speculators might set on
foot next. It had been by great good fortune that he
had been discovered, and rescued from these Yankies
before they had got him off to their own country, whence
they might have taken him to England, and shewn him
to
old John Bull.
CHAPTER XVI.
A VOTE in a community in proportion to the
stake,
would seem at first sight reasonable. But what is the
stake? The foot of earth that one holds merely? Can
soil be valued by the foot, without regard to quality, and
situation? Is the improvement made upon it to pass for
nothing? Quantity, and quality of soil cannot be the
measure. Labour expended may be more than quantity,
or quality.
The adscripti glebis, or attachment to the soil, may
give some security against external enemies; but what
security for internal peace, and equal liberty? On the
contrary, he that has much will covet more, until an
aristocracy is established; and aristocracy leads to
monarchy
,
and tyranny. Put it on the footing of desert
Does the accumulation of riches imply virtuous action?
Must he be considered to be possessed of a
great mind
who
has been fortunate? Is it not oftener evidence of a
low
mind
to have acquired riches? I say
oftener,
because I
admit that it is not a
general rule.
Has the dictum of
philosophers passed for truth,
that there is nothing great
to despise which is great;
and shall wealth in a
commonwealth
be accounted great, and entitling to honour
and immunities? But the presumption is, that a man
regardless of his own means will not be likely to adopt
wise measures in affairs of the republic. I will admit
that a presumption lies against him who has no
property
,
that he might have had it, if he had been industrious,
or prudent. But the moralist truly says that riches are
not to men of understanding. That is not always so.
I lay it down in general, that a moderate degree of wealth
is
to men of understanding.
But there are exceptions
that defy chance and time. A
special providence,
or
chance, if you would chuse to have it so, has something
to do in the affairs of men. He that is born to the
plack will never win to the babee, is a proverb in the
old Saxon language. But I hold it that in general the
fact is that the hand of the diligent maketh rich. And
a man that is faithful in his own affairs, affords a
reasonable
presumption, that he will be faithful in the affairs
of the public. But selfishness, and disregard of the
public is a symptom of a groveling mind. And there
are heroic souls, that seem born not for themselves
but for the public. And there is a Latin maxim, non
nobis metipsis, nascimur; we are not born for
ourselves
alone.
There was a poor man, and yet that poor man saved
the city. You cannot exclude the unestated man
without
at the same time excluding the wise and the
virtuous
that are without estates. There can be no good
enjoyed
without an alloy of evil. Liberty of the tongue,
liberty of the press, or any other species of liberty and
equality will have its drawbacks. It is doubtless a great
evil that Tag-rag and Bob-tail, and who are so by their own
indolence, should come to the polls with an equal voice,
in the constitution of the government, with those who
have a greater stake in matters of
property;
but it
cannot
be avoided without losing the principle that
money is
not virtue.
If you carry it out that property must be
represented according to property, the voter must have
votes in proportion as he is wealthy; and wealth in soil
only cannot be regarded. The establishment of
manufactures
,
the encouragement of commerce, would
oppose
this. If he that is without property of any kind can
have no vote, he that has much must have many; and
this brings it to an inequality of votes, which require a
continual census to regulate the number. If paying tax
is a criterion, he that pays more tax, ought to have more
votes. I see nothing simple, and like truth in the
matter
,
and approaching the practicable, but that the poll
should poll; and every one that brings a snout of full age,
to the election ground, should have a vote. Indigence
is in its nature dependent; and will rally round
candidates
of some standing in society from their degree of
independence; and the votes being thus amalgamated,
will balance parties in a commonwealth. A
government
of liberty is the most delicate of all structures, and
there is no preserving it, if the love of money is
encouraged
,
and made the sole evidence of patriotism. If a
difference in suffrage could be made, I would make it
in favour of those who have
invented useful arts, and
made discoveries in mechanics;
or who have in fact in
some way
benefited society.
There would seem nothing
unreasonable in the indulging him with privileges who
had brought up a large family of children; or
introduced
a new breed of cattle; or grown a better sort of
grass. But a usurer, or one enjoying rents from the
lands that his ancestor has left him, cannot be said to
deserve
well of his country; or at least not so much. The
New-England man that comes with his machine, for
which he has obtained a patent, is of peculiar
respectability
compared with these. I say New-England,
because
that part of the United States has been most
fruitful
in inventions, from Phips, of Massachusetts, who
invented
the diving bell, down to the present time.
Whether
it is that poverty has produced the necessity of
recurring
to their wits, having a greater stock of
population
,
and the means of livelihood being less within their
reachIngenii largitor venter; or whether it is in the
soil, or the air, and water of the climate; for natural, as
well as moral causes may produce this difference in the
capacities of men.
I can see no reason in giving a field a vote, much less
a piece of woodland; nor one to the owner of beasts
in proportion to his stock; unless those beasts could
speak and give a viva voce vote.
It has seemed to me that the ancients, and some of
the moderns, have carried the fiction beyond all
probability
,
of beasts speaking; because a dialogue of this
kind exists but in books of fables. It is much more
within bounds, to put at least for one of the speakers,
a person that can speak. This we have done, and have
not put a single syllable into the mouth of a beast at all.
It is the man that we make speak; the beast only listens.
Yet it is ten to one but some will call out against the
going even so far, as to represent beasts listening;
because
it is to music only, that they have heretofore been
made to listen, and not to the dry precepts of didactic
art, or moral reason. But certainly the introducing men
speaking, and beasts listening, is not so extravagant, as
beasts speaking, and men listening. The instances of
beasts actually speaking are so few; in fact there is not
a single instance within my knowledge, so that I thought
it the more prudent part, in order to avoid the having
the truth of my history called in question, to confine
them to listening altogether. What these beasts would
have said, had they spoken, every man may imagine
Vol. IV. G
for himself. In this case there is the less danger of
giving offence, every one having it in his power, to
mould his sentiments, a son gre, or according to his
own mind.
But had I been so inclined, how could I have made them
speak? For just as they were going to open a mouth, or
at least as the occasion had arrived when it would have
been proper to have done it, the dogs were set upon
them, or the dogs did set upon them. For this would
appear to be the safer expression, as the bar assert that
they as a profession, whatever some individuals might
have done, had nothing to do with it.
It has been stated that the proper articulately
speaking
beasts have not been pitched upon. It is sufficient
to answer to this, that we had not the chusing them;
or, if we had, can it be said that all beasts are not
equally
made to speak; that is, are represented equally
capable
of speaking in the history of Reynard the fox?
Among the Jews, the ass seems to have been the
principal
speaker; and though an ass at the bar, or on the
bench either, would be no new thing; yet vulgar opinion
is against it; and if an ass had been introduced, the force
of prejudice is such that any disappointment that might
have occurred, would have been attributed to the choice
made. Amongst the Romans, the feathered creation
seem to have been the most loquacious, as they are to this
day, in their own way.
Annosa ab ilice cornix.
But a prejudice also exists in modern times against fowls
articulating: they are said to
chatter;
as for instance
the magpie.
Ornithologists are not so attentive as they ought to be
to the language of birds. The plumage seems to be
most their object in delineation; and it must be
acknowledged
,
that it is in the article of fine feathers, like some
fine ladies that I have known, that they are most
distinguished
;
red, green, blue, vermilion, and all the colours
of the rain-bow. It is in this point of view that I take
the liberty of recommending the Ornithology of Wilson,
lately published in Philadelphia,
*
*
It must appear that this had been written years ago.
with fine drawings of
our American birds: and which every man that can
afford
it, ought to encourage by his subscription. Not
that he makes them say any thing, ore humano; but he
gives a clear and full note of their notes, under the
figure
of each bird; this though perhaps not so useful, is
at least as amusing, as a dissertation shewing to which
of the articulations of the human species, they approach
nearest in their respective sounds: Arabic, Samaritan,
Shawanese, or Creek. The language of beasts and birds
has been much studied by the Orientalists; but none of
them have given us a vocabulary, much less a
dictionary
,
of any of those multitudinous dialects which exist
amongst them. And yet in their tales of the geni, and
other compilations, we have abundance of the
conversation
of the inhabitants of the air; which proves that the
people of the east must be a good deal in the habit of
hearing birds converse. The story of Mahomet's
pigeons
,
I take to be a fiction of the monkish writers; but
we have in the scripture, if it is not a figure, and a
strong way of expressing what is meant, Curse not
the thing; no, not in thy thought, and curse not the rich
in thy bed-chambers, for a
bird
of the air shall carry the
voice; and that which hath
wings,
shall tell the matter.
Hence the language of mothers to their children, when
they mean to say that they have got the information
from a source they do not mean to explain, a little bird
told me of it.
It will be said that in all this ribaldry of beasts and
birds speaking, I have it in view to burlesque lawyers:
not at all; it is to burlesque their defects; and under
the guise of allegory to slur a truth; for an able
counsellor
,
an advocate of a good head, and heart, of which I
know many, are with me amongst the first of
characters
.
I have no such vulgar prejudice against lawyers,
as some people have; there are good and bad of them
as of other professions. And this I will say, that of all
professions, it cannot be but that the study and practice
of the law, leads most to discern the value of honesty; for
the study consists in tracing the rules of justice, and the
practice in the application of them. It is the man that
is no lawyer, but calls himself so, that is the knave.
The nature of law is liberal; and gives understanding;
and wherever there is sound sense, there will be
honesty
.
But I have such a contempt of chattering in speech,
and blustering, and bullying in manners; and of
quibbling
,
and catching in practice where it occurs, that I
feel no compunction in designating it under the masque
of irrational noises, or quadrupedal affections.
If any thinks the cap will fit him, let him put it on.
In the mean time, I will put on my considering cap,
and see what it is that I have to say in the next
chapter
.
CHAPTER XVII.
IT is abundantly evident from the history of the
human mind, that the more extravagant any opinion is,
it is the more likely to prevail in some times and places.
This will have been found to be the fact in many theories
of philosophy, or systems of religion. Were there two
such presented to me upon any subject which comes
within the province of imagination; the one rational and
moderate, the other absurd; and I was to take which I
chose with a view to the speediest propagation, and the
greatest number of adherents, I would take the absurd;
for what merit is there in admitting what nobody,
without
an effort, could dispute; and independent of this,
there is a secret power in the unknown, and incredible,
to arrest the fancy, and subdue the judgment. The
outrageous
,
when first presented, shocks, and then domineers
over the understanding. I would just as soon undertake
to persuade the bulk of mankind, that they saw a bull
in the firmament, as that two and two make four. At
all events, when I had once got such a thing into their
heads, as a buffalo grazing on a cloud, I would defy years
to get it out again.
Hence it is not to be wondered at, if the idea of the
improvable
nature of beasts having got into the hands of
the people, all reasoning with them was at an end. The
visionary man had made proselytes to such an extent,
that the people insisted on an experiment, by raising
some of the brute creatures at least to executive offices.
The clerkship of one of the courts being vacant, great
interest was made by the owner of a monkey, to have
him appointed. The governor was harrassed by the
application
,
which was at the same time so respectably
supported
that he could not possibly avoid the nomination.
Not that even yet he had the smallest confidence in his
capacity of discharging the duty; but that he might save
himself from the importunity of the friends of the
experiment
.
Accordingly, the monkey was appointed, and
his commission made out in form. He had
remonstrated
G 2
against the solicitation, representing his persuasion
of the incompetency of the animal; but it was so firmly
impressed upon the public mind, that the thing deserved
a trial, that he was obliged to yield. For they insisted that
whatever might be the incapacity of the animal, the
commission
would supply the defect. Indeed they argued
very plausibly upon this; and it seemed not to be
without
foundation that they urged, that it was every day
before
their eyes, that persons were appointed to office who
were not qualified; and what was more, never could
become
qualified; and yet the world did not stand still;
nor did even the order of society, and the affairs of men
seem deranged. It is incredible what a little matter will
go to support one in the discharge of an office. Hence
it is not so absurd what the buffoon said, let the king
give me a commission, and I will see who will say I am
not fit for it. However, in the present instance, it was
carrying the jest, or as it ought to be said, the
experiment
too far. The monkey did not make out even to
save appearances for a short time; whether owing to the
mismanagement of those who had the command of him,
or to his own incurable restlessness, and locomotive
faculty
.
For being brought in, and placed upon the table,
with the implements of writing before him, and the
docket to make entries; the first thing that struck him,
was the basket of a fruiterer at some distance; and it
was not a second of time before he had leaped upon it,
and had a pippin in his paw. Being brought back, and
put to his desk again, and desired to make a minute, he
deliberately got up and made water on the table, the
inkstand
being in the way. This was encouraging to the
sanguine; for it was thought he wished to have the
ink made thinner, as being about to write. But no
appearance
of this, when the next bound was upon the
bench, and the judge's wig hauled off his head, and
pulled
under the table. This was ruled a contempt of court,
and pug was ordered into custody. It was with some
difficulty that this was accomplished; the constable and
sheriff exerting themselves to take him, but his leaps
were so nimble, that it was not until after a considerable
time, with the assistance of the whole bar, and the
suitors
of the court, that they could lay their hands upon
him. In fact, it was not until some of them had laid
their sticks upon him, and knocked him down, that they
were able to entangle him in such a manner as to
overcome
his cantrips, and get him in a bag, as you would a
cat, in order to convey him to prison.
Who could have thought that such a practical
experiment
would not have reduced the falsity of the
hypothesis
of the improvability of beasts to the extent
alleged
by some, to an evident demonstration. And yet so
ingenious is the pride of the mind, to support the error
which it has once patronized, that some did not even yet
submit to reason and common sense. They averred, a
want of candour in the court and bar to have the
experiment
fairly made, alleging the craft of the profession;
that pug could not have had fair play in the trial; that he
must have been pinched in the tail, or in some other way,
rendered unmanageable. For, that of himself, he never
could have shown such an unwillingness to discharge
the duties of the office; more especially, as by shewing
him apples and nuts at a distance, it was a hint to him,
what he might expect in the way of fees, provided that
his capacity, and his diligence, was found to equal the
hopes his friends had entertained of him.
But, whether the experiment in making a monkey a
prothonotary, was baffled by the utter incapacity of the
animal himself, or by the intrigue of the profession, and
the court frowning on it, the practicability of making
more out of the brute creation, than had ever yet been
done, was not wholly given up. It was determined to
make an experiment of what might be done, in bringing
forward some of them into the profession itself; and
with a view to this, choice was made of the more noisy
of the dumb creatures, a dog For though this beast
comes under the denomination of dumb, yet it is no
uncommon
thing to compare a lawyer to him, or him to a
lawyer; and though we say a dumb dog, yet I have heard
a lawyer called an impudent dog; and there are many
who are said to bark, rather than to argue a cause like a
rational creature.
The court were a good deal opposed to the admitting
a hound to the bar. But the people, out of doors, and
those of the circumstantibus, or bystanders, would insist
upon it. The court said, they would not be understood
to entertain a doubt of the capacity, in such advocates,
at least so far as respected the making
motions;
but they
were apprehensive of disorderly behaviour; not so much
as to
side bar
conversation, and sitting on their
backsides
,
and looking up to bark, as to their movements to
and fro, and leaping upon the bench; in which case it
would not be much less difficult to keep them to their
places, than it had been in the case of the monkey, whom
they had all seen could not be kept to order. As to the
keeping to the point in their discourses, of that there was
not so much matter; for it was not always easy to see
what was the point that was made, and to which it
became
necessary to stick. Was there no danger, that
instead
of confining themselves to a wrangle, they would
actually wage war, and interchange bites in the course
of their altercations? Wager of battle did not exist as
a mode of trial; and therefore fighting like dogs was not
known in judicial proceedings; though the quarrels of
counsel did sometimes approach a little towards it.
On all these considerations, the court would have been
willing to have confined the construction of the
constitutution
,
that a man shall be heard by himself or his
counsel, to the being heard by himself, or some
animal
of his own species. Nor was there any great reason to
believe, that, though in many instances we see the more
incompetent of a bar at the head of the business; yet
in general, people will find out those who can serve
them best; and it was not probable, that if the real,
natural
,
and actual tykes were admitted to plead, any one
would be so weak as to employ them in a cause; it is
true, they had known many an ignorant impudent puppy
at the bar; and some good natured of the dog tribe, so
called by way of figure and resemblance, even make
fortunes
.
But this was by way of figure; and they had
never
yet known one so perfect a beast, as to want the shape
of a man, to make his way, or even to attempt practice.
And if no suitor did employ such a one, when admitted,
where would be his business; unless in the case of a
pauper unable to defend himself, where the court might
appoint counsel; which would not be decorous in them
to do, even in the case of a misdemeanor, unless they
had greater reason to expect something like a defence
for the unfortunate accused, than from such
unexpereinced
persons. It is true, that such appointment by the
court, as in the case of a horse-thief, that every body
believed guilty, even before he was tried, might pass
without censure; but if an honest pauper was convicted,
being falsely accused, and this owing to the blunder of
an advocate appointed by the court, the reflection would
fall upon them; for these reasons they would be shy in
taking such nomination upon them; and would be
disposed
to leave the dog, whether what is called a feiste,
or a mastiff, to his own exertions to get himself
employed
as he could; and if it came to them to assign counsel
at any time, they would select, if the younger, yet at
least some of the bar more likely to do justice.
It was to no purpose that these matters were urged.
For however weighty the reasons, they were of no avail
against the current of public opinion; whether it was
that there was some, as there was reason to suspect,
wished the lawyers burlesqued, and the profession made
a subject of ridicule; or that the greater part were really
credulous, which is more probable, to the representation
of the philosopher.
Hence it was, that on the day appointed for the
experiment
,
a great number attending, some of the most
respectable
of the community; two of the canine species
were brought in, and placed opposite each other, as
adversaries
in a cause. They were said to be dogs of a
good bark, and had been pitted against each other several
times before the bringing them to court, and had worried
each other pretty comfortably, on more occasions than
one. Hence there could be no doubt, but that they would
take different sides of the question, and snarl, and grin,
and growl abundantly; the only difficulty would be the
keeping them apart, until the testimony in a cause had
been introduced, and they were directed by the court to
proceed.
This difficulty, as was foreseen, did actually occur;
for no sooner were the beagles uncoupled, than they
actually
flew at each other, and had one another by the
throat. It was in vain that the judge called out order,
gentlemen order; I shall be under the necessity of
committing
you for this irregularity of proceeding; your
behaviour is unbecoming the profession. The dogs
continued
their contest, till one knocked under, and howled
most piteously. The humanity of the spectators, some
of whom were suitors, and some not, at length
interposed
,
and wished them to be separated, but not an
individual
of the bar gave themselves the least concern on the
occasion; but on the contrary, seemed diverted with it as
a farce, and laughed immoderately; which gave great
offence to the people, and much reason to suspect, as in
the case of the monkey, there had not been fair play in
the experiment. Who could tell what spurs, or sharp
weapons there might have been under the table to prick and
goad these simple and unsuspecting creatures to battle? If
Jowler and Cesar had actually succeeded in maintaining a
standing at the bar, it might materially have affected the
employing human bull-dogs, to manage a controversy.
And could it be supposed, that having this interest at
stake, the profession would have made no exertion,
secret
or reserved, to counteract the introduction of
quadrupeds
Upon these grounds, the persuasion of the
capacity
of beasts to advocate the most difficult question of
law, or fact, was strengthened, rather than reduced, by
the experiment made; or if some did query whether
all at once, they might be competent to give the best
advice
,
as chamber counsel in a matter of difficulty
respecting
the legal tenure of estates; yet no one hesitated to
pronounce his conviction that they were capable of being
good advocates, in a criminal case of assault and battery
at least; or where noise and racket went a great way to
constitute a good pleader.
The public opinion out of doors, was formed a good
deal upon the noise they had heard. It was thought to
resemble that of lawyers in their sparring. If some
surmise
did get out, that in nothing but yelping did they
resemble, it was attributed to their not being of the
genuine
breed, that was fit for the bar; that experiment
ought to be made from the Norwegian lap dog, to the
little Indian dog of the South sea, until they came to one
that had the right genuine snarl. But all idea of
incapacity
was hooted at by others, who had taken up a more
favourable impression, having been in the way of
hearing
that one of them made a speech of an hour in length;
and that, had he not been stopped by the court, he would
have spoken two hours. What did he say? said a man
somewhat incredulous. I never can tell very well, said
the other, what the lawyers say. It is all the same sort
of jargon to me, consisting of law terms; but this I
know, if I had a cause to try, I would leave it as soon to
the dog that I heard bark, as to most lawyers that I have
seen plead at a bar. Owing to these averments, and
promulgation
of rumours, all tending to make dog pleading
popular, it was not longer than the next week, that there
were several people who had come into town, enquiring
where the dog lawyers had their offices. The real lawyers
were so enraged that they knocked them on the head,
though of the profession; but clandestinely; for they
were not without apprehension of the resentment of the
suitors, if the dogacide should come to light. The law
might take hold of them also, if they could be
considered
as coming under the description of reasonable
creatures
in the peace of the commonwealth.
But there was no need of this precaution, and secrecy;
for the whole circumstance relating to the dogs, and
their appearance in court, or the manner in which they
acquitted themselves in the trial of a cause, was lost
and forgotton in the introduction of a wolf and fox the
third day of the court; the wolf muzzled, having been
taken in a trap. But to avoid all insinuation, or popular
obloquy, of not giving them a fair chance, by
admonishing
them before they began, of the duty of counsel, the
rules of the court were read to them, and it was stated
what abuses in the conduct of attornies, had been
observed
,
and which it behooved them to avoid; such as
scratching
their noses, puffing their breath, turning and
twisting
in their seats, or sitting on their arses, and talking to
the bench; holding side-bar conversations, and looking
and yelping to the juries, or grinning when they thought
they had said a great thing smart. Growling and
grumbling
when the point was given against them, they ought
not to take it for granted, that they were the only
persons
who had a knowledge of the law or practice; and
that their opinion of a law case, or the application, was
not infallible.
Gentlemen, said the chief justice, you are entering on
a profession that, independent of legal knowledge, for
that, we take it for granted, you have a competent share
of, requires in a practitioner the utmost delicacy of
behaviour
,
both to the bar and to the bench, as the surest
means of your success. For it is a mistake to suppose,
that impudence is the principal qualification here. It
may go some length in the opinion of bystanders, to give
them the impression of boldness; but it goes no length
with the court. It is, on the contrary, a great drawback.
Diligent preparation in your offices, and modest
demeanour
at the bar, is the most likely way to secure
confidence
and to conciliate attention, and to have what is
called the ear of the court. For when a person merely
barks, the moment he begins, nothing but a bark being
expected, the judge lets his mind go to pasture, if I may
be allowed a figure, that is, indulges himself in absence
of mind, until the harangue wears near a close. There
is what is called having the ear of the court: for should
you howl ever so loud, or bark, unless there is a previous
respect founded in the expectation of what you are about
to say, there will be little attention in reality, whatever
there may seem to be.
Opinion had been expressed in the mean time, on the
talents of the respective advocates, according as any one
had augured favourably, or the reverse of one or the
other. It was expected the fox would shew the most
address in the management of a cause. But that the
wolf would be most likely to carry his point by
browbeating
his adversary, and the court.
Gentlemen, said the court, fox and wolf, or wolf and
fox, whichever of you it is that begins first, and that will
depend upon your being for the plantiff or defendant
you will please to proceed.
The wolf being unmuzzled, and the fox let slip, the
one ran under the bench, and the other leaped out at the
window: the wolf it was that leaped out of the window,
the dogs after him, which gave occasion to leave this
matter of professional capacity still undetermined; the
pursuit of the dogs giving occasion to the old surmise
of the lawyers having set them upon them to get rid of
a formidable rival. In the hurry scurry, there was little
said about the fox, and he was supposed to have made
his escape.
The reprimand that the chief justice gave to the
squirrels
and the pigs for their behaviour in court, was
perhaps
the most pointed of that given to any of the beasts;
to the squirrels for
cracking nuts,
and chirping like
cockroaches
,
while the charge was delivering, and
conversing
in corners with each other. To the pigs, for
munching
apples; because it was not only a trespass against
decorum, but an interruption to the argument of counsel,
which could not be so well heard. Mouthing on the
stage is spoken of as far from being agreeable. But
such mouthing produces but a slight tumefaction of the
oral orifice, and gives a rounding to the voice,
Ore rotundo.
But the mouthing the pippin, or the peach, distends the
jaws occasionally to an immeasurable width; and if one
half the hemisphere is attempted to be embraced like a
snake swallowing a hare, the eyes have an appearance of
starting from their sockets, which communicates pain to
the beholder, because it impresses the idea that the actor
is in pain.
Vol. IV. H
CHAPTER XVIII.
WHEN I speak of the Visionary Philosopher, I do
not mean him that had
Read Alexander Ross over;
but who had seen the great Stewart, who delivered
lectures
in this country, on the perfectibility of man, and
this student, or disciple, had been disposed to carry the
matter farther, and discuss the perfectibility of beasts.
It is impracticable, said the Governor. Instinct has
but narrow limits; and is not improvable, as is human
reason. However sagacious a fox may be, in eluding
hounds, and catching poultry, the distinction is immense
in the nature of the intellect. I hope you would not
think of extending the right of suffrage to these. There
is no incorporating wild-cats and jack-daws in the
community
.
We have enough to do with men that have the
shapes of Christians, let alone, opossums, and jackalls,
and bears of the forest that have no reflection; or if they
could reflect, would their keepers permit that intercourse
with peaceable inhabitants, as to render the interchange
of civilities safe and convenient. In point of capacity they
would be deficient, and unqualified even for the
ministerial
offices of government. But as to those duties, or
professions which require some discrimination of meum,
and tuum, they ever remain totally incompetent.
What? said the Philosopher, persisting in his theory;
have you not heard it said, that judge this, or judge that,
is an ass, that another is a horse, and of even a juris
consult
,
or barrister, for instance is a panther; a bear;
especially
when he is hard upon a witness in his cross
examination
?
Might it not be practicable to bring a brute beast
to be even capable of filling an office of trust or honour?
I grant that a judge, figuratively, said the Governor,
may be a horse, or a buffalo, or an ass; or that a
counsellor
may somewhat resemble the ferocity of a tyger at
the bar. But that these animals, stript of all figure, and
colouring of speech, should in reality, and in propria
person, be put upon the bench, or licensed to plead,
would be more than I am yet prepared to think
advisable
.
You are not aware of the hypothesis of Darwin, said
the Philosopher, that man may have been originally a
cray-fish, or a flying-squirrel?
I am not, said the Governor. And though I do not
know that the Lord spoke all things to Moses that he is
said to have spoken; for there may have been some
mistakes
in the translations from the Hebrew, as in other
versions; yet there seems to me more probability in the
cosmongony, of that Hebrew writer, than in the reveries
of Darwin in his Temple of Nature, or his Zoonomia.
And even supposing the brutal to be capable of
amelioration
from one nature to another, until it reaches the
human, it would seem to me, that its rights should keep
pace only with the improvement of its forms; and that
we should wait until the elephant comes to sit upon his
one end, and cease to go upon all fours, before we think
of introducing even the noblest of animals, in point of
intellect, into a participation of civil institutions. The
swinish multitude, are spoken of as having a right to
vote; but that also is figurative, and it is not meant that
a pig can be actually admitted at the hustings to give in
a ticket; much less, that a wolf, just taken in a trap,
should be made a justice of the peace, or an alderman.
What, said the Philosopher; has there not been a
time when the beasts spoke?
Pecudesqu
locut,
Annosa ab illice cornix,
said the Latin schoolmaster, who had just joined the
conversation
.
It is fabulous, said the Governor. I have seen what
is called the history of Reynard the Fox; and what beasts
were when under the monarchy, where the lyon was
king; and I think a good book might be written, called
the
republic of beasts,
pourtraying the cabals of men,
and their contentions in a free government. But to
constitute
a republic in reality, of the four-footed creation,
would be carrying matters a step farther than has ever
yet been attempted In that case, I acknowledge we
would have no occasion for the common law; nor
tribunals
,
or forms of administering justice; jury trial might
be abolished; for scratching and scrambling would be
the way of every one.
Blackstone has a chapter, said the blind Lawyer, on
the redress of private wrongs, by the mere act of the
parties.
That would make shorter work than even an
arbitration
,
said a bystander.
But, said the Governor, to speak seriously, though it
may give a wise man indignation to see incapacity in
office, which will always be the case in any government,
and perhaps not more in a republic than in any other;
nay I incline to think less so, which it behooves me
to say, who am honoured with one, under that kind of
constitution, yet I am opposed to the extreme of
universal
suffrage, to all the denizens of the forest, as some
are pleased to stile them, and which phrase may have
misled this philosopher to think them capable of being
denizen amongst men. But if you think the experiment
worth making, let a number be collected, and go into
the measure with caution, and deliberation. You will
see what a conflict will take place, and what a warring
there will soon be.
Mugitusque boum,
Exaudire leones
said the Latin schoolmaster.
Plase your honours, said Teague O'Regan, who was
listening, a shape will be de safest baste to halter first,
and try in de plough o' de commonwealth. If de pretty
baste can say ba, in de congress o' de nation, dey cannot
say dat it is de ass dat spakes.
There may be a prettier, but there cannot be a greater
beast than yourself, Teague O'Regan, said some one in
the crowd. And yet we have heard of you getting an
office; what is more, we see you in one, not just on the
bench, as in a neighbouring state, but in an office though
executive. It is said, the Captain, our now Governor,
who opposes the innovation of giving horned cattle a
vote, proposed you for congress, and would have no
objection
to have seen you President of the Union.
That is not the fact, said the Governor; I did object
to it, but I was overruled and induced to let the
experiment
be made; but I never did approve of such
extraordinary
advancement; though were I to be guided by
what I see here, I might not think the presumption so
preposterous. How much better are many of you that
are in office, than Teague O'Regan?
The visionary Philosopher having taken wind, went
on. Why need Cyrano de Berjerac have gone to the
moon, said he, to see monkeys and baboons in the
capacities
of waiting men, if we had been supplied with
domestics
of that description here? And why limit our
experiments
to what may be made of men? The
perfectibility
of human nature, no one can doubt, who has heard
the lectures of Stewart, the pedestrian, who was in this
country some years ago. And why not the
perfectibility
of animals that are not human? I have heard a man
called a calf, a sheep, a hog, a goose, and why not, one
day, hear these called man? And to accomplish this, I
would by admitting them to the elective franchise; at
least all above a certain age, and who have come to the
years of discretion.
Years of discretion! said the Governor. Did you ever
hear of a beast coming to the years of discretion?
Instinct
is not common sense: for common sense is that
degree of understanding, that portion of intellect which
is generally distributed to the human species. Where
the capacity is in any way distinguished, we call it
talent
.
But where that portion of judgment which enables
to judge with reasonable correctness on common
subjects
is given, we call it common sense. A man may
be a scholar, a lawyer, a judge; that is, may have the
reputation
of a scholar, and may have the commission of
a judge, and yet want common sense; by which I mean
sense in common things. For a knowledge of abtract
rules may go some length to make a man of science;
but common sense is judgment in the application of
rules. It is the comparing things; and hence it is that
I do not think this Philosopher, though he may surpass
the magi of Babylon in a knowledge of the stars, can have
common sense, in urging this matter upon a young
people
,
just beginning a new government. What would you
do with a horse upon a bench; to eat hay, and dung on
it: a monkey a prothonotary, to crack nuts, and be
restless
:
an ass to quote British precedents, and to say, my
lord has said this, and my lord has said that; if indeed he
could not say any thing, and not rather bray what he had
to say. We have dunces enough of our breed to be
doing
with a while yet. Why enlarge the sphere of
stupidity
A pretty bar we would have of it in point of
order, if elks, and panthers were admitted to conduct a
cause; motions for new trials in abundance. The
pertinacity
of the unicorn would be unsufferable.
What! said Will Watlin, a constable; have we not
heard a bar called a bear guardian; interrupting one
another
,
H 2
troublesome to the court. I should like to see a
cat, and a racoon wrangle as some of these have done.
The mild and the modest man has no chance. All is
carried by a coup de main, which some interpret a stroke
of the fist. I am not permitted to take up my staff and
apply it to knock them, as I should be warranted in
doing
,
in case of a wild boar, or a rhinocerous, I should
take them across the noddle, as I would have done many
a lawyer, if the rules of court permitted it.
I am for enlarging the sphere of jurisprudence, said
Harum Scarum; and the province of admission to bench
or bar. Is any man afraid of the rivalship of
turkey-buzzards
?
What can check the hospitality of letting
all into the pale of our union? We shall have more to
contend against the savages.
Pro aris et focis, said the Latin schoolmaster.
We shall have more to contend against the savages,
continued Harum Scarum; for increase numbers in a
government, and in that proportion, you render them
active
in support of their privileges. Men that ought to
think, can learn to stand upon their heads, and to run
upon all fours; and why not beasts of the wood learn to
think. I dislike the having all things in a common
course. Nature herself has given us the variety of
seasons
,
and revolutions of the sun and moon, and heavenly
bodies, and why not in the affairs of men; and
especially
in their social institutions as to representation, or
exclusion
.
In the mean time, about a score of young persons, by
climbing up into trees, to hear the debate, or to see
what was going on in the centre of the meeting, were
seen by the spectators, and mistaken for opossums that
were turned into men already, by the bare proposition
of advancing them to naturalization; and though this
error was corrected in a short time by one of them who
had fallen and brought intelligence of the cause of the
ascension, and the mistake of the transformation; yet
it but struck the notion deeper into the heads of the
vulgar
,
of having accession from the quadrupeds at the
next census of free inhabitants; and a man with a strong
voice in particular called out that it should be so. A
bull happening to roar, and a horse to neigh at the same
time, it was called out that it was the voice of the
people
.
In the multitude of a town meeting, or even in a whole
community, it requires but a few persons stationed at
convenient distances, and dispersed in due proportion, to
raise a voice, and to call out in favour of a proposition,
to give it currency, and acceptability. Every one
fearing
to be in the minority, will seize the opportunity of
coming round to the majority. It is the height of
ability
to distinguish the times, says the Duke de
Rochefaucault
and I know no proof of discernment in a
republic
greater than to foresee which way the current is
like to set, and to sail with it; or rather, if you can
influence
at all, to seize occasion by the forelock, and by
disposing a few frogs in a pond to roar, make it be
supposed
that the public opinion is in the direction you chuse
to have it. Shall a man value himself on predicting the
weather, and not the changes of political events? At
least this is
the principle upon which the greater part of
politicians act.
The Governor finding that he was like to be on the
unpopular side of the question, was willing to ease away,
and come under the lee of the Chief Justice, who though
but a blind man could see farther into the nature of the
occasion, than his excellency. His opinion was to let
the thing take its course, and in a short time the public
would be convinced how impracticable it was to extend
liberty, where nature meant that it should have limits.
He thought it best to address himself to their feelings in
point of interest, than to call in question, the
practicability
of the project.
Philosopher, said he, there is no doubt, but there is truth
in what you say; and your proposition might be carried
into effect, with suitable restrictions. But if we should
admit the beasts to the rights of citizenship, we should
have set them free as we done the negroes. The very
right of suffrage would be a manumission; and it would
be unreasonable to extend the privilege to such as are
of fer natur, and exclude tame beasts. Now if
cattle
of oxen, and horses become entitled to equal
privileges
we could not treat them as beasts of burden, or
use them for the draught; much less could we knock
down a pig, or shoot a deer, or take the skin off a bear;
not even ride a horse, but on condition of taking turns,
and letting him sometimes ride us. Who of you would
be hitched in a sled, or stand at the tongue of a wagon
for a whole night champing cut straw, and rye meal, or
bear the whip of the carter in the day time? Who would
be ringed and yoked like a pig, to keep you from
getting
through a fence?
These observations, however ridiculous, had more
effect
in quelling the commotion, than any direct
reasoning
because whatever crosses the thought, and gives a
different direction to the imagination, has been known
to be most effectual in relieving a derangement of the
mind.
CHAPTER XIX.
A CONSTITUTION had been adopted and laws
about to be made, when Teague O`Regan at the head of
a number of his countrymen, began to make a
disturbance
.
Assembling in groups and calling out for more
liberty. It was thought advisable, this Jack Cade, being
his own bog-trotter, that the governor should address
them, and bring them to reason. Mounting a stump
where they were assembled in an old field, he
addressed
them accordingly. Sons of St. Patrick, said he, you
appear to me like draught cattle that are put into the
plough or harnessed in a team and striving to throw off
your tackle. Can you draw without gears? Is not some
confinement necessary to enable you to draw together?
A joint force cannot be applied without some means of
coupleing you. You have as much liberty as you are
capable of enjoying. Teague in particular cannot
endure
more; I say a little less would do him good. [At
this time a noise was heard of some one singing Erin go
bra;] it is a good tune said the governor; and I admire
it more than Britannia rules the waves. For I always
thought that a very impudent chorus. It is sufficient to
excite the indignation of nations, to avow despotism of
the seas, in so barefaced a manner. Not but that I
think we are under French influence. For do we not see
in these states French emigrants teaching French, and
can there be a liking to the French without some
predilection
for the people. We have imitated the manners
of the St. Domingo people because they speak French,
and the dress of our females is improved as some think by
borrowing from them the Grecian stole, with the
cincture
of Venus, which is thought in a warm climate to
give more grace to the shape, than the short jacket and
the hoop of old maidens formerly, by which the form
was cut into two, nearly in the middle, like those we call
insects in the history of animals. But that French
influence
prevails no one can doubt, who will reconsider
the history of these states. There is reason to believe
that the French were at the very bottom of our
revolution
.
I will take the liberty of stopping a little at this point
of the game to express a few thoughts that come into my
mind, though it may be esteemed a digression. I
observe
that some of you come to breakfast with your
beards on in the morning. It is because you are waiting
for the barber: but why not shave yourselves? I would
have you learn this oeconomy even were it at the
expense
of some blood drawn. How can you be
independent
unless you can do this within yourselves, the taking
off your beards. You talk of reforming the government,
and you leave undone the reforming yourselves. I can
excuse curriers who have to clean horses in the
morning
,
but those that have to take care but of themselves, to
be coming to breakfast with their visages untrimmed,
is ungraceful. The first thing to be done
in the
morning
,
is to shave, wash and dress for the day.
The savages greese themselves to save from the damp
earth, and to guard against the rheumatism, as well as
to amuse the flies; and the people of this new
settlement
who are bordering on savages, may be indulged
in a little resemblance; but clerks of an office, or young
lawyers, subject the delicacy of their minds to be called
in question, to be shuffling about in their hippen in the
morning, with their hair in disorder, and their hands,
begrimmed
,
and their faces black.
Nor is it in your persons that you are deficient in
attention
.
How much more comfortable might you make
your habitations by little more judgment in the
construction
of them. The nearer the water you build, you save
toil in carrying from thence, but the ground is low, and
you subject yourselves to colds, whereas the higher
ground, at the expense of a little more labour, would
preserve health; lasiness is visible in all your vestiges.
There are many inches and bits of days which you
lose, because it is like for rain; and a thousand small
matters are neglected, which might be done at these
shreds and patches of employment. All this you
overlook
less considerate than the fowls who make their nests
on the trees around. Yet you are sharp-sighted in the
affairs of government; you abuse governors; you
attack
judges. Were I at the head of a paper I would
turn the battery upon yourselves; I would carry the
war into your own country.
Your error in deracinating grubs; not keeping your
mattocks sharp; wearing leather aprons when you
bestride
saplins, worming your fences when you might
have post and rail, planting corn without cross
ploughing your fields: occasioning so much labour of
the hoe, and giving way to the weeds. I know but
little
of these things, it is true, nor do you much about the
nature of constitutions and the common law. But I
would charge home upon your ignorance of agriculture;
and keep your minds employed in defending yourselves.
Now you are dissatisfied when I call you ignoramouses,
and clodpoles; just out of an anxiety to get you to take
care of your interests.
This harangue had some effect for the present, in
stilling
house, and quieting accusations, though it did not
actually eradicate the cause of the dissatisfaction. For
in the language of the poet.
Convince a man against his will,
And he's of the same opinion still.
CHAPTER XX.
THE preceding painting may be considered as
extravagant
;
and exceeding all probability; the voting of
beasts. But is it a new thing in the history of
government
that the right of suffrage should be made to
depend
upon property. No man shall be entitled to a vote
unless he is worth so much, say some of the
constitutions
.
In this case is it not his property that votes? If
this property consists in cattle, can it be said that his
cattle
do not vote? Ergo, a cow or a horse, in some
communities
have the privilege of a vote in the enacting
laws. If some of them, who belong to hard hearted
masters
,
knew of this privilege, and could exercise it to the
whole extent of their wishes, they would stipulate with
the candidate, for milder treatment in the drudgery in
which they are employed. I have seen many a horse,
that considering matters individually; and apart from
the nature, I have thought more respectable than the
owner; and yet this horse most unmercifully
treated
.
The only universally distinguishing criterion of
humanity, that I know is, the mild treatment of every
creature that has feeling, and is in our power. This
ought to be inculcated as a moral duty. But as to
beasts in propria persona, voting, not just giving in a
ticket for themselves, but standing by, and neighing or
grunting, or grinning. It may be thought too much
yet. But why should it be thought altogether out of
the compass of possibility. After what I have seen and
heard of mankind, I should not wonder at such a thing
taking place. Of what absurdity is not the human mind
capable. Who would think it possible were it not a
fact established by ten thousand testimonies, that human
sacrifice could ever have been thought acceptable to the
divinity? It is easy to trace the origin of the idea, and
the policy of the sacrifice of cattle; because it facilitated
to an order of men who did not labour, the means of
livelihood
.
And unless we suppose that the custom of
human
sacrifice began amongst men that were cannibals,
I am at a loss to account for it. It may be considered as
still more absurd, that a creature, supposed rational, as
man, could be so far irrational as to think that the
punishment
of himself could be acceptable to divinity,
unless
taken in this light, that the present smart might help
weak minds to refrain from the like wrong they have
done; connecting the flagellation with the memory of
it. Hence it may be said, that it is not out of nature,
to ascribe any thing however absurd to the creature
man.
The line of the poet Pope applied to an individual,
may be parodied, and applied to the whole species.
The greatest, basest, meanest of all kind.
If it should be found, as I hope it will, some hundred
years hence, that no innovator in a republican
government
,
has at that time thought of extending suffrage in
this manner, will he be sure that it is not owing to my
ridicule that the thing has not taken place? If a
chapter
like this had been written in the course of the
revolution
from the government of Britain, representing the
body of the people in some state, as reprobating the
common
law, and calling out for its abrogation, would it not
have been thought extravagant, and intended as a
burlusque
upon the republican institutions of the country?
And yet we have seen this actually pressed and not far
from being carried. It amounts to the same thing as
having no law at all. For it is experience that has made
that law; dictated by the wants of man successively
brought to view. And to begin again, we must be in the
situation of those who had no law; and therefore the
proposition
was to be without law; and to have law only as
a legislature, from occasion to occasion, could enact.
the case that first happened, could have no principle,
that could apply to it; that must be provided for the
second
:
and at the end of a thousand years, we might
have such a body of laws, as that which is proposed to
be abolished. I say we might have; but it would be a
rare chance if we should: for it would require the
continuance
of a free government all that time to give it.
How should a man be sensible of this, that had not
traced
the history of that law, and examined the nature of it?
It could not be expected from one who had confounded
its perversions with the law itself. If when the
constitutions
of these states were formed, after much reflection
of the ablest judges, and the people had solemnly, and
deliberately adopted them, it had been stated by any
writer, that in the short period, of perhaps not more than
Vol. IV. I
twenty years, innovators, not born in the country, or born
late, and having no experience of what had past, should
assume the language of what they call reform, to the
extent they have done in some places, would it be
believed
?
Nay, would it not have been rejected as
outraging
all probability? Suppose it had been a part of
the prediction that these innovators should come, the
principal of them, from the country with whom we were
then at war, and these not the most intelligent of them,
and that the body of our people should be wrought upon,
in any degree by their representation, would it have been
thought at all likely to happen? There is no knowing
to what the love of novelty may bring the human mind.
It is a strange compound of the rational and irrational,
and it is only by turns that the rational predominates.
Thinkest thou me a dog, that I can do these things?
said Hazael. Thinkest thou me a beast, may one say to
me, that I could advocate the suffrages of beasts, or of
giving them the elective franchise? Yes: human nature,
I do think you capable of being brought to such
absurdity
,
or to any thing else you please to call it. It is true,
I do not see you at this moment offering up your
children
,
or even enemies, as sacrifices to please a divinity,
which out-herods Herod, in all conceptions, yet I hear
doctrines published, and see them in books, which are
still worse. For their divinities, with the exception of
the case of Jeptha and his daughter, were the false
divinities
of the heathen world; and might be supposed to
delight in the miseries of mortals; though what good
they could get by that, I cannot comprehend. But in
the doctrines which I have in view, a good deity, and
even represented as good, by these blasphemers,
without
knowing it, is holden out as having created
existences
the sum of whose misery may exceed the happiness.
Nay, even the escape from the excess of misery above
that of happiness, may depend upon a charm. For the
idea of felicity in a future state depending upon
subtilties
of creeds, is placing it upon the mere accident of
situation
and the casualty of belief. Yet if one were to
deny to some doctors the truth of what they teach, they
would be disposed to treat the individual as not a good
citizen. It is true, they would only say, they did not
think him a good citizen. But I would say to them, that
I did not think them Christians at all, so far as regarded
opinion, whatever they might be in practice. For the
Christian religion is a system of humanity, and truth; and
the great object of it is to secure morality amongst men.
It has no metaphysics in the nature of it; but is
intelligible
to a child, though catechisms are not.
BOOK II.
CHAPTER I.
Once more to the breach, dear friends,
And close up the wall with English dead.
THAT is not a humane sentiment; for though we
have wrongs from England, yet I wish a war put off as long
as possible.
*
*
This was written before the war.
Though I see that in the nature of things
offences will come, and wo to him by whom they come,
says the scripture. The ultima ratio regum, though the
most effectual, is the hardest logic that can be
introduced
.
But when I used the words,
Once more to the breach,
or when they came into my mind, it was as much as to
say, another whet at the ram. This means the same
thing, and is a well known allusion to the clergyman
taking
his text from that portion of scripture, where the
ram was caught in the brake, for the sacrifice, instead
of Isaac; and having preached figuratively upon it, was
wont to introduce his remarks, with
Another whet at the ram.
This anecdote will be found in a book, entitled, Scotch
Presbyterian Eloquence.
It is a matter of great self-denial in me not to
introduce
more quotations from the Latin classics; but I am
unwilling to incur the imputation of pedantry, which
persons
who do not understand the language, are apt to
bestow
upon those who indulge themselves in this liberty
of quotation from the Roman writers. And yet to
myself
it is extremely pleasing; because I see great
beauty
in the turn of expression in that language; but still
more in the Greek; though I do not quote it, because
there are few printers who are furnished with Greek
types, and can set the words. As to French, I am not
unacquainted with it, but never have come to like the
language; that is, to relish it, and to feel the delicacy of
an expression perfectly, as setting off the thought.
Nevertheless
I am not wholly insensible of the neatness and
perspicuity of the stile of some writers in that language,
in preference to others, as of Voltaire, or Russeau,
compared
with the bulk of those who have gone before
them. But of all languages that I have ever tasted, the
Greek, unquestionably, with me, has the preference;
and yet it cannot be supposed that I understand it as
well as my vernacular; nor within many degrees of it;
and yet I think it a thousand times superior. Bred in
a soft air, and warm climate; whereas the English
would seem to have been frozen in the north, before it
began to be spoken by man; or rather it was first spoken
by frozen men. Certain it is, that cold climates give a
rigidity to the fibre, and harden those muscles by which
the articulation is performed. Pinkerton the greatest
philologist of modern times, at least that I am
acquainted
with, thinks that the Greek is derived from the
German
and that the German is the original Persian: that
in some convulsion of the Persian empire, at an earlier
period
than we have any account of, some portion of that
people
had emigrated, and passing to the north, had made the
circuit of the Caspian, and Euxine seas; and, at length
established themselves in the heart of Europe. I can
more readily conceive the Persian hardening into the
harshness of the German sounds, than of the German
softening into the fluidity, and sweetness of the Greek
accent; but that there is a great affinity between the
German, and the Greek, there is no one who
understands
both languages, but must admit. Both have a
dual number; but independent of this, it is a proof of
the affinity, that a German can easily learn to pronounce
the Greek gutturals; whereas to those of most other
nations, it is difficult. That the Germans used the Greek
alphabet in the time of Julius Csar, appears from his
commentaries; though some have attempted to lessen
the evidence of this, by changing the words, Grecis
literis
,
into Crassis literis utuntur; but clear it is, that a
long time must have elapsed in the amelioration of the
German into Greek; though I do not altogether reject
the idea of these being the same language originally, as
Pinkerton has endeavoured to prove, both by the
authority
of writers, and by an historical deduction of the
I 2
origin of ancient nations. I must acknowledge that
until
I had read his dissertation, I had been inclined to
think that the Germans had been a people distinct from
all others from the creation of the world; for it is
remarkable
that in the time of Julius Csar, before any
mixture of other nations had intervened, the colour of
the eye, and the hair of all, were the same; the blue
eye, and the yellow hair
Crula quis stupuit, Germani lumina, flavam
Csariem
This quotation is from Juvenal, who puts this national
characteristic of feature, upon the same footing as to
being
common with the swelling of the neck in
Switzerland
.
Quis tumidum guttur miratur sub alpibus.
Which swelling, called the goitre, is not confined to the
Alps; but is found at the foot of most high mountains:
at those of Thibet in Tartary, as well as of the
Allegheny
mountains, on the west side: for it is remarkable
that no instance occurs on the east. And in Chili, which
runs an extent of 1300 miles between the Andes and the
Pacific ocean, being, at a medium, but about 350 miles
wide, there is nothing of this swelling; though the
streams are swollen with snow waters; which refutes
the hypothesis of those who resolve this protuberance into
the drinking snow waters. In examining into the
history
of nature, there is nothing that has puzzled me more
than to account for this phenomenon; if the word
phenomenon
may be applied to so small an object, which is
usually applied to large appearances in the atmosphere,
or in the phases of the heavenly bodies. As little can I
have an idea that the goitre is to be attributed to the
mixture of calcareous earth with the water that descends
from the mountains, which is the theory of Coxe; but
rather incline to that of Sassure, to account for it, viz.
the
humidity of the atmosphere;
but that mere
humidity
can occasion it, I do not believe; because, in
Ireland
or even the north of Scotland, which are moist
climates
,
there is nothing of it. Yet that this, which may
be called a malady, has some connection with moisture,
I incline to think; inasmuch as from my own
observation
those situate near ponds, or in wet grounds, are most
liable to be affected. But, what is more to the purpose,
on interrogating individuals as to their sensations, I have
been informed by them, that they are sensible to every
change of weather, from dry to moist, and can perceive,
to use their own term, a fluttering in that part of the
neck, on the approach of rain. I am not of opinion,
however, that the cause, whatever it may be, has the
least relation to marsh miasma; for the locus in quo, as
the lawyers say, where this disorder is known, is as free
from fever, as the driest regions.
But I return from this digression to the subject we
were upon, the origin of the Germans, and the language
of that people. I feel the more interested in this
disquisition
,
because the Saxon, which was my vernacular
tongue, is a dialect of the ancient German; and the
mother
of the English. The dialect that is spoken by the
common people in Cumberland, and the adjoining
country
of Scotland, called the low lands, is Saxon. It is in
this dialect that the old comedy of Gammer Gurton's
Needle is written, which is the prototype of the Gentle
Shephard of Allen Ramsay. Many of the scenes, that
of Maudge the witch, in particular, are evidently
borrowed
,
so far as respects the character of the personage.
I wonder that it is not looked up, and printed with the
Gentle Shepherd, that it may be seen how nearly they
resemble. It will be found in a collection of old plays,
by Dodsley; amongst which the model of Shakespeare's
Othello, in a tragedy by a certain Jan, or John Pafre,
will be seen. In looking over these, it will appear that
what is called blank versification, was written with great
felicity before his time, in that fluent way which he has
preserved, and which is the only way in which it is
tolerable
to me, that of Milton excepted. For the
versification
of neither Thompson, or Young, do I greatly
relish
;
and that of Cowper as little. Congreve comes the
nearest what I can bear.
But I recur to a consideration of the language of
nations
,
not meaning stile in composition, but the sounds
by which ideas are expressed; and those sounds
attempted
to be communicated by letters of the alphabet; I say,
attempted; for after all that can be got by the arbitrary
marks which we call letters, it is by the ear alone that
we can catch the real sounds that are intended; it is
only by a length of time that the ear can catch a sound, or
the tongue be brought to imitate it. It for this reason
that it is thought that those who have a taste for music,
and some facility in catching a tune, could most easily
acquire the pronunciation of a language; though I have
my doubts of this; for there seems to be no immediate
connection between the faculty of singing, and of
speaking
merely; not that I will undertake to say that
softness
of features and softness of voice are not connected;
for beautiful features always appear to have more
delicacy
of expression, than the homely; and a handsome
woman to sing more sweetly, if she can sing at all, than
one that is what we call an ordinary person; whether
it is that the imagination cheats the ear, and what is
more lovely to the eye, is also more pleasing to that
organ
.
A young man in the pulpit is thought to possess
greater powers of oratory in proportion as he has the
advantage
of personal appearance. In fact the goodly
person
has the advantage before any audience. Cicero
considers
stature, as an advantage to the orator. A public
speaker must be tall; or have such powers as to be able
to make those that hear him forget that he is of a small
stature. This was in the power of Garrick, according
to the poet Churchhill.
Figure, I own, at first, may give offence,
And harshly strike the eye's too curious sense;
But when perfections of the mind break forth;
Fancy's true fire, and judgment's solid worth;
When the pure genuine flame by nature taught,
Bursts into act, and every word is thought;
Before such merit all objections fly;
Pritchard's genteel, and
Garrick six feet high.
It strikes me as very extraordinary that those whose
province is speaking, do not think of assisting the
personal
appearance more, by the article of dress: I mean
in the costume or model of the coat, which is that of the
labourer, rather than of the man of
the gown;
I meant
to have said of the long robe; for the vest and coat that
sits close to the body, and is short, has not the dignity of
a more loose and flowing garment. And hence a
speaker
appears better in what we call a surtout, than in that
which sits tight to the body. He will feel more easy in
such a vestment; though he must be careful when he
turns his back to the fire not to burn the tail; but at the
same time, it will not do to take it up in order to warm
his backside, because a delicate man will not wish to
have it brought into view that he has a backside to warm.
For nature having an antipathy to the posteriors has
turned
them behind, which Longinus notices, as an
illustration
of a precept of good writing. It is true the
jocky-coat
,
being slit behind, a corner may be taken up under
each arm; but the attitude is ungraceful. A friend of
mine once, for whom I had a great good will,
introducing
his son, asked my opinion what he should do with
himHe had given him some education, and was at a
loss, whether to put him to study law, physic, or
divinity
.
I recommended to a handycraft employment. But
an experiment of a learned profession being uselessly
made, the father, after some years, wondering at the
sagacity
I had discovered, having had no opportunity at
the time I had given my opinion, of knowing any thing
of the lad, but just seeing him on his being introduced to
me, enquired on what ground I had formed my
judgment
;
I told him frankly, that I had seen at a glance
what he was in the stamina of his mind, by the manner
of his turning his back to the fire, and taking up his coat
behind. For there is a delicacy of feeling which always
accompanies genius; and which shews itself in even the
smallest particulars. A diligent observer will find in
what may be thought the most indifferent actions, enough
to indicate the portion of intellect which has fallen to the
share of a young person. For as a great general at a
coup d' oeil, or glance of the eye, can catch all the
advantages
of ground to draw up upon, and manuvre his
army; so one acquainted with the human physiognomy,
and is attentive to the movements of the body, can give
a pretty good guess whether the boy is to be
denominated
a John Bull-calf, or Nicholas Bottom the weaver.
I have not the same skill in the female character, and
might be mistaken in my ideas of what a young lady
might be brought to be; but having been employed a
great part of my early life in the academies, and in the
instruction of youth, I had acquired some degree of
sagacity
in distinguishing the aptitude for pursuits in life.
And I cannot say that this has been the source of much
advantage to me; but on the contrary, of much vexation,
to see those whom nature intended for hucksters, and
haberdashers of small wares, pushed forward into the
learned professions, and calling themselves lawyers, or
affecting to be politicians, and conductors of the affairs
of government. I well know that no man's opinion can
be considered as importing absolute verity; but so far
as my opinion will carry weight with it, I can say that
I have known judicial characters who, if things had
taken
place according to their gravity in the moral world,
would have been at the bottom of the stair-case; at
least would never have risen higher than keeping a shop
of merchandize, and in that situation might have been
respectable
.
For far be it from me to undervalue men's
occupations
under whatever denomination. It is the unfitness,
the incongruity of talents for the occupation, that I arraign.
Felices agricol, sua si bona norint.
Happy might the dunces be if they knew their
happiness
;
that is, could they distinguish where it was to be
found.
But returning from this digression to the thread of
our discourse. I take it, the Bastern were that people
from whom the Saxons of the Weser and Vistula were
principally descended. For after their repulse by the
Romans, under Augustus, when they attempted to
enter
Thrace, they would seem to have pressed upon the
west of Europe, and occupied this quarter. The Get
or Goths, were more upon the Rhine, and the heads of
the Danube.
Turner, in his history of the nations which have
emigrated
from beyond the Elb, has proved or rendered it
extremely probable, that a great country was lost during
the dark ages, on the west of Europe, of which
Greenland
,
and Iceland are remains. For it appears from the
archives
of Denmark, that from very ancient time, that
kingdom
had colonies in that quarter; and an intercourse had
been kept up which had been discontinued during the
adumbration of the north from the inundation of
barbarous
nations. We are certainly but little acquainted with
that corner of the earth; the Romans having had no
knowledge of it; much less the Greeks living more
remote
from the scene. It is but extremely little we know
of the earth we live upon, so far as respects mankind;
nor, perhaps, is it to be regretted; for to what purpose
would it be to know more, but to increase our knowledge
of bloody battles; or, of individual misery. Would it
not rather be desirable that the whole remembrance of
past events was struck out of our minds, and that we
had to begin a new series? What happens every day
now, is so like what happened before, that the sameness
is wearisome. Instead of consuming so much time in
acquiring a knowledge of history, we might employ
ourselves
in searching the mountains for simples, or digging
for minerals. Chemistry begins to be once more a
fashionable
study; but the fine arts, music, painting,
poetry
and architecture, occupy so much of the time of
education for a young person, that there is not leisure,
or space left for the more useful pursuits. I have not
mentioned statuary; for there are few amongst us that
handle the chisel in any other way than as joiners, or
carpenters. Caruchi was guillotined as being
concerned
in constructing what was called the infernal machine,
for the purpose of blowing up Bonaparte. It is
astonishing
that one so far above his species in the divine art of
imitating a man by the fabrification of the hand, should
have thought of destroying an original. It was this
Caruchi
that proposed the representation of in
sculpture, ringing the rivers from her hair. David the
painter, is also one of those wonderful personages; for
such I call them, who possess the sublime of genius in
one of the fine arts; that of painting what would seem
extraordinary; he was said to be one of the most bloody
of the revolutionary tribunal, at least subservient to them.
Now there is a delicacy, and fineness of mind, so to speak,
in such kind of intellects, that it astonishes me, how
cruelty
can find its way to mix with it.
Is there reason to suppose that this earth is, with
respect
to some superior order of beings, but a beehive;
and that they are amused looking at our working? It
is humiliating enough, to conceive so of our
insignificance
,
and therefore I repel the idea; but supposing it
be so, it must be amusing to them to see the same
revolutions
over again in the moral world. The like abstract
notions in metaphysics, and theology, with similar
experiments
in government. For it is true what the wise
man observes, there is nothing new under the sun.
I have no idea that the Theagony of Hesiod, as it is
applied
to action in the Iliad, and Odyssy of Homer, and
continued down in the Eneid of Virgil, will be revived
in the faith of nations while any vestige remains of the
credence. For there must be novelty in the hypothesis
that will attract. Though I will admit that boldness, or
rather extravagance in the belief, is most likely to be
successful.
The preceding dissertation on the origin of the
languages
of Europe, and incidentally upon other subjects,
may seem incongruous with the nature of this work;
did it not occur to a diligent observer, that there can be
nothing incongruous, or inconsistent, with a book which
embraces all subjects, and is an encyclopedia of the
sciences
.
It is an opus magnum, which comprehends law,
physic, and divinity. Were all the books in the world
lost, this alone would preserve a germ of every art.
Music, painting, poetry, &c. Statuary it says the least
about. Nevertheless, some hints are given that will
serve to transmit the reputation of Phidias and
Praxiteles
;
and stimulate the efforts of the chisel upon stone,
in generations yet to come. Yet, disliking egotism, and
all appearance of vanity in others, I am unwilling to
emblazon
,
beyond what is moderate, a production of my
own. But, to speak my mind a little freely, leaving the
bible out of the question, which taking it even as a human
composition, may be termed a
divine book; a collection
of tracts unequalled in all ages
by other writers; and
conceding
to Homer his superiority; and to Shakespeare,
and Plutarch's Lives, I do not know, but I certainly
flatter
myself, that my performance may occupy the next
grade. But I will not say more at this time, least I be
accused of boasting, and be called a braggadocia; an
imputation
carefully to be avoided by all who would escape
envy, and the vexations of that malignant passion.
CHAPTER II.
THE neighbouring country being peopled a good
deal from the north of Ireland, the early teachers of youth
were from thence. What were called redemptioners, or
persons unable to pay for their passage, contracting to be
sold in this country for what time might be necessary to
raise the money, were bought for schoolmasters; or put
to that employment in the summer; and in the winter to
weaving, or cord-waining, or whatever other trade, or
occupation, they were qualified to exercise, from the
use of it in the old country. It was in this way that
Greece had her first preceptors from Crete; and again,
Rome from Greece. And in the same manner, letters
were brought into Italy, by the emigrants after the fall
of Constantinople. It was under the tuition of one of
these that the governor had been taught the first
elements
.
The master, as he was called, had a small staff
attached to a strap of leather cut into thongs; the
flagellum
,
or whip, and ferule in the same instrument. Nor
was he sparing in the use of this inforcer of discipline.
For as he had not a facility of communication of ideas,
it was necessary to drive more by the hand; for when
the iron is blunt, you must put to more strength: which
was rendered still more necessary from the want of
those introductions to spelling, by division of words into
syllables, which are now in use. Thornton in his prize
essay, on the facilitating early pronunciation, has shown
the advantage of beginning with the consonants, to give
the sounds, and letting the vowels follow. Thus, ba, be,
instead of ab, or eb. But such nicety was not attended
to by the resolute men by whom the youth of that day
were initiated in the first mysteries. The conjoining,
and the reaching of sounds, was less studied; the system
being that of direct force. I have seen a score go through
their facings on a Monday morning, by flagellation; for
it was thought most advisable to whip first, and go to get
their tasks afterwards. And in proportion as the
schollar
was a favourite, he was the more roughly handled.
A higher grade of men of this education, and
discipline
,
had got possession of the pulpits; the leading
doctrines
Vol. IV. K
of which, in the mouth of some of these, were not
calculated to give the most favourable impressions of the
nature of the divinity.
It is of a later period, that we are indebted to this
cunabula
for editors of papers.
Said I, to one of these, why do you attack me, who have
no ill will to you? God love your shoul, said the
Paddywhack
,
it is not you I am attacking; it is the party. This
set me a thinking; and certainly one has no more
reason
to be offended with a shot from one of these; for they
mean nothing more personal, than with the gunner who
points the battery. It is not an individual that he aims
at, as individual; but as one of the squadron; the more
eminent in character, the more prominent to the aim;
and instead of defamation, it is a compliment, to be
thought worthy of a piece levelled, or the artillery
directed
.
In the midst of abuse, this has reconciled me to the
bearing it; and, in fact, in the contention of parties, the
passing by a man, is a sure proof that he is
insignificant
.
Speaking of foreign emigration, it occurs to me to
say a few words on the subject of French influence: and
in doing this, I must take notice, that those who canvass
this matter, do not go far enough back. It could not
but have been agreeable to France, to hear of the revolt
from the authority of Britain, being a rival nation; and
the presumption was, that France would at least wish
well to the opposition. In fact, they did wish well, and
at a very early period, began to discover it in acts. If she
did not openly receive our ambassadors at first, she did
privately; and under the idea of commercial
arrangements
by individuals, she slurred supplies of ammunition,
and the means of war. French engineers and soldiers of
fortune, came to serve in our armies; and young
nobility
,
as to a military school. Even an army came in due
time, when she had acknowledged our independence;
and French money was distributed: many thousand
French crowns
were circulated. But for this we could
not have carried on the war. France is certainly
opposed
to our giving up our independence, and returning to
our obedience to Great Britain. But, be this as it may,
certain it is, that the success of the French arms,
at Marengo, at Jena, at Austrelitz, at Friedland, at
Wagram, and other places, have obstructed our re
turn; which may be termed an indirect French influence.
I shall not pursue this train of thinking; it is enough
to have given a hint. It cannot be denied, however, but
that one thing the French have done for the world, the
advantage of which all protestants will agree in
admitting
;
the putting down the Pope. Nor is the prospect
hopeless, but that Mahomet will be reduced; a thing
remembered
in the prayers of those whom we call the
faithful, for a long time in Christendom.
CHAPTER III.
THE mind of man is active, and the great secret of
managing it, is to find employment for it. L' ennui,
for which we have not a correspondent English word,
is the feeling of a vacant mind. We had a phrase in the
old Saxon, and which still exists in that dialect of it which
we call broad Scotch which hits it exactly; it is to
think
lang.
O' woe, quo he, were I as free
As when I first saw this country,
How blythe and merry would I be,
And I wad never think lang.
The mind inactive loses its spring; and it ought to be
the study of all who are concerned in the early
education
of youth, to devise employment for them; and in
communities, to find means of occupying the grown
persons
.
This to keep the man from pursuits that are
injurious
to himself or to others. Where an army is not
to be raised, and soldiers enlisted, the making turnpike
roads, and digging canals, is an excellent substitute for
this draught of the superfluity of population, and a
proportion
of society who have not the foresight, or
perseverance
to devise employment for themselves. Hence
it is, that they are mustered in elections by the ambitious,
for their own private views; and these are they who are
made use of to call out for a change of the constitution;
Not that all who make use of them for this purpose,
mean more than to advance themselves by the aid of the
confusion which they excite. For when men are out of
power, they wish the drawing of the lottery to begin
again, and the prizes drawn to go for nothing. The blanks
that are drawn do not give satisfaction. Not but that the
common people are of themselves sufficiently disposed
to novelty. A desire of a change is the characteristic of
the multitude, at all times. And even if a man has no
prospect of ameliorating his condition, it helps a little
that it is not always the same. Though the next plank
is as hard as that on which a man lies, it is pleasant to
roll upon it. It is a great misfortune, when a restless
spirit has a faculty of haranguing; and still more so, if he
has ideas, and can get himself placed at the head of a
paper. He is restrained by feelings of delicacy only in
proportion as he wants terms to express himself. If
one of these should happen to be of the kingdon
emphatically
so called, because it has been but nominally a
kingdom
for some ages, he brings the same licence into his
paper, that he shewed at the fairs of Liffy, or Tipperary,
with a shamrock in his hat, and a shilelah in his hand.
Yet there is in the history of that people in their own
country, something greatly to be valued: their
hospitality
,
and generosity. An Irishman has no mean vices.
He is brave and open in his enmity; and sets the law at
defiance, at the same time with the public opinion.
It is an old adage, an ounce of prevention, is worth a
pound of cure: or, as the mock doctor of Smollet has it,
Bestum est curare distemprum ante habestum.
It is but a slovenly way of reforming a man, to hang
him. Some indeed have their doubts whether it is
lawful
to hang a man at all, or take away life in society.
Certainly nothing can justify it, but the necessity of
self-preservation
.
If a man had killed five hundred, and the
remainder can be safe, the necessity of taking away the
life of the murderer ceases; and it is unlawful to put
him to death. But where a man kills one, a
presumption
arises that he will kill two, and it is on the
principle
of precavention that he is suspended, or otherwise
taken from society. Banishment is unquestionably the
proper mulct to him who has forfeited the benefits of
society. But the culprit may come back, and take and
repeat his blows; or he may commit mischief in the
place to which he is sent, or to which he may come; or
another society may refuse to receive him. But the
Jewish lawgivers said, Whosoever sheddeth man's
blood, by man shall his blood be shed: but if that is to
be taken strictly, hanging is no shedding blood; and yet
the murderer is hung, not beheaded.
The meaning is predictive; and as much as to say,
that in the natural course of things, the taking the life of
a man, leads to the loss of a man's own. But taking it
even as injunctive, and as pointing out that punishment
which retributary justice ought to inflict, it must be
taken
as applicable to the Jews in the wilderness, whose
unsettled
life did not admit of places of confinement
sufficiently
safe to secure offenders. While they were
journeying
K 2
from Kadesh Barnea to Cushanrishatharim, they
must be at a loss what to do with the malefactor; and
therefore it saved trouble to despatch him from the
world. In a country where the sitting is permanent,
to borrow a phrase from the French national assembly,
and where strong buildings can be erected like the old
or new jail of Philadelphia, what necessity can there be to
put a man out of the world? He can be put to work, and
to make some amends to the community for the life he
has taken away, and the expence of bringing him to
punishment
.
As for himself, is he not more punished by
solitude, or labour, than by the infliction of death? It
does not follow, that if left to a man's self, he would
prefer
confinement to death, that for this reason, the
punishment
is lighter. He has not resolution to consult future
happiness, by the enduring present pain. But if it is left
to a man to consider whether he would wish to have his
enemy confined, or to undergo instant death, would he be
willing that his adversary should escape vengeance by
getting speedily out of the world? It might be a
satisfaction
to him that the murderer should go to hell; but
he is not sure that he would go there; and when he has
him in a work-house, he is sure that he must work.
Besides
,
who can be of so diabolical a nature, as to be
reconciled
even to a murderer going to hell; and why not
allow
him space and opportunity to repent, as much as the
short life of man will allow, in a cell of confinement with
nothing but bread and water, at least until he gives signs
of repentance. Be this as it may, from all the
examination
I have been able to give my own mind, I would think
a man more punished who had murdered, to see him in
a cell, than on a gallows; what I would think if I had
been murdered myself, supposing me still to have the
feelings of humanity, in another state, is a different
question
.
I might wish to have my adversary with me there;
in order to retaliate, and to have the gratification of
retributary
vengeance. Unquestionably it must be a
feeling
of this nature, and a putting ones self in the place of a
murdered person, that can lead to an idea that it is but
justice to the dead, that the murderer should die. It is
but an innovation in the common law of our ancestors,
the Saxons, to put to death, when a compensation could
be made to the public, and to the relations of the
deceased
for the injury done, in taking away the life of an
individual
.
It seems to be a dictate of nature; for the early ages
of man in all countries, sanctions this mode of atoneing
for injuries, not excepting murder itself. Where there
was a community of goods, compensation could not be
made in this way, and confinement and hard labour would
be the only punishment.
But, be as it may, if life must go for life, I dislike the
mode of taking it. The sus. per col. is an ugly minute
on the docket. I do not know that they could have done
better before the invention of gun powder; for beheading
is not much better; if not rather more shocking, from
the mutilation of the body. I would prefer shooting;
at least if I was to die myself by the order of the law,
that would be my choice; and through the breast rather
than the head; for I would not chuse to have the human
countenance disfigured. I saw once four deserters shot,
sitting on their coffins, and their graves dug beside
them, and yet with these terriffic circumstances, I
thought them killed prettily in comparison of being put to
death by the halter. The guillotine is too appaling, on
account of the apparatus. My mode of death, were it
left to my choice, I mean death forced, would be to fall
by a pistol shot by the hand of a mild compassionate
female
,
drest in white muslin, who would have fortitude
to be unmoved; because, in that case, death would be
presented with as little terror as the nature of the case
would admit. To paint death as we do, is an injustice,
says the duc de Ligne. We should represent it in
the shape of a tall, venerable, mild and serene matron
with traces of beauty left on her countenance, and her
arms opened gracefully to receive us. This is an
emblem
of an eternal repose after a sad life, replete with
anxieties and storms.
I will admit, that the sudden impression, the
theatrical
effect, so to speak, of a public execution, is
calculated
to strike the multitude; but it is passing, and as to
the deterring from the commission of crimes, no
punishment
can have any great effect. All depends upon the
ways and means of preventing; caution a priore, is the
most effectual. I have weighed a good deal in my mind,
the speeches of Julius Csar and Cato in the Roman
senate, on the sentence to be passed on the conspirators,
the associates of Cataline. That of Cato prevailed,
which was for the putting them to death; and with
good reason, on that occasion, which was in the midst of
an insurrection, and when a confidence in the power of
government was necessary to be expressed, and the
audacious
intimidated, shewing them what those who had
the administration dared to do, against those who had
so many of the populace on their side; and because also,
in those perturbed times, there was no secure keeping
them; they might have got out of custody in a short
time, and have gone to increase the numbers of the
traitors
.
Self-preservation, in this case necessity, dictated
the putting out of life; yet it is remarkable, with what
delicacy the Roman consul expresses the event, walking
down to the Forum after their execution: Vixerunt,
they have lived. The Greeks also, in their mode of
expressing
the last offices, speak of having accompanied
the departed, a little way on their journey. Odou
cimarmenene
,
the appointed journey. What an
impression
must we have of the manners of those times, when
torture preceded death; and death itself, was
accompanied
with all the horror of circumstances. May not
the time come, when the putting to death at all, unless in
extreme cases, such as those alluded to, will be felt as
the proof of an uncivilized state of society; and a remnant
of barbarity still retained by the prejudices of the
vulgar
?
CHAPTER IV.
THE visionary philosopher had not yet abandoned
his project of civilizing the brute creation, and teaching
them the arts and sciences. He had caught a young
panther
,
and, with a chain about its neck, had put it to study
law with a young man of that profession, who wishing to
get forward in the business, thought it could do him no
harm, though it might not do the panther much good to
undertake the task. But there were those who bore
testimony against this, being of opinion that lawyers were
bad enough, even when made of the best materials.
This idea was supported by some sensible men, who
could not conceive that this animal of the cat kind could
ever be brought to be capable of explaining a matter to
a jury, or stating a point of law to the court.
The visionary philosopher taking fire at this
opposition
to his discovery, invention, or improvement, or what
else it might be called, exclaimed abundantly. What is
it, said he, whether he may be ever able to explain
himself
intelligibly at the bar? Cannot he grin, bite
[There would seem here to be an hiatus in the
manuscript
,
or the sheets misplaced. The editor cannot
connect
the narrative.]
It had come to the knowledge of the people, or, at
least, was projected in the mean time, that after the
proclamation
for scalps, and the hunt which took place in
consequenc of it, the governor had been guilty of the
most manifest partiality in screening the bog-trotter, who
was as much liable as any person, no one having been
more noisy in beer-houses, and active at town meetings,
to bring about a convention, than he had been; with the
exception of Thady O`Conner, who had taken the
benefit
of the insolvent act; and a few others who had been
refused tavern licences at the sessions. It was thought
to be a ground of impeachment to connive at the
secreting
any one on such occasion.
The fact was, the governor was as innocent of the
charge as any one among themselves, and so he
declared
to them; that for a considerable time past, he had
ceased
to have a controul over the bog-trotter; that like
Noctra Mullin's dog, he had been at his own hand, these
six weeks; that is, since he got in to be constable.
The affair was like to take a very serious turn, and
the people would not be satisfied; when Angus M`
Donald
,
the Scotch gardener, having knocked down the
panther that was studying law, and taken off a piece of
his hide, came forward with it, saying it was little
matter
what had been done with Teague on the occasion
alluded
to, since he had put the law in force against him
just now, and scalped him himself, as they might see by
the red hair, and the blood. There is nothing sooner
softens a passion, or calms a mad multitude, than the
yielding to it. Hence the fury abated in a moment; and
when it occurred to them that their remonstrance to the
governor had been the occasion of the tragedy, they
began
to relent, and to blame themselves as having been
too precipitate in their representations.
The difficulty now occurred, what to do with the
bog-trotter
.
For it would not be safe that he should remain
in the government, and that it should be visible that the
scalping had been but a substitution, and not the
genuine
exuvia of the man. Harum Scarum was of opinion
that it was best to knock him down in reality, and take his
scalp to the people, laying the deception at the door of
the Scotchman, as it really ought. The governor was
opposed to that, as it was to save him from an
impeachment
that Angus, with great presence of mind, had
bethought
himself of the stratagem, to divert the fury of
the populace.
But the visionary philosopher, in the mean time,
enraged
at the murder of his crony panther, and the
lawyer
with whom he was studying, dissatified, or seeming
to be so, the circumstance was explained to the people.
But they thought enough had been done for once, and that
it was not necessary to pursue the matter farther. In
fact, some of them were in the secret, and meant only
pastime from the beginning.
However, thinking it might not be amiss to be out of
the way for a while, the bog-trotter was sent over hill to
dig potatoes, at the farm of Niel M`Mullin, a
neighbouring
gentleman.
CHAPTER V.
It may be thought that in my allusions to
impeachment
,
I may have in view what has happened in this
state. It is probable, or rather certain, that it is this
which has led me to think upon the subject, and to
introduce
it in a picture of democratic government, such as
that I am now describing. But if it is inferred from
thence, that I approve or condemn what has taken place
in this state, it will be unfair; or at least a
misconception
.
For I do not mean that any inferences, favourable
or unfavourable, should be made from it. On the
contrary
,
I am far from reprobating the
power of
impeachment
in the constitution,
or finding fault with a discreet
use of it in
practice.
I look upon it, as the means of
avoiding tumults, and assassinations. When
dissatisfaction
with the conduct of public officers, is suffered to
shew itself, and to have a vent in this way, the public
mind, having an opportunity of hearing grievances
discussed
,
and getting to know the real demerit, good or
bad, of the functionary, is more likely to be satisfied,
and it is safer for the object of the obloquy. Nor, on
examination
,
will it be found, that in many cases, where
there is a public dissatisfaction with an officer, there has
not been some foundation laid; if not in the very
particular
that is made the subject of enquiry, yet in some
other that has led to it. As for instance; even in the
case of Scipio Africanus, where, perhaps, a just cause
has been the least suspected to have existed of all
instances
of a great man impeached, that are to be found in
history. Yet if any one will read Livy attentively, in his
account of the way in which this young man came
forward
into public life, he may anticipate the vexations he
experienced after he had accomplished great things for
the commonwealth. His error was, a premature
competition
for office. Before the age allowed by law, he set
up for the Edile-ship, and carried it by the undue favour
of the populace. Si me, omnes Quirites edilem
facere
volunt,
satis annorum habeo.
How arrogant the
expression; how insulting to the tribunes and Fabius
Maximus, and others of the senate who opposed it? His
offering himself for the proconsulate in Spain before his
24th year, quatuor et viginti annos ferme natus,
professus
se petere, was more excusable from the occasion.
But it was in some degree by an affectation of religion
and arts of dissimulation, that he had prepared the
public
mind, to favour his premature pretensions. From the
time that he had put on the toga virilis, to this, he had
been preparing the minds of the people. There was
no day, before he did any thing private or public, but that
he went into the capital, and entering a temple, sat down,
and for the most part alone, in secret, and spent there
some time. This custom, which was preserved through
his whole life, whether designedly, or that it so happened,
procured credit to the opinion published by some, that
he was a man of a divine stock, and brought up the story
before common, of Alexander the Great, and equal to it,
in fable and variety, that he had been conceived of a
huge dragon, which had been seen in the bed of his
mother
;
and which tale he increased by the art of neither
contradicting nor assenting.
On his return from Spain, after the expiration of his
proconsulate, he was willing to have accepted a
triumph
,
though to that day, there had been no instance of
any one triumphing, for whatever successes, unless he
had had the command in chief; or, as the historian
expresses
it, qui sine magistratu res gessisset. It is true,
it is said that the hope of a triumph was rather tried
than obstinately persisted in. But it shews a too great
forwardness to catch at honours. But the inordinate
nature of his ambition was more evident, on his
obtaining
the consulship. He grasped at Africa for his
province
though not according to his lot, nulla jam
modica gloria contentus. And this he said
openly
,
he would carry by the people, even if the senate set
themselves against it. He made his words good, and
the senate, with all the authority and reputation of
Fabius
Maximus, venerable from age and wisdom, and
other aged likewise and experienced, were bullied by the
tribunes and people into an acquiescence.
I cannot help considering his conduct in procuring the
province of Africa for his brother Lucius, having Llius
for his colleague in the consulship, who equally was
ambitious
of that designation, as extremely indelicate in
throwing his weight into the scale, in the deliberation of
the senate between the two, by offering to serve under
his brother as his lieutenant; if they would prefer his
brother. By this means, and by his previous advice to
his brother in submitting the matter to the senate, rather
than to the chance of a lot, and thus having it in his mind
to use the address of offering his services in a
subordinate
capacity, which was, in fact, obtaining the
command
for himself, he fixed in the minds of the principle
men much chagrin and dislike. And deservedly; for
ambition is self-love; and when it is at the expence of
others, it is odious. Every man in a community has what
may be ranked among the imperfect rights in society,
a right to have his age considered, in pretention to office;
and not to be intruded upon by the coming generation
before its time; much less to have power engrossed even
by virtue itself, or the most distinguished ability. For
the keeping the flame of public spirit burning, is the
vital principle of republican government, to which there
is nothing more smothering than inequality in the chance
of obtaining offices, honours, and emoluments. And if
the next generation come on too soon, the seniors are
pressed out, and lose their chance. Nor is it only by the
younger intruding that this equality is effected, but the
usurping by those of any age, of what is not equal.
And I call it usurpation, where any thing is obtained;
what is more, where any thing is even taken, that
reasonably
ought to go to another, in consideration of standing,
ability, or services. If these are obtained by popular
favour
,
unduly coveted, what reason has the candidate to
complain, or good men to regret, if the same caprice that
has advanced, should, notwithstanding unimpeachable
conduct, nevertheless impeach. We shall see that this
was the case with Scipio.
He was impeached by the tribunes of the people on a
charge of peculation, and converting the public money
to his own use, in which there was no truth; but in the
remainder of the charge, there was truth; that he had
pushed himself forward to foreign nations in a manner as
if peace and war with the Roman people depended upon
him alone: That he had gone out as a dictator to his
brother, rather than as a lieutenant; and for no other
purpose
,
but that he might shew himself, and have it
believed
in the east, as he accomplished in the west, that he
should seem the head, and the pillar of the Roman
empire
:
That a state, the mistress of the world, should
seem to be under the shade of his power: That his nod
Vol. IV. L
stood in place of the decrees of the senate, or the orders
of the people.
The charge of peculation he could easily answer; but
these things he could not answer; nor was there any
thing so definite in them, that strictly speaking, they
could be made the ground of an impeachment; but it was
easy to see that by reason of them, the alleged offence
would be established, and which alone could come
within
the laws. He chose to withdraw from the trial, and go
into banishment.
If, in like manner, impeachments that have brought a
reproach upon republics were examined, it might be
found, that in the greater part of them, bating sudden
errors, and
mistakes, incident to all human affairs,
there
would be found, though not the best foundation for the
particular charge alleged, and the sentence pronounced,
yet remotely something blameable, which had led to the
making the charge in question.
But even taking it as matters seem to be on the
surface
of things, the wrongs of democracy, and injustice of
public characters, will be found to fall short of those
under
lurid despotism. For a view of this, let the history of
the Roman empire, by Livy, be compared with that of the
same people under the emperors, as we have it by the
divine pen of Tacitus. There is no one who will consult
the nature of things, or look into what has taken place in
popular governments, but will think that there is greater
chance for justice to an honest man, than where this
depends
upon the caprice of an individual. For it is not the
despot himself that is alone to be dreaded; it is those
he has about him, and will allege words spoken of him,
or acts done against his government; when, in fact, it is
their own resentment, for something done, or said, or
omitted to be done, or said, which they wish to gratify.
A despotic government is safer for a dishonest man, and
he has the best chance of coming forward there, where
it is not ability or integrity that recommends, but
subserviency
to the passions of the prince.
But it is the rage of
mere
democracy that has brought
reproach upon republicks; democratic power
unbalanced
,
is but the depotism of many instead of one. It is the
balancing with stays and braces of distributed powers that
gives safety. This distribution of power is the highest
effort of the mind, and yet you will find but few,
who, like my bog-trotter, will not conceive that they
could form a constitution that would give energy and
guard liberty. It is this false idea, overweaning
conceit
,
that I have it in view to ridicule. I am willing to
give it the whole force of my indignation, in proportion
as I know the error, and the consequences. Let any man
look at a book published in this state, under the specious
title of Experience the test of government, and see
the crude conceptions that it contains; I do not know
by whom written, and he will be sensible of the
consequences
of putting the modelling of a constitution into
such hands. I am not afraid of the people of
Pennsylvania
,
said a pompous orator to me. The fact was, he
had nothing to be afraid of, unless they would take his
scalp. Nor am I afraid of them on my own account;
but on theirs; at least I am afraid on their account, as
well as my own. For the formation of a government, is
not a matter to which the bulk are competent: or if
they will indulge caprice in changing, and they will go
to change; whenever a change is made, it will be but
a majority that is satisfied, and perhaps that not great;
and it is to be expected that a portion of the majority,
not finding their account in the change, will associate
with the former minority, and hence a change, and so
toties
quoties, until only one remains that is to be
satisfied
.
It will be said, impeachment is of no use; the
constitution
being such, that a conviction cannot follow; it
requiring
such a proportion of the tribunal, before whom
the impeachment comes to trial, to be of a mind. Is it
nothing even in the case of an acquittal, to be scared half
to death? Even on a representation of the people, and a
citation before a committee of the house of
representatives
,
one may as well be half hanged, as to undergo the
terror.
Can any one, looking at the quarter sessions, think that
there is no good by trying, even where there is no
condemnation
?
I have known many a man tried, that I
thought guilty in the letter of the law, and perhaps spirit,
but if acquitted by the exclusion of testimony not legal, or
the leaning of the jury on the side of himself, or otherwise,
I did not think there was nothing in the having brought
to trial, and shaken the prisoner well over the
indictment
,
or rather the indictment over him. He might
reform
and it would be a warning to him.
It is possible, that something like oppression and
tyranny
,
or bordering on these, both to people and bar, may
have been complained of in judges with some cause in
times past. Is it to be supposed that what
has
taken
place, has contributed nothing to arrest, or remove this
grievance? Would not the oppression and tyranny seem
to have veered to the other side now, and to be found, in
some degree, if not with the people, at least
with the bar.
It has seemed to me to be so, and it is therefore, but an
emanation of my feelings when I pourtray in my
imagination
the disorder of untamed animals admitted to be
advocates. It is doubtless a caricatura of what I mean,
but a thing has usually some excess in it, to be felt as
the proper subject of a caricatura. While the lawyer
has it in his power to influence his client; and even to
excuse his own ignorance or errors, by laying the loss
of a cause upon a judge, or alleging oppression, the
client
can apply to a house of representatives, and the judge,
of course, be brought down with facility, the
presumption
is, that he will bear a great deal of impertinence,
impudence, and irregularity, before he will think it
advisable
to endanger the running the gauntlet, by
entering
into a contest with a powerful member of the bar. I
do not mean powerful in point of talents; for there is
nothing to be apprehended from men of ability; it is
from the uninformed that the difficulty arises; and insults
are received from them, because it is the instinct of
their natures, to cover their defects by noise and
arrogance
;
or, from a want of knowledge, they think
themselves
monstrously wronged, when they have the fairest
hearing, and the fullest justice.
The suitors of the court, the jurors, the
circumstantes
,
or bystanders, complain of the length of speech in
the lawyers, and of the judges for suffering them.
There was a time when the judges might have taken some
liberty in restraining, or at least in frowning on
diffusiveness
of explanation; but more caution must be used
now, lest offence should be given; judges being more
under the weather than formerly. A prudent man in a
judicial station, will bear for the present, what he will not
always bear; because he will discern that this is not the
time to make head; but that after some time, the
current
may begin to set in a different direction; and that
may then succeed which now would but strengthen the
tide. Besides, it is difficult to say when the speech is
too long; and it may be a question whether the court
ought to be suffered to judge of that. The constitution
provides that a man shall be heard by himself or his
counsel; but it does not say how long he shall be heard.
Admit the court may have a right to say, that the
speech has been long enough as to them, have they a right
to say that it has been long enough for the jury. How can
they tell whether the jury are satisfied? What is more;
is it the court or jury that have the right to say, that
they have heard enough? Or, is it the suitor or his
counsel
,
who have a right to say, we have not been
sufficiently
heard?
Tyranny and oppression
in refusing to hear,
may be charged; and thus it is a matter that must
depend
a good deal upon the temper of the times, and upon
a discreet discernment of what is practicable, on
particular
occasions, or with particular persons, that a judge
must determine what to do. A man of sense at the bar,
is easily manageable; but a weak man is as difficult to
manage, as the visionary philosopher's panther.
Do our representatives in our legislative bodies, always
confine themselves to the point, though they may to the
question? In other words, is it possible to keep them to
order, though it may be to call them? Is it found
possible
to abridge their harangues while breath and strength
of lungs last? If those whose business is not speaking
can find such facility in prolonging a discourse, what
may not be expected of such as are more in the habit;
and without fatiguing themselves, can speak
interminably
?
Were our orators in the legislative bodies as much
in the hearing of the people, as the advocates of our
courts, they might be complained of as much for the
length of their speeches. In the courts, it is no
uncommon
thing for the judges to express a weariness of the
tediousness of counsel; and sometimes to attempt to
bring them to the point, and to abridge their
harangues
;
but it will seldom, if ever, be found to answer
any end but to prolong the discussion; for if you restrain
at one point, there will be an overflowing at another;
and it being like to come to an altercation, which is
indecent
,
it will seem best to give up the contest, and let the
thing take its course. The line is so delicate between
unseasonable interruption by the court in calling to the
point, and what is justifiable, that it is difficult to fix it
without doing injustice, and impossible without giving
L 2
dissatisfaction. In human affairs, there is no reaching
the perfect in the application of principle. All that can
be done, is to come as near it as possible, by a just
discernment
of circumstances. What is done, may be
blamed; but there might be more blame, had the
contrary
been done.
CHAPTER VI.
CONSIDERATIONS ON THE POWER OF
IMPPEACHMENT
Continued.
THE power of impeachment, is the most salutary
principle of a free government. Where there is a full
scope for this, there is no danger of convulsions; and
there is a prospect that the constitution may be
preserved
.
Injustice may be done: no doubt of that, and
injustice
a thousand times, has been done. But it is the
fortune
de guerre; the fate of war; in other words, a tacit
condition of the acceptance of an office. It is a maxim
of law, qui sentit commodum sentire debet et onus. A
good book might be written on the history of
impeachments
.
It would be instructive; and might be
entertaining
.
I would like to see the sentiment I have broached,
fully
developed; and the history of impeached characters,
so far traced, as to see whether some conduct in a
public
capacity, or in the ways and means of getting at
public
office, or appointment, had not laid the foundation of
the ultimate prosecution. The presumption is, that the
shoe must have pinched somewhere, to have produced
that uneasiness which has been felt; and which has
terminated
in a public accusation. And, in some
particular
perhaps, in which the individual may have deserved
commendation rather than blame; but upon which it has
been thought the more practicable to succeed, taking
into view the prejudices of the times. Such an
investigation
of causes and effects, might save the character of
democratic governments from much blame. I admit it
would not perfectly justify the impeaching for one cause,
while another was more in the minds of the public;
but it would account for it, and excuse it. One is less
shocked at the imprisonment and fine of Miltiades, when
we recollect his demand of
an olive crown
after the
battle
of Marathon. It was answered to him, when you
shall conquer alone, it will be time enough to ask to have
honours paid you alone. It may easily be seen, from
his coveting this distinction, that his ambition was not
sufficiently regulated; and it may be inferred, that the
like spirit exhibited in other instances, may have given
just offence to a people jealous of equality.
I have known a man in office, whose sordid mind in
money matters, appeared to me to render him
undeserving
of an office; and though this could not render him
liable to an impeachment; yet, if he was impeached for
something bordering on what was impeachable, there
would be a predisposition to be reconciled to his being
found guilty. For no man deserves an office in a
republic
,
that is mean in money matters, and is justly
chargeable
with a sordid oeconomy.
Inordinate self-love in the accumulation of office, in a
single family, is at all times obnoxious to popular dislike,
and the most upright discharge of a public function, will
not atone for the engrossing money in one's own person, or
that of connections.
One consideration ought to go a great way in
reconciling
the public mind, in a popular government, to the
bearing these things when they occur, that nature is
constantly acting to remove the grievance, by death, and
in this way to bring about rotation in office.
Combinations
will be broken by the quiet operation of this
general
law; pluralities will disappear; and the poor devil that
is disgracing himself by a nearness that is contemptible,
cannot always live to enjoy, if he ever may be said to
enjoy
the savings of his penury. In the mean time, it is a
satisfaction, that if the general contempt is not felt by
him, it is felt by every one else.
Where a man is liberal in his private dealings, and
contributes to objects of utility according to his means, he
is thought deserving of office, and his generosity and
public spirit, like charity, will cover a multitude of sins.
It is rare that such a character becomes the subject of
popular prosecution. Where indeed his liberality is but
the stilt of his ambition; and this is indulged so as to
wound the self-love of others, we need not wonder if it
draws persecution. The most manly thing that I know
in the history of the Roman senate, is the
impeaching
Manlius Capitolinus. Generosity, and public spirit
on his part had shewed itself to be but the stilt of
ambition
.
That is, it was not public spirit, but inordinate
self-love. He had saved Rome in defending the capital;
but he was not satisfied with the consciousness of this,
and the gratitude of his country on all occasions
expressed
;
but he must be the only man of any name in the
state. With a view to this, what were his arts?
Affecting
to be the advocate of all confined for debt; paying
debts himself for some, with ostentation; shewing his
wounds and scars, and perpetually talking of having
defended
the capital, haranguing against the senate, and
charging them with concealing the public treasures;
remonstrating
with the community on their not knowing
their own strength, and doing themselves justice in the
government. From these arts, such was his influence
with the body of the people, that even the dictator
Cornelius
Cassus the second after Romulus, who had taken
the
spolia opima;
and who was created dictator for this
purpose, amongst others, of checking the sedition,
dreaded
it more than the war against the Volsci, which he
was obliged first to meet. For though returning
victorious
over the enemy, and armed with the honour of a
triumph, yet he considered the contest at home as the
more formidable; and though he had ordered him into
custody, yet had not thought it advisable to proceed
farther
against him. It was thought that his abdicating the
dictatorate, which he did at this time, was owing to his
not chusing to meet the tempest that was breaking out
on behalf of this demagogue to liberate him from the
prison
.
The consuls now chosen, and the senate, were in
consternation, when at the proposition of two tribunes
of the people, Marcus Mnius, and Quintus Publius, the
bold measure was adopted of charging him before the
people themselves, and bringing him to an
impeachment.
The result was, that the very people rallying onward to
support him, were arrested in a moment at the idea of
guilt charged upon him, and themselves made the
judges
.
What was the charge? Why simply that of
attempting
to destroy the balance of the government, by
inflaming the populace, and running down the senate.
Yet, strange as it may seem, this very populace who were
alleged to be the subject of his arts, and the means of his
treason, on a fair examination, found him guilty; and in
order to stamp his conduct with perpetual disgrace, it
was provided, that no one of the family of Manlius,
should ever bear the name of Marcus, which was his
name. He was thrown from the Tarpeian rock like the
vilost of criminals.
CHAPTER VII.
UNDER the existing constitution, the patronage of
the governor was considerable. This very thing which
at first view would seem to be a ground of his security,
was the cause of much uneasiness, and constant
opposition
to his administration. For not in one case out of
ten did he make an appointment, but some concerned
became
enemies. The one appointed was an enemy
because
his appointment was not as good as he had
expected
;
and the others of the community were dissatisfied,
because he got any appointment at all. For there was
not one who did not think himself better entitled, at all
events, better qualified. Some were vexed because they
had not been chosen governor themselves, and no
appointment
would have satisfied them. There was a weaver
amongst these who had pretensions to the chair, and
raised
a clamour against the constitution, thinking that in
the confusion that would ensue, things being once
more put into hotch-pot, he might renew his chance for
the office of chief magistrate; that having failed to be
put in nomination under existing circumstances he might
have better luck under a new arrangement. A second
chance he would have at all events, and it might be more
favourable in the result; inasmuch as the very bustle he
was making in the affair of the new constitution, would
bring him into great notice, and increase his popularity,
there being now an indifferent mass of citizens who were
dissentients from the same motives with himself, and
might promise themselves something from the confusion
of affairs. But the proposition of a new constitution, as
being less alarming to the bulk, was suggested under the
idea of an
amendment.
For the revolutions in France
about this time had created some alarm, at the idea of
changing rapidly all at once from one constitution to
another
.
But who was there who could have any
reasonable
apprehensions of risk or danger from an amendment?
But it being thought adviseable to specify some
amendments
in order the better to bring about a convention,
there was no one that had not the sagacity to find out
some things that might be put on a better footing than
they had been. As for instance; the weaver seemed
to think that the price of weaving ought to be raised; and
that no customer should hereafter find fault with the
work done; and that he should pay for it as soon as it
was done.
All this seemed reasonable, especially as the
cordwainer
,
and the brick-layer could easily see that in the
course of the deliberation, it would naturally take a wider
range, and introduce a clause providing for them also.
For though not by name in the first instance; yet all
occupations
would be virtually included and enjoy the
advantage
of the like reform It had become a cry pretty
much prevailing, that the sitting of the people should be
permanent:
and the constitution revolutionary; so that
whenever, and wherever, the shoe was found to pinch
it might be altered.
Amongst the malcontents with the constitution, it was
not a little unexpected by the governor, to find Teague
Oregan his late protegee and associate in his
peregrinations
.
For notwithstanding he had, in the first instance,
been appointed cryer of the court, and in the next,
advanced
to the grade of auctioneer, he was dissatisfied
because
he had not been made chief justice, or advanced
to that of secretary of state. For these reasons he was
amongst the loudest for a reform, and proposed an
assembling
of the whole people, once more to fix upon a
new constitution. The governor conceiving himself to
have some kind of right to controul and regulate the
ambition of his bogtrotter, took an opportunity to
expostulate
with him on the danger and inexpediency of
the proposition at this time; and more particularly on the
indelicacy of persons newly come into the country,
taking
upon them to be the first to propose a revision of
that frame of government, which they had found
prepared
for them, and what on becoming citizens, they were
under an implied obligation to support.
Teague, said he, you cannot but recollect the
inconsiderable
station from which I originally advanced you;
being a redemptioner on board a ship from Cork in
Ireland
.
In fact though you called yourself a redemptioner
you were a bound servant for years, and in such capacity
you were under an obligation to serve me, nevertheless
I treated you as a redemptioner, paid the money for you,
the passage money, and told you that as soon as you had
served me to the amount of it at the yearly hiring of a
labouring person, I would give you your liberty. The
business that I set you about might be called drudgery,
because you were fit for nothing else; but did I not as
soon as I conveniently could, endeavour to amend your
station, by making you my body servant, and taking you
with me almost in the light of a companion in my
rambles
?
In the course of these, in proportion as I saw an
opening, I was disposed to advance you still more, and
to bring you forward. Was it my fault if in these
prospects which seemed to be occasionally flattering,
there were some disappointments? You know well what
happened from first to last when being made a judge
you kicked an associate off the bench.
Have I not done as much for you as I well could do,
since coming to this new country, and my advance
to the chair of government? Did I not make you a
crier of the court, and are you not now an auctioneer?
What reason had you to expect that I should make you
a chief justice, even though you did read law a while, and
had been upon the bench in another place? This very
circumstance if no other, was a reason against it; for
it gave me an opportunity of knowing that you were not
fit for it. You have not the patience of a judge even if you
had all other qualifications. I could not make you
secretary
,
for you cannot write; and though you might act
by deputy, yet it is but an aukward thing for a man to
be secretary, which imports by the usage of the term,
some ability to minute matters, and not to be able to
write his own name. It is impossible for me not to
know that whatever you and the others of you who call
out for a new constitution are moved not by your opinion
of defects visible in the old, but because you think a new
may be more favourable to your particular pretensions.
But setting aside all that could be said on this alleged
point of private views on your part and theirs, is there
not some decency to be observed on our part in coming
into this country, in proposing innovations? Can a
bog-trotter
just from Ireland like you be supposed to be
cognizant
of the genius of the people sufficiently to form a
constitution for them? Is it the most delicate thing in
the world to undertake to find fault with that which they
have formed? I feel it on my part a matter of peculiar
delicacy to sport an opinion. It hurts me even that you
lately in my train, should cavil against it, least it should
be supposed to be at my prompting. Though there can
be no ground of presumption that I who have been
complimented
Vol. IV. M
with the government, could cabal to overturn
it. Yet one cannot tell what those who are the
advocates
of what they call a reform may do, or say in order
to acquire weight to their machinations. They may
pretend
,
that I who hold an office under the constitution
and am sworn to support it, do not approve of it. They
will allege in proof of this, my having an officer who is
foremost in his vociferation for a change. You do not
consider, Teague, where this may end. The termination
in France we have all seen; it was the guillotine.
What is de guillotine? said Teague. It is, Said the
governor
,
a thing in the shape of a crowbar or a harrow
with teeth of a foot long, which they draw over a man's
back, and scratch him as you would the earth in: which
seed is sown.
The truth is, the governor did not himself know
precisely
the form of this instrument, nor the manner of
its operation; but it was necessary to seem to know,
and to give a description, as he had alluded to it.
It is, continued he, a horrible instrument; and the
meddler
with constitutions, is in danger of coming under it.
A regular tenor of things is the safest condition. In
order
to be safe from the irons of a saw-mill, let the
unskilful
beware of meddling with the wheels. In the
same manner I may say that the prudent man will
keep aloof at these times, from the danger of
unseasonably
intruding himself as a mender of constitutions
Agreeably to this is the distich of the poet,
Ah me, what perils do environ,
The man that meddles with cold iron.
You enjoy the lucrative office of an auctioneer, and
having
seen a great deal of the world, ought to have begun
to learn that those who advise, have not always the
interest
of those whom they advise, in view. May it not be
in order to serve themselves, and perhaps in the turn of
affairs to get your office, that persons flatter your vanity
as whom it becomes to put yourself at the head of a
reform
in the state? I would not be willing to take an oath
that even some of your own countrymen may not have
sinister ends in view, in putting you upon this project.
For that you are propelled, I am strongly inclined to
think as I have always found you yourself disposed to be
contented with your station, except in cases where the
mistaken notions of others working upon your
inexperience
and mine, have misled our understandings.
These reasonings had weight with the bogtrotter, and
more especially that part of the expostulation which
respected
the danger of the guillotine; for though the mode
of its use was not minutely explained, yet the impression
made, was that of a cutting, or tearing instrument, in
either
case, painful to the patient. But though
intimidated
and of himself disposed to cease his opposition to the
constitution, and his clamour for a reform, yet his
countrymen
out of doors, and others of the multitude desirous
of a change, still continued active at vendues,
particularly
,
to urge the bogtrotter to a perseverance in his
endeavours
in favour of what they called liberty.
There was no station that could put him so much in
the way of being wrought upon by the designing, as that
of auctioneer. For it subjected him to flattery, giving
an opportunity to compliment the strength of his voice,
his vein of humour, which term they could give to his
coarse jokes, and call it wit. The bottle occasionally
going about, as is the custom in the country, at using
which he was no slouch, drew from the croud also much
applause; for in proportion as the cryer was pleased, he
put about the bottle, and it came in the way of the man
that had given the last bid. It was indeed a matter of
complaint against him by those who had articles to sell
that he would suspend the hammer; or as it was a
mallet
that he used, he would stand with it lifted up until
some one had finished what he had to say about the
constitution
.
And instead of announcing the name of the article
put up, and describing its utility, expatiating on its value,
he would forget himself, and instead of a good thing,
this, or that, he would call out, an excellent constitution;
not at half its value; who bids more, another cent buys
the whistle. Three times.
There were petitions for removal on this ground. But
what could the governor do? The mania had become
general. Not an individual that was not affected with
the rage of constitution making: not an occupation in
the exercise of which something relative to amending at
least, the constitution, did not break out in the language
that was used. It was not alone in the case of the
auctioneer
,
that such a derangement as it might be called,
had begun to shew itself; but with persons in almost
every other employment. The common mechanic, and
labourer were led away both in speaking and acting, with
an enthusiasm for a change of constitution.
I saw a smith stand with his hammer thus:
The whilst his iron did on the anvil cool.
With open mouth swallowing, the news about a
change of constitution.
A tailor was asked what he was now making? He
said a suit of constitution.
A tinker what he was now mending? He said the
constitution.
All that could write had drawn up forms; all that
could not write, had meditated forms, and were reciting
them to their neighbours. It was amusing to attend to
the various suggestions of the fancy of these
improvisatori
;
or extempore makers of constitutions. Some
proposed
for an article, the having a provision to fatten hogs
without corn; and it was in vain to explain to them that
this did not depend upon the constitution of the
government
;
but on that of the hog. Some wanted chickens
hatched without eggs: others, harvests raised without
the trouble of sewing seed. All were for an
amelioration
of things in the natural or moral world.
A groupe had got together at a distillery; and were
endeavouring to put into words, what they would wish
with regard to the article of extracting more whiskey
out of a bushel of grain. But they were not all of them
in a capacity to articulate the article just then, and so
it fell through for that time.
In order to acquire knowledge on the subject of
constitutions
,
where any one entertained a suspicion that he
had not sufficient information, which was a rare case,
he applied himself to study the hiding places, or
edifices
of beasts and birds. For instinct was surer than
reason. One man of very honest investigation, was stung
in the face as he was inspecting a wasps' nest, and his face
became much swollen, and was kept in countenance only
by another who was in something of the same plight,
from a hive of bees into which he had thrust his nose.
That republic being much celebrated, it was thought
the purest model that could be studied. A diligent
observer of the flight of wild geese, and of the
manner
in which one stands sentry for the flock when
they alight to feed, drew thence what he thought a good
lesson towards qualifying him for the task of new
modeling
a frame of government. But the play upon the
word goose which this naturally drew upon him, threw
it into ridicule. For it was observed that he must be a
goose who would think of modeling a constitution after
geese. By others it was called a wild goose chase that
he was upon, and little attention was paid to his draught.
M 2
CHAPTER VIII.
IN this phrenzy of the public mind, it is not to be
dissembled that the most active of the constitution
menders
,
were those who had ruined their own constitution,
or that of their estates. It was observable also, that
emigrants from beyond seas; and especially from the
green Isle of Erin, were the most forward in offering
themselves for this service. Not knowing the trouble
of making a constitution, they thought it light work;
being in the habit of calling out against the existing
government at home, they did not distinguish that
partiality
which the people here must have for the work
of their own hands, and their unwillingness to have
assistance
not asked but forced upon them. At all events,
supposing them justifiable in the innovation, it cannot
be maintained that the volunteers were altogether
discreet
,
in the time of undertaking it.
A number of these who had come from the county
Monaghan, and other places, being together singing Erin
go brah, and talking politics, the governor having
actually
a regard for them, as a well meaning, but
impetuous
multitude, thought proper to address them, and
remonstrate
against their proceedings. A minute of his
discourse has been given me, and I have set it down
here to diversify the narration.
Gentlemen of the bogs, said he, or green hills of Erin:
for in the geography of your country, you talk of bogs;
but in your songs we hear of nothing but hillsFor that
reason, I shall speak of hills
Gentlemen of the green hills of Erin, when I cast my
eye over the Atlantic Ocean, or rather cast it upon the
map, I see your island like an emerald as you call it, set
in the waves. It is a pretty little spot, on the face of
the earth, I was going to say, but rather as I ought to
say, face of the water. Of the internal geography I do
not know much, but I have heard of Limerick, and
Drogheda
,
and Sligo, and other placesThe Cunabula
gentium
the birth place of your parentage. But as to
those, I have not much attended to them; my
attachment
is chiefly to the history of the people. I know
your origin if I am to believe some, and I am inclined to
believe them, that you are of Punic origin, that you
have in you the blood of the Asdrubals, and Hamilcars,
and Hannibals of antiquity. But as the poet says,
Genus, et proavos, et qu non fecimus ipsi,
Vix ea nostra voco.
I set more store by what has been done upon your island
in the persons of your immediate progenitors. I am
not unacquainted with the fame of many great
characters
;
Fin M`Coul, and Brian Borumy, and others. But
for your divisions in your own country, you might have
been England, and England Ireland. And though
insinuations
have been made by writers of a proneness to
rob on the highways by some of you, I do not wonder at
there being some truth in this. It cannot be a matter of
surprize, if after the military spirit of a people has
subsided
by subjugation, it should break out into petty
robberies
of the proud victor, and a disposition should remain
for a long time, to indemnify ones' self at the expense of
the conquerors, for the loss of private fortune. What
could have been expected of those who were expelled
from the north of your country, the four counties of
Ulster
,
but that they would turn free-booters? I find no fault
with the opposition made to the government of
England
;
for you have been oppressed by it; and I do not
wonder that a reform was thought of, and zealously
attempted
by the governor of the country. Though I do
not altogether approve the irregular, and consequently
useless, disturbances by hearts of oak, as they were
called
;
hearts of steel, white boys, break o' day boys, who
broke the peace of the country. For of what avail is
disjointed opposition; partial insurrections, which like
the struggles of beasts of burden, serve but the more to
intangle, and furnish a reason, or at least a pretence for
weightier chains, and stronger gearing for the future?
For you see that however good your cause, and I will
acknowledge that it is my opinion there could not have
been a better, yet from immature exertions, and a want
of concert, some of you have been under the necessity of
absconding, and others of you have been shot. Those of
you who have come to this country ought to distinguish
circumstances. You have no doubt meditated much, the
greater part of you upon political establishments; but
it is not a Lycurgus, or a Solon that is wanted so much
at this time, as cultivators of the soil. The
constitution
that is already framed may do awhile until we get
more ground cleared, and fences put in repair. You
will not for a moment entertain the suspicion that I
undervalue your capacity for these things; but I make
a quere with regard to the expediency of the occasion.
You have all heard of what has happened in the
neighbouring
country of France, from instability in
government
and from a change of constitution. The guillotine
was the result, you have all heard of the guillotine.
The croud, or some one in the croud, acknowledged
that they had heard of the guillotine; but had not a
perfect
knowledge or clear conception of what it was.
It is, continued the governor, a machine which works
as I understand it, something like a farmer's cutting box.
But the noise resembles that of a forge hammer, or a
slitting mill.
Governor, replied an orator, it is not the sound of
iron, or the working of hand saws, that would intimidate
an Irishman; nor is it that we think we can make a
better constitution than the one that is made, or set up
a better government than that of which your honour is the
worthy representative, and chief magistrate. But just
coming to the country, we like to be concerned in what
is going forward. When we see the game played we
like to take a hand. Nor is it we alone that are moving
in the matter. It is your own people that have been
bred and born in the country, that make the most ado.
We only come in to take a lift at the log; just as our
forefathers did in the war, that is past, where some of
us were shot as well as yourselves. Having cleared the
ground of the British, along wid you, we are entitled to
the raising a cabin on the spot; you may call it a
constitution
,
or what you please. But all we want is a bit
of ground to set potatoes and to plant cabbage, with the
free use of the shilelah into the bargain, as we had it in
our own country.
That being the case, said the governor, the
constitution
that you have, will answer every purpose. It is for
securing you in your possessions; and the free use of the
shilelah subordinate to no law but that of the country,
that the constitution has been framed. But for the
constitution
and the laws, what would you differ from the
racoons and opossums of the woods? It is this which
makes all the
difference that we find between man and
beast.
This was an unfortunate expression of the governor, and
gave countenance to the theory that had begun to prevail
about this time, that there was no radical difference
between man and beast. And of this we may hear
more in the subsequent chapters of this book. But not
being in a hurry with this narrative, we shall not go
on with the history of this phrenzy of imagination just
immediately. It is time to rest a while; that is, to dip
the pen till one looks about and reflects upon what
has gone before, and may come after. What that may be
I cannot well tell; for though I have all the matter of
the book in my head, I have not arranged it in the series
and juncture of the particulars, so that I can tell before
hand what will come next. My pen moves almost
involuntarily
,
from the mere habit of writing; like people
that speak without being aware of what they say. And
this unconcern arises from a consciousness that I have
no harm in my mind, and therefore there can come none
out; I mean, actual and intentional harm. If the
maxim
is true, quod non habet, non dabit, I can give no
offence
to any one, for I mean none. For notwithstanding
all that has been said, or suspected, I never had a single
individual in my mind, in characters I have drawn, but
have been dipping my pen simply in the inkstand of
human
nature. If any man sees himself in this glass,
tanquam
in speculum, it is his own fault to put his face
near it. For, it is not my intention to put the glass to
him. I will acknowledge that a principal object with
me is amusement, and I would hope to keep it
innocent
,
if I cannot make it useful, and I do not see why it
may not be considered as having the like chance for
this, with the fable of Menenius Agrippa about the belly
and its members; or any of those which are
called
sop's, under the similitude of beasts, and birds
speaking. But be as it may, if we should miss the
mark, all that can be said, is, that if we mean instruction,
we have but an aukward way of conveying it.
But call it even our own amusement alone that we have
in view. it is a picture of human nature, from childhood
to old age; from the baby-house to the laying out
money
in bank stock; or the purchasing land for which
the owner has no occasion. It all goes to engage, and
employ the mind, whether it is throwing a long bullet,
or drawing up an address to the President of the United
States. Our hands must be employed, or our minds.
And this I take to be a great cause of the restlessness of
a man in society, or out of itthe activity of the mental
powers. And in proportion as a man has less or more
of the vis inerti, in that proportion is he locomotive,
or stationary.
Thady O`Conor had taken the benefit of the insolvent act;
nevertheless he was an honest man, for he had nothing
that he did not surrender, never having had any thing to
surrender, unless his brogues in Ireland; which though
they might be considered as still his property, yet they
were not in his possession, having fallen from his feet, as
he made his escape from sheep stealing in the old
country
,
and so left behind when he came to this. He had
imposed upon the captain of a vessel, by telling him
that he was a nephew of general Washington, and would
have his passage paid for him three times over, the
moment
he arrived. But no president Washington, or any
for him, appearing to claim him as a relation, the
Captain
was at a loss what to do with him, and while he was
deliberating, Thady made a shift to do something for
himself; and making his escape from the vessel, had
been some years sojourning in the country, and at last
got into jail, from which he had not found it convenient
to escape, and so paid his debt with a ticket as the phrase
is and being liberated by due course of law, he set out
for the new settlement, of which he had heard. He was
for a new constitution, and swelled the squad of
malecontents
with the administration of the government. He
was chosen for a convention, as soon as it had been agreed
upon, that there should be one.
FRAGMENTS.
WHAT is the reason that there is usually more
talent
in a new settlement than in an old? Is it the fact?
That would lead to a discussion of some delicacy, in our
republic, and induce comparison, which, according to the
proverb,
is odious.
But there is doubtless some ground
for the assertion, that our best generals, and ablest
orators
in congress, have come from the west, or been of the
new states. As to generals, Harrison, Brown, and
Jackson
might be mentioned. As to orators, we have had
Patrick Henry, of a frontier in Virginia; and I might
mention one of my own name of Kentucky, though he
spelt it Breckenridge as my father did; but thinking
him wrong I altered it, because I found the bulk of the
same stock spelt it so; and particularly doctor
Brackenridge
of the philosophical society in London. Clay,
Crawford, &c. of the congress in later times, are
examples
.
But supposing it the fact, can I assign the cause?
It is sometimes
accident.
Sallust in his introduction to
the Bellum Catalinarium, asks, How came it, that the
Roman
state rose to such eminence, the Greeks being
before
it in arts, and the Gauls in valour? Reflecting on
the subject, he resolves it into the circumstance of a few
great men having arisen in it.
Nevertheless, though it may be sometimes a matter of
casualty, yet it would seem to me that it cannot well be
otherwise, but that in new countries the human genius
will receive a spring, which it cannot have in the old.
But the cause lies deeper; and in this, that the
strongest
minds, and the most enterprising, go there. They
are thrown upon the vigour of their own intellect. Why
is it that subterranean fire bursts from the earth, but
because
it has an energy that breaks through obstructions,
and ascends to a higher element? The plodding cub
stays at home, while the more active tatterdemalion, quits
his paternal roof, and goes to build a cabin, and make a
new roof for himself, in the wild woods of Tennessee, or
elsewhere. The same elasticity and spirit of mind, which
brought him there, gives him distinction where he is.
The independence of his situation contributes to this;
fettered by no obligation, and kept down by no
superiority
of standing. Why is it in the arts, that an age of great
men cannot but be succeeded by an inferiority of
powers
?
This holds true in poetry, which is the province of
the imagination. Why did the slaves, on a certain
occasion
,
defy the swords of their masters, but yielded to
their whips? It was owing to the subjugation of habit.
People accustomed to feel superiority in a certain way,
are discouraged in their efforts.
The streams of a new country are more abundant, and
the springs burst more plentifully. This is owing to
the shades which hang over them; which not only
render
their margins and fountain heads more pleasing, but
serve to protect from the exhaling heat, and conciliate
dews, and the moisture of the clouds. Hence it is, that
it is greatly blameable to cut down the trees about a spring
head; or, if it can be dispensed with, the grove on the
hill above. For these wonderfully contribute to
preserve
the abundance of the current; and the perennial
flow. It is for this reason I was delighted with the
cascades
of a new country, tumbling over rocks; because
when one thinks of bathing, there are mossy banks to
strip upon, and deep shades to embower, and conceal
from the nymphs. For one is not afraid of any one else
there, unless, perhaps, a young girl looking after cows,
who would not much mind it, being used to see people
without much covering to their carcases, nor much
caring
whether they have any. For it is in cities and the
abodes of luxury and false taste, where we depart most
from the simplicity of Eve in paradise, who
Clouted Adam's grey breeks,
or pantaloons, when he had a pair.
I feel the grandeur of these water falls, and at the
same time have a sense of the salubrity of the
immersion
.
For I take the application of cold water to the body
in hot seasons, to be not only pleasant, but wonderfully
medical. The effusion of cold water removes heat, and
by the direct action which we call a shock, braces the
system.
The
visionary philosopher having put himself at
the head of an institution for teaching beasts, had
collected
sundry of what he thought the most docile animals.
He had in his academy, as it might be called, under
scholastic
discipline, a baboon, a pet squirrel, a young bear,
and half a dozen pigs, &c. &c. The squirrel, as in the
case of young masters, with the sons of rich people, he
encouraged, or coaxed, to get his task by giving him
nuts to crack; and the pigs, by throwing them rinds of
pompions, or parings of apples; the bear and the baboon,
in like manner, by something in their way; and so with
all the others. Some he intimidated by the ferule and
the birch. He was instructing them according to the
Lancastrian mode, or method, to make marks on sand,
and to write before they began to read.
Things were going on very well to all appearance, and
to the satisfaction of the tutor, when a catastrophe which
now took place brought the matter to a conclusion. It
was not from the lady who had brought the pet squirrel
to be taught, though she had expressed some impatience
at the favourite not making a more rapid progress,
because
she was sure it had genius. But she had
forbidden
the professor to use the rod; and what ground could
she have to expect a close application, and a quickness
of perception without a stimulus to the mind, by the
feelings of the body? However, it was not from the lady
taking away her scholar, or that of any of the other
employers
and subscribers withdrawing their rabbits or
other students, but from that wicked fellow, Will
Watlin
,
followed by Harum Scarum with a switch, who,
breaking
into the
menagerie,
exclaimed to the professor, or
principal; it is not of much consequence now which he
is called; What, said he to the master of the hall, is it in
imitation of your pupils, that you are here in your bare
buff? Sans culottes, have you nothing to cover your
nakedness
?
Had you put yourselves in your sherryvallies,
or overalls, there would have been some decency.
Every thing is French now-a-days. Is it French that
you are teaching these to speak, or write? I see a
baboon
there; Lewis, I suppose is his name. He will learn
French fast enough, if that is all you have put upon his
hands. He was a Frenchman as far back as Arbuthnot.
The squirrel may chatter something, and it may sound
to us like French. Do you mean to make the bear a
parlez-vous
?
Vol. IV. N
No wonder that the two John Bulls, senior
and junior, the Old and the New England, should talk of
French influence.
Do you expect your pigs will be
made officers under Bonaparte, interpreters, perhaps?
I would have you know that we have too much French
amongst us already. If the French should come over
to us in an oyster-shell; for I do not see what else they
have to come over in; and this they could not do, unless
like Scotch witches, there might be some use in currying
favour with Napoleon.
But is the discipline of your school correct, even if
there was something to be taught that would be of use,
in science, in agriculture, or in commerce. Do you
instruct
them in history and good breeding? To keep
their persons clean, to pare their nails, and shave their
beards, those of them that are grown gentlemen? That
fellow there, the racoon, does not appear to me to have
had his beard shaved these two weeks. It is true, I do not
see any of them with a cigar in his teeth, like the
American
monkies and opossums, the greater part of them
of a bad family education; and so farewell. But that
mongrel between the terrier and the pointer breed, with
a collar on his neck, may be said to have a collar without
a shirt to it. I am tired of these remarks; away with
you, away.
With that, Will Watlin drawing his watlin, and
Harum
Scarum using his switch, they began to lay about
them. The monkey leaped; the pigs squealed; the
squirrel chattered, and ran into his cage; the bear
growled
;
the pointer howled, &c. &c. &c. The education
was thus interrupted, and the institution broken up.
The
bog-trotter complaining of neglect; alleging
his services at the original establishment of the
government
in
trailing a pine log,
and thereby intimidating the
populace at his coming to the settlement, the governor
was constrained to give him an office; and selecting one
for which he thought he might be, in some respects,
qualified, he made him an
auctioneer.
It could not be
said that he had not a pretty strong voice; and in
knocking
down an article with his mallet,
once, twice, tree
times,
with the assistance of a clerk, the sales were
pretty
rapidly effected. Occasionally he made a blunder, as
knocking down a frying pan, and at another time a brass
kettle, he rung too long, because the sound pleased him.
He alleged that a hive of bees had swarmed, and he was
wringing to get them to cluster. All agreed that he
made a pretty good vendue master; but still he was not
satisfied; and an ambassador being about to be
appointed
to the Barbary powers, he was willing to go to
Algiers
Tunis, or Tripoli. His friends favoured his
pretension
,
Thady O`Connor, and some others, who had an
expectation of accompanying him; Thady as secretary,
and others in different offices. The governor resisted
the application on the ground that one office was enough
at a time. His resignation even would not justify it;
because
it would look as if there was a
penury of men of
talents,
when it behooved to take one from his duty, as if
another person could not be found who was as well
qualified
.
The junto, and Teague himself, spoke of the
appointment
of John Jay to the court of London, while he
was chief justice, not resigning; and of Ellsworth, also
a chief justice, in a similar situation; and of Albert
Gallatin
,
who was secretary, and continuing such; yet
maugre
all the clamour, and even good grounds, as
Jefferson
and Madison, and others thought, he, the said
Albert
was appointed by the said Madison to an
embassy
.
These things were all wrong, said the governor. I
do not mean the finding fault, but the doing that with
which the fault was found.
Could Washington do wrong? said a stickler on the
side of the bog-trotter. Yes, said the governor, and
Adams too. These were the bad
precedents
that
Madison
followed. I shall not copy after; not questioning
but that these treaty-making people might be very
capable
,
or perhaps the most capable; but were they the
only
persons to be found that were adequate to the task?
I will not say but that my bog-trotter might make a very
good ambassador, with instructions, and the advantage
of a secretary; but is Teague O`Regan alone, in all the
land, to be singled out for this trust? After searching the
whole country from Dan to Beer-sheba, can I find no
other that can sustain the weight of this negociation?
If I do appoint him, he must resign his place as
auctioneer
,
and does he know that the Algerines are
Turks? and if he goes there, I mean to the Barbary coast,
he must be circumcised, and loose
Loose what? said Thady O`Connor.
I will not say what, said the governor; but you may
guess.
There is more effect in a hint, than when the story is
spoken out; and therefore Thady, and the auctioneer
also, their imagination outrunning their judgment, and
their fears their ambition, concluded it would be best to
stick to the hammer, and for Teague to remain a crier
of vendues, and Thady O`Connor clerk.
I have
often thought, that if a president of the
United States in our time, had a
Jewish prophet
to
denounce
to the people, their
political transgressions;
that
is to say, the swerving from the true faith; in other
words, his
own party;
how much more secure his
standing
would be; how much less vexed by the calumny of
editors, and paragraphs in gazettes. Among the
Britons
,
the aborigines or early inhabitants, the druids, did
not denounce much; but what they lacked in speaking,
they paid away in acting; and a disturber of the
government
being pointed out by these, it was not long before
he was in an
ozier creel;
the Simulacra contexta
viminibus
,
and his breath extinguished by the flame.
Would it not have been possible for president
Madison
,
for the $50,000 paid to Henry, to have secured as
many of the New England clergy in his favour, as would
have made them act as druidical priests in support of
his administration? I cannot, say I would wish to see the
wicker basket
introduced; but I was thinking of the
effect
of the practicability of establishing something that
would be in lieu of it: that is,
the influence
of the
priesthood
;
but not in the same way. Pulpit denunciations
have a prodigious effect to the eastward. It is no
wonder
that the religious functionaries of that part of the
union have made a noise, both before and since the war.
If they really believed, and it is possible they did, that
Bonaparte had transmitted several tons of
French crowns
to the United States; finding that none of them
came
their way,
what wonder if they became dissentients to the
war? Madison should have made a point of securing at
least a majority of these congregationalists. It was upon
this rock the witches split, in not having secured
Cotton
Mather,
when they made their descent upon New
England
.
The consequence was, that an uproar was raised
against them; and they were hanged, and drowned, till
the people began to be satisfied that there was not a witch
left; and for a plain reason, because
there never had been
one. If the people were not satisfied at this, yet certain
it is, they ought to have beenso saith the writer of this
book. But I will not take a bible oath upon it, that there
are not John Bulls in that quarter, as true as ever crost
the ocean, and were imported to this country.
Take
the individual man, and how difficult it is to
form him. Between the boy, and the man it is the most
difficult to govern him; from the time, that the voice
begins to break the
treble
of
the puerile
age to the
counter
of that of manhood. Here we have to do with
the
confidence
of feeling some power of mind, and the
insolence
of
inexperience.
It is the same with men in a
state of society. A constitution has been framed; it is
impossible to convince them that they cannot make a
better. The young, as they grow up, despise what has
gone before them. They are sanguine of temperament,
and take it for granted that the world has never seen
such a creature as they are, before. That whatever
errors others have committed, in the like situation, they
will have the judgment to avoid. It is not until by
disappointment
,
and the vexation attendant upon it, that
they can be brought to know themselves, and to rate
their natural talents, and their discretion at a lower
estimate
.
A man must be forty years of age, said lord
treasurer Burleigh before he begins to suspect that he is
a fool, and fifty before he knows it. It is on the same
principle that an individual must have lived a long time
in a republic before he can be a republican. Some have
gone so far as to say, he must have been born and brought
up under a republican government, to have the habits
and way of thinking of a republican. Rollin, I think it
is, who says, he must at least have lived fifty years
before
he is fit to be trusted with affairs.
N 2
There is more in age as a qualification, for the right of
suffrage;
or the right of
delegation, than in that of
property
REAL or PERSONAL.
The longevity of our
republic
will depend upon there being an amendment of
this nature. Young cocks should never be heard to
crow in the senate house, or young whelps to bark. It
is true the Scripture says,
Bray a fool in
a mortar, and
he will not be wise. All length of time and all
experience
of consequences from his own errors, will not
correct. But he must be a fool indeed, an idiot, that
will not derive some advantage from
what he has seen
and suffered.
When a member has made a speech in
a deliberative body, of some hours continuance, and finds
that he
grows no taller in reputation,
and which he will,
in
due time
discover, he will not be unwilling to
abridge
his ventriloquy on other occasions: for I call
it ventriloquy; it deserves no better name. There
were two Raneys here, some years ago,
ventriloquists.
If we had them in congress to imitate jay-birds, and
amuse
the members, till a decent time had passed to let
the question be put, it might be an improvement: I say
a decent time, because appearances would be saved, and
as
we on the bench
have an advisari vult sometimes out of
courtesy to the counsel as if the argument on the wrong
side had nevertheless puzzled us, so civility to
adversaries
is not altogether lost, by affecting to think the
matter
not just as plain as a pikestaff: you may conciliate,
and gain attention when you are wrong yourselves, that
is when
they think you wrong.
There
is no moral truth, the weight of which can
be felt without experience. What do I mean by moral
truth? I mean that which depends upon the nature of
man, and is the foundation of his actions. Who would
comprehend without feeling it, that it is of all things the
most difficult to govern men? The most simple way,
and doubtless the most effectual, is the same by which
you would govern a beast; the
bridle and the whip.
An
individual
at the head of an
organization
may command
millions, and keep them in subjection: but in this case,
no one can be allowed a will of his own, to the smallest
extent. If the
two legged
thing that calls himself a man
under such a government, should attempt to
speak or act
for himself, off his head goes, scalp and all, and there is
an end of the disturbance. There is one way, which is
to let the multitude alone altogether, and then there is
anarchy, or no government. If you let them
alone
,
it does not suit very well, for in that case, they rob;
and there being no security, there is no industry; and
consequently no improvement in the arts, or amelioration
in the condition of man. If you undertake to restrain
their passions, how will you go about it; but by force or
persuasion? Persuasion will go but a little way with a
man that is hungry to hinder him from puting his paw
upon whatever eatable there is before him. It must be,
therefore,
force.
All government must be therefore
founded in
fear.
It is but a conceit in Montesquieu, to
found a republic upon the principle of
virtue;
a
monarchy
upon that of honour; and a despotism upon that of
fear.
Fear, is the foundation of government, of man, as
much as of a horse, or an ass. The great secret is to
govern him, not just as you would a beast; but by
the fear
of suffering a distant evil.
The reason and reflection of
a man can comprehend this; that of a beast not so much.
What we have seen in this new settlement, is a
picture of the credulity, and restlessness of man, and
his constant struggle to break through that organization of
power
by which he is restrained from that to which his
passions
prompt. He will endeavour to break through, by
talking of changing the modes of government. But it is
not the mode, but the being governed at all that
displeases
him. A
constitution
is that organization by
which a man is governed
by rules that apply to every
individual of the community;
and from which no one
is exempt, but all bound to obey. This is what is called
a republican government. The changing a constitution
begets the desire of change, and like a dislocated bone,
must produce a
weak joint.
It ought to be some great
defect that would justify a change. The one half the
effect of laws or general rules, is the being acted under.
It injures a saddle horse to put him in harness; because
he must change his gaits.
The governor had acquired considerable authority
over this mob, by the intimidation of scalping, and I take
it he will speak in a more decisive tone, and act with
proportioned firmness in the future exigencies of the
commonwealth. Fraud is sometimes called, pia fraus,
because it is a deception of the people for their own good.
But fraud is not admissible, but on the gound that they
are in a temporary phrensy, and
not in a condition to hear
reason.
A book
entitled,
Incidents of the insurrection in
the western parts of Virginia and Pennsylvania,
in the
year 1794, gives a picture of a people broke loose from
the restraints of government, and going
farther than they
had intended to go.
If that book was republished at this
time, and circulated in the
Eastern states,
it could not
but contribute to shew
the danger of even talking of a
severance of the union, or an opposition to the laws.
The bulk will take one another to be in earnest in these
matters, when individually, they never thought of
carrying
the project farther than talk. It is not a want of
understanding
that prompts dissatisfaction in this part of the
republic, but a
want of self-denial, and humility.
Doubtless
it may be said that Virginia, though she has ore of a
good quality,
has wrought her mine too much,
in
protruding
presidents; and there is no intelligent man, but will
approve of an amendment to the constitution of the
United States, to remedy such engrossing in time to
come; but they will support the administration, since it
is the will of the majority for the time being.
An error
in the
expedient,
and this could be considered only an
error in what was
expedient,
is a small matter compared
with a violation of
principle.
Opposition to an
administration
,
is an error in principle, and may lead, though not
intended by the actors, to the
destruction of the machine.
If, in giving a picture of a Hartford convention, in the
narrative of the proceedings of the new settlement, I
should, in due time, have a convention here too, I will
have no
chaplains,
because it looks like a burlesque; and
it would be ten to one, if the governor could keep Teague
O`Regan from being one of them. If the people would
insist upon it, how could he help it? The
Reverend
Teague O`Regan,
I presume, he must then be called, to
give the greater solemnity to his function; but this very
designation would but increase the farce.
I wonder what business our legislative bodies, of the
individual states; or governors, or congress, or
presidents
have with proclaiming
days
of festivity, or
humiliation
which ought to be left to the societies of
religious
denominations. It savours of hypocrisy for the
temporal
power to interfere.
CHAPTER IX.
THADY O`Connor found a cousin here, Tom
Snilloch
;
a cousin by the mother's side, a half breed. He
appeared a good deal bloated; which besposke high
feeding
and intemperance in drink. The history of this man
was singular. He had been an oastler; or, as it is
spelled
,
ostler, and pronounced hostler, to a counsellor
Otterborn
a man of great eminence in his profession. The
counsellor having to go to attend the courts for some
time, and taking his horse with him, Snilloch, who was
left behind, had no currying to do. But not willing to
be idle, he took possession of the office, and the
counsellor's
books. The clients calling, he passed for a
partner
and gave advice and took fees. The counsellor
returning
,
he set up for himself, and said he had studied at
the temple, and practised in the four courts of Dublin.
Business fell into his hands without seeking it, and every
one that had a suit in court were anxious to engage
lawyer
Snilloch. He took care not to write out opinions;
for it was not a clear case, that he could write. But he
was what you call an off-hand lawyer; and though his
oratory was not very intelligible, yet it had much pathos,
and was said to be accompanied with the action of
Curran
.
It was not astonishing, that he ran away with the
whole business from the old counsellor, whom he
affected
to undervalue and despise, as one who could speak
nothing but common sense, while what he said was real
law, and had nothing to do with sense. By de holy
fader
,
he would say, every man can talk sense, but de law
is de ting.
So it was that his reputation grew; and though what
he said, was as unintelligible as a Delphic oracle, yet the
response was as much respected. He purchased lands,
though I cannot say he paid for them: he bought a
house; married a wife; set up a carriage; and
had the
judges to dine with him when they came to the circuit,
and sometimes to sup.
Who but the great counsellor
Snilloch! He might alter, or withdraw records; make
affidavits for his own use; no question being asked in
the case of a man of such high standing in society.
All that the poor counsellor, Otterborn, who was left
starving, could do, was to turn poet. This he did, and
consoled himself with writing a ballad upon Tom. As a
specimen of the
border minstrelsey
of this time, we give
it here.
A BALLAD, TO THE TUNE OF
I sing a song of six-pence,
A pocket full of pins.
TOM RASCAL, OR RASCAL TOMA BALLAD.
I sing a song of rascal Tom;
Tom rascal, do ye see;
And when you meet a rascal man,
Just sing the song with me.
This Teague not many years ago,
Came with his broguery,
From Dublin city, where he had been,
Before he cross'd the sea.
What had he done, or what had not,
No matter, for he's here;
He said he was a lawyer bred,
Which look'd a little queer.
But no one ever doubted much,
He had been at the bar;
Though what his
standing
there had been,
They did not know, nor care.
But if he was a lawyer bred,
He had not read the books;
And scarce could make himself a pair,
Of hangers and pot-hooks.
No matter what his learning was,
Nor what his share of sense;
He had what did to set him up,
A stock of impudence.
Nor did he let his talent sleep,
Or in a napkin hide;
But put it out to usury,
With fortune on his side.
No more he'll trot by Allen bog;
Bog-trotter there awhile;
He has a better trotting place,
The Alleghany soil.
Some say he has a tract or two,
He now can call his own;
No more beholding for a place,
To shake his brogue upon.
Not as it was in Dublin town,
And many such are there;
Where, had he stay'd, he might have gone,
To shake a brogue on air.
Was it by pleading, that the 'squire,
Made out to make his jack?
As well you might expect a cow,
To give you latin back.
The ways are more than one, you know,
The mower whets his scythe;
But how to whet it, there is none
Can tell until he try'th.
No matter how you money make,
Provided that you make:
The less you have of character,
The less you have at stake.
I only dread that those may hear,
The luck, and cross with speed,
From Dublin or from Drogheda,
To overstock the breed.
So have I seen a vermin hous'd
Soon followed by a score;
And what will be, we best can tell,
From what has been before.
Lavater had a happy knack,
Of telling to keep clear,
Of such as might impose themselves,
Like Monsieur Braganeer;
Cou'd read the faces, and take a hint
From brow, or lurid eye,
And made a book, and called it, of
The physiognomy.
He seem'd just like a famished bird
In snow time, when he came;
The people gave him oats to peck,
And many were to blame.
We thought he had a partridge track,
But he turn'd out a crow,
Or harpy, in old times the bird
That plagued the people so.
I wish I had an Ovid here,
To change him to a bat,
Provided that he had no wings,
To keep him from the cat.
For some have been transmogrified,
And are not what they were;
Vol. IV. O
If he was made a whip-poor will,
The change would make him stare.
When Don Quevedo was in hell,
He saw two devils busy,
In carrying in a rogue or so,
And here and there a huzzy.
But saw two others fast asleep,
And had been so full long,
With cobwebs overgrown their mouths,
The rubbish there among.
They had been lawyer-carriers once,
No use now for the elves,
The lawyers of the later date,
Come fast enough themselves.
I wish these devils were awake,
And had a mind to come;
I'd give them more than they would ask,
To carry off our Tom.
A gally-nipper could be spar'd
From the musqueto race,
And the extinction of a fly
Would make the evil less.
But nature has her lurking views,
In breeding many things,
The use of which we do not see,
Or why she gives them wings.
The very sky itself has got
A scorpion and a crab;
As you yourself may ascertain,
By help of Astrolabe.
But why allude to similies,
Or metamorphoses,
Or caricatura that we hate,
Of his immortal phiz.
When circuit judges come to town
They'll surely taste his wine,
And were he even Cerberus,
Would not refuse to dine.
But such the world in which we live,
And such the state of things,
Republican the government,
Or under mighty kings,
The worthless will have countenance,
The worthy be depressed;
Which having said, enough is said,
So let the matter rest.
But Tom has eat and drank so much,
And guzzled so much wine,
That em bon point, as Frenchmen say,
It makes his visage shine.
His dewlap it hangs down like clout,
Or wallet under chin,
Would do to make an apron of
To put his luggage in.
His goitre is not from the air,
Or water we have here;
And guttling that gives him a throat,
And dewlap looks so queer.
The case has ever been the fact,
Since Brutus did exclaim,
Virtue I have followed thee,
But found an empty name.
Nay, long before, it was the case
Since Lumeck was a lad,
For all you got by being good,
You might as well be bad.
I grant you may not go so far
As matter that will hang,
But any thing just short of this,
May take within your fang.
The judges supping with the great lawyer Snilloc,
who had made an immense fortune at the bar, had this
ballad recited to them; Tom himself producing it, as the
effusion of that contemptible mortal, counsellor
Otterborn
.
The judges laughed immoderately, and shook
their sides; because, when a person is at the table of
another, it behooves him to laugh at what is thought
ridiculous
.
Snilloc anticipating the judges, who might
hear of the ballad, thought it advisable to bring it forward
himself as a good joke.
But these things did not last always. Tom had
recovered
money that he could not pay over; he had
contracted
debts that he could not discharge; and in his
dealings
was found to be a rogue. People began to suspect
that it was not for
building churches
that he had left
Ireland
,
especially as he had not discovered much
inclination
to build any here. He became insolvent; and the
alternative was to go to jail, or, as the phrase is, to
cut
and run.
He chose the latter; and was now with his
cousin in these woods.
CHAPTER X.
WILL Snickley had come to these woods, a short
time before Tom Snilloc. Snickley had absconded on
account of a duel in which he had been second, and in
which the principal was killed. For though not valiant
himself, Will Snickley,
could be the cause of valour in
other men.
Not altogether destitute of ingenuity, and
where he had to do with a simpleton, sufficiently
successful
,
this
Snickley
attacks an
unsuspecting man
in
the Gazette; whom he advises to
cowskin
the
Journalist
.
It is done; and the Journalist challenges. The
unsuspecting man declines, because the Journalist had
shewn himself a blackguard. But that the
unsuspecting
man might have no excuse, a red hot Irishman is
prompted to offer himself, as no man could dispute,
but that he was a gentleman;
Snickley in the mean time
offering himself to be his second. The unsuspecting man
could not well tell what to do, and was under the
necessity
of accepting; and being in love with a young lady,
took her brother, a young man, for his second. It was
proposed that an apology should be made which
Snickley
drew up, and couched in such terms, that it became
impossible for the
unsuspecting man
challenged to adopt.
Snickley took care to have the Irishman's pistol loaded
skilfully, and having the first fire, shot the unsuspecting
man dead.
So much for
seconds;
who, from what little I have
seen of the matter, if not the instigators of the duel, are
seldom without blame in not taking due pains to
compose
the difference. A man of
sense,
and
humanity,
in the capacity of second, will insist upon an
investigation
of the cause of quarrel; and if the actor who has
called upon him, is in fault, he will dictate his apology
accordingly. The seconds on both sides being thus
disposed
;
and I assume it that on both sides they are
men of sense and humanity, a contest of this nature, will
never terminate fatally, and seldom without a
reconciliation
.
I own it to be,
in most instances,
the
weakness,
or
wickedness of seconds, that occasions it to happen
otherwise
.
From my own experience, I could give a hint to
a young man just going into the world, that in all
probability
O 2
would save him from being challenged, or being
insulted, and reduced to the necessity of challenging
himself. This does not consist altogether in having good
pistols, or practising with pistols, and having the
reputation
of a good shot; for this is what is known to every one,
as a preservative against the injuries, and insults of
Ruffians
.
But the secret I would communicate, is, the
concealment
of your dislike to duelling, or the being
principled
against it;
for on letting that out,
every villain
will be endeavouring to make what he will call a
character
,
at your expence.
He will insult, or challenge,
believing
that this may be done without risk to his
carcase
.
A surgeon of the British navy, happening, after
the revolutionary war, to settle in the same town with me,
and being intelligent, I cultivated his society, and
conversation
for some time. But hearing him declare
himself
a duellist, and the little hesitation, he would have to
give, or accept a challenge, I thought proper to draw off,
and to avoid as much as possible, occasions of being in
his company. This he appeared to feel very sensibly;
and addressing me, wished to know my reason. I stated
candidly my apprehensions of giving him offence
inadvertently
,
some moment when I might be off my guard;
and that as I must count upon a challenge in that case, I
thought it prudent to forego the pleasure of his society,
for my own safety.
I will tell you, said he;
I am a small man, and not
of great bodily strength;
and did I not hold out the
idea of fire arms, I could not protect myself. But I will
let you into the secret; I am the arrantest coward on the
face of this earth, so that you need be under no
apprehension
from my duelling. It is all to keep those that
are stronger, from knocking me down, that I affect
courage
.
Snickley did not stay a long time in these woods. He
returned to the old settlement; and the matter blew over.
Party
supported him;
family connections
gave him
countenance,
the ladies danced with him; Judges
supped
;
he was elected to office; became director of
banks; and is in a fair way to be   just what
he pleases.
I will acknowledge that I have no idea, that Snickley,
when he projected this duel with the
unsuspecting man,
had any idea of the ultimate catastrophe; or that death
would ensue. There are so many chances in favour of
a wound, that a wound only was contemplated; and the
pistol was loaded upon the same principle that a gaff
is put upon a cock, by young men of silly minds, who
take delight in such barbarous amusement. But I
would not have the compunctions of Snickley, for all the
sensation of present pleasure, that he derived at the time
from the contrivance of the tragedy.
Teague, though a fool, had more of a certain sort of
sense, than the unsuspecting man. For being told by
one of these that take delight in exciting duels, that he
had been slandered by a racoon, calling him an opossum,
and was advised to challenge the racoon, as there could
be no avoiding the calling him to account: Master
racoon
,
said he, may tink me an opossum; and de opossum
may tink me a racoon, and call me so; but de racoon, and
de opossum may settle it between demselves two: you may
tell Mr. Racoon, dat I would just as soon be called an
opossum as a racoon. Dey may tink one anoder
gentlemen
;
but dere is not a hair's difference between dem,
except it is as to de colour, or de bulk of it. A
blackguard
will always have de last word; dey may call me
opossum, or racoon. If dey could say any worse of me,
dey would do it. And it is a good joke dat each tinks
de oder, noting more dan a vile baste. Dey may talk
deir slander, and publish deir papers; but it is all de
same ting to Teague.
CHAPTER XI.
THE visionary philosopher, notwithstanding the
want of success which attended his speculations, had
still great weight amongst the people. I mean, his
opinions
had great weight; for though a tall man, he was
not of great corpulency. It had been suggested that it
behooved to impose taxes for the support of government.
What? said the philosopher, have you not got a
constitution
;
and cannot a constitution work without taxes?
At all events, what is called an impost may suffice. An
impost; what is that? said a man amongst the crowd.
Why, an imposition, said another, what else could it be?
Impost, has nothing to do with imposition, said the
philosopher
.
It is to knock down a man when he comes
into the settlement, and take his money from him. The
English have what they call a pol-tax, or a tax upon
scalps. It cannot but raise a good sum from the red
people
,
who take so many from the whites. In some
governments
they tax boots. Would it not be better to lay
a tax upon legs, as being more easy to be collected, and
less liable to evasion? said an honest man. Of all taxes,
said one in answer; I think this would be the most easily
evaded; because a man could run away with his legs.
Robbing people that come into the settlement, will not
do, said one; at least for a permanent revenue; because
it will keep people from coming. I am against all
constraint
upon ourselves, or any one else. I propose
voluntary
and occasional contributions.
You propose a fiddle, said his opponent. Voluntary,
and occasional! Do you conceive a man could spare a
pound of flesh, or an ounce of blood, occasionally, for
any great length of time? He might bear the first slash
that he got; but he would wince at the second.
Loans, loans, said a financier; you have nothing more
to do than to borrow a million now and then, when you
are out of money.
Why, if robbing pedlars will not do, said the Visionary
Philosopher, I think loans must be the next resort.
A pretty noise we have made about a constitution, said
a smart looking man in a pair of leather breeches; if
there must be force constantly applied to the wheels; and
money expended to keep it going.
How can a machine go unless it be wrought, said a
man with a sloutched hat, without some to work it; and
how can it be wrought without hands? I mean persons
hired for the purpose; and if hired, they must be paid.
I do not know, unless you apply steam, said an
ingenious
mechanic.
Would you make the government a steam boat? said
one in a bear-skin coat. But supposing it the case; you
must have coals to boil the water, and produce steam.
At this point of the game, a simpleton came forward,
and spoke as follows:Gentlemen, said he, I am but a
fool fellow, a mere ass, a sheep, and what not; but I do
not see how we can borrow, unless we expect to pay;
and if what is borrowed is to be paid, why not pay in the
first instance?
That will not do, said an artful member; we will be
turned out, if we lay a tax; the people must be
cheated
by our borrowing in the mean time, and leaving it to
those that come after us to lay a tax, and pay.
What use in having a general financier, said the
multitude
,
if he cannot make money out of chips and
whetstones
If nothing more is to be done, than to count the
money, or cast up the tax when it is paid into him, any
cod-head may do that.
A financier may do a great deal more than that, said
an intelligent person. He may determine and
report
upon what a tax may be best laid, and to what amount.
But if we hesitate to tax at all, I grant you, any body
may be a financier; for it is an easy matter to borrow,
if you can get any to be fools to lend without funds to
sustain
it, and at least, pay the interest. But why borrow
when a man has money in his chest? I would call for
this; every man his proportion according to his
property
,
just as we subscribe to an undertaking; and the
only difference is, that, in this case, we subscribe what
we think we can afford; in that, we contribute what the
community shall think we ought to advance; the
community
,
through some organization of officers, and these
being the judges. Put yourselves in an attitude and
armour for war. What is this but to raise money, which
is the means of war? It did not mean to clothe
yourselves
in sheet iron, or in bull's hides; but to go to the
bottom of the matter, and to lay a tax to support a
war. No difficulty in procuring soldiers for a
campaign
,
if you have money; no necessity to call upon
militia; you will have enough to offer their services.
It is money makes the mare go. Give me money, and
I will shew you men; and when I have the men to shew,
there will be no war.
Aye, said Teague O'Regan, give me de boys, and a
shilelah, and I will clear de fair. If you will give me
de money, I will get de whiskey; and if I have de
whiskey
,
I will have de boys, and let me see who will like to
come to blows wid Paddy.
This speech pleased the people much; and they
insisted
upon the Governor to place Teague at the head
of the finances.
It is more than probable he might have been advanced
to the head of this department, the Governor yielding to
the solicitation of the people, had not the popular voice
propelled him in a different direction. For about this
time it was reported that he had taught a cat to speak.
It is true, that as he had seen done in Ireland, by taking
the lower jaw between his finger and thumb of the left
hand, and pinching her upper jaw with the finger and
thumb of the other hand, moving the lower jaw, in the
mean time, as she mewed, he would make her pronounce
something that resembled the saying Erin go bra, which
was Irish; and by another kind of movement, and
breaking
of the voice, it would seem to be, bacon, fat bacon,
which was English. From this specimen, it was thought
that if put at the head of an academy to teach beasts to
articulate, he might succeed better than any had yet
done. He was called principal, and being made a
Doctor
of laws, was put at the head of the institution. But
it took more time to teach the principal, I mean the
bog-trotter
,
to make him mark and write something like
L. L. D. at the end of his name, than it had done him to
teach the cat; and if you had not known that it was L. L.
D. that the letters ought to be, you would have been at
a loss to know what they were. It is necessary that a
man in a station which bespeaks learning, be a Doctor
of laws; but it does not always follow, that he be
learned
in the laws; at least I have known some that are not
the most profound scholars, on whom this degree has
been conferred. To make the bog-trotter a Doctor of
laws was some advance; but, it would be more to
confer
that degree on one of his pupils, a bear, or a young
elk; at least it would occasion more surprise.
The Visionary Philosopher had made out a system of
rules and regulations for the government of the
academy
;
in other words, the discipline of the institution;
such as conditions of admission, price of tuition, grade
of classes, freshman, sophomore, &c. books to be read,
hours of study, and vacation; meals, kind of food, with
matters that regarded decency of manners, such as that
squirrels should not crack nuts, or pigs eat apples in
the school rooms; nor racoons chew tobacco or smoke
segars. It was particularly inculcated on all, that they
should rise early, wash their snouts, comb their hair,
and pare their nails, as becomes a student.
All things were arranged for this menagerie; and a
proper number of the more tractable of animals got
together
to begin with, such as young cubs, whelps, &c.
when it was put into the head of the Principal, by some
of the more high minded of his countrymen, that it was
a degradation to have it said, that
an Irishman was
teaching
beasts;
to be called a horse professor, and the like.
Whether it was that the pride of the bog-trotter took
alarm at this, or that he saw the ridicule himself;
he threw up the trust, and would have no more to do
with it. The people were dissatisfied, and his
popularity
fell as rapidly as it had risen.
Transit gloria mundi; There is nothing so fleeting as
sublunary joys; and of all these, popularity is the most
evanescent. It was but a short time ago, which was the
occasion of the bog-trotter teaching the cat, and having
succeeded, that he was caressed by the multitude,
followed
,
chaired, &c. but it so happened that the chairing
took place in a small cabin; and when he was raised
suddenly, those hoisting, not having due regard to the
height of the story, he struck his head against the
ceiling
,
or rather rafters; for there was no ceiling; at which
the Latin schoolmaster exclaimed,
Sublimi feriam sidera vertice.
But what gave him more consolation, was the having a
dinner given him, the Chief Justice presiding, and toasts
drank. For it is not in our time as it was at the Olympic
games, or a Roman triumph, or ovation, that an oak leaf,
or a sprig of laurel, or a bunch of ivy, a branch of
olive, or some other unsubstantial vegetable was the
gift. In modern and more improved times, we have
solid
food of flesh, and sauces, to gratify the palate.
Certain
it is, the bog-trotter had been feasted abundantly
during his popularity; but now on the ebb of this, he
had declined so far in reputation, that he could not have
been made a constable. So fortuitous, and unstable is
the popular voice. Whereas heretofore during the
current
in his favour, things were imagined to his advantage
that he had never done, and words framed that he had
never spoken; so now the reverse took place; speeches
were framed it is true, but they were all to his
disadvantage
;
as for instance, that he had said the moon was
made of green cheese; that a snake was a vegetable;
that the only conversion with the fanatics was the
turning
the heels where the head should be; that he had
reflected
on the general government, saying that gun boats
were only fit to make Virginia hog-troughs; that an
embargo was like yoking pigs where there was no fence;
that borrowing money only became a young spendthrift,
who was afraid to apply to his father or his guardians;
that there were
faults on both sides, weakness
on the
part of the administration, and
wickedness
on the part
of the opposition. These allegations might be all true
enough; but he had not the sense to make them; but
being down, every thing must be heaped upon him. An
editor of a paper, who had boasted he could write down
any man in six weeks, opened his battery; charged him
with tumbling, and bog-trotting, and shaving himself
with a bad razor; some things frivolous, and some things
false; but it went to compose a paragraph. There was
no standing this. The bog-trotter was at a loss what to
do; whether to withdraw from society, and take a hut
to himself in some corner of the settlement; or to quit
the country and to live amongst the savages, and wild
beasts, when a mere accident gave him some
countenance
in the community. It was reported that he had
found a stone; and doubtless he had, for it was an easy
matter to find a stone on a piece of ground which had
been once the bed of the river; and these stones also
round and lubricous; but it was suggested to be what
is called the
philosopher's stone.
This hint, some wag
had communicated to the Visionary Philosopher, who
went immediately in quest of Teague. The truth is, the
stone had something singular in its configuration, and was
perhaps a petrifaction. The Philosopher, though
somewhat
irritated at the Irishman's desertion of the trust in
educating beasts, yet as it is natural with visionary men,
was struck with this new idea, as what might be turned
to account in making gold and silver in the present
scarcity
of specie, the banks having refused to issue any for
their notes; and adopting a conciliatory address, he
bespoke
the bog-trotter. Teague, said he, I am not come
to take you up, not being an officer of justice; nor
having
any thing to do with the matter of your
teaching
beasts;
for it has occurred to myself, that if taught to
speak, and sent to congress, they might gabble like
magpies, and the
remedy would be worse than the
disease
;
so that I came, not displeased with you, on account
of your relinquishing the tuition; more especially as
you have found out the means of replenishing the
national
treasury,
by this stone that has fallen in your way.
It is a desideratum in chemistry that has been long
sought after; and if Redheiffer had turned his attention
to that, instead of the perpetual motion, it would have
been better for the public. For though an editor made
a demonstration of it as plain as a problem in Euclid,
yet some still doubt the fact of a perpetual motion being
discovered, except in the tongue of a member of
congress
.
Have you made any silver out of this stone yet? I
should like to see a little of it.
I have made a pewter spoon, said the bog-trotter, and
dat is de next ting to silver, and a lead bullet, and a piece
of copper; but de spalpeens have robbed me o' dese, and
took dem out o' my pocket whilst I was aslape, and no
body de wiser for it; bad luck to dem, de shape-stalers,
and tiefs.
Come back with me to the settlement, said the
Philosopher
,
and I will make a man of you.
Dat I will, said the bog-trotter; and see de
Governor
,
and shew him de stone.
The stone was shewn to the Governor, who was glad
to see the bog-trotter again; but had no faith in the
discovery
.
He knew Teague to be such a liar, that he
could give no credit to what he averred. The stone,
said the Governor, is a very pretty stone, made by the
rolling and tumbling of the water, in one part, and
breaking
off in another; or has been originally a piece of wood,
cut by a joiner, and is petrified; but I would just as
soon take a
stick
to make gold, as I would a
stone.
A
stick to hold in one's hand and compel a robbery, would
Vol. IV. P
be as efficatious as a stone; and this is the only way that
I know of making money, suddenly, which cannot be
done, unless you have some one to rob that has money.
The Philosopher with Teague, appealed to the
people
,
and reported that the Governor was averse to the
having money made. The only remedy in this case was,
the threatening that they would turn him out and
put Teague in or the Visionary Philosopher for
Governor. With a view to this, and to refresh his
popularity
,
a dinner was once more given to the bog-trotter.
The toasts were, Down with paper money; gold and
silver the genuine circulating medium, &c. &c. &c.
When the bog-trotter retired, a volunteer was given:
Our noble bog-trotter.
CHAPTER XII.
THE governor, wearied out by this folly of the
people
of his government, and being somewhat in a passion,
at a meeting of the legislature, instead of sending a
message
,
came in, and with a speech made the welkin
ring. For it was out o doors that they were convened,
not having yet built a state-house; and being a man of
very powerful lungs, like some of your warriors of
antiquity
,
or Shelby of Kentucky, in modern times, and
mounting a stump, on a rising ground, the heavens his
canopy, he raised his stentorian voice. Good people,
said he, I care no more about my popularity with you;
or whether I am again to be chosen governor or not, than
I care whether you are fools or knaves; it all comes to
much the same thing; for in both cases, you mistake
your own interest. If this fool fellow, Teague O`Regan,
that has been one day popular with you, so as to be fit
for any office, and at another day not fit to be your
hangman
,
has found a stone, which this politician, the
visionary
philosopher, gives out as having the virtue of
transmuting
metals, and changing wood or shells into gold
and silver; if this ragamuffin, I say, has found such a
stone, which I no more believe than that my horses' hoof
has the virtue of changing the earth that he treads upon,
into gold; what good would it do you, when the very
thing that makes such metal precious,
scarcity,
would
take away all use, or benefit of it? If you would make
gold and silver as plenty as bank notes, would it be of
more value? Do you take me for one that, for the sake
of keeping my place, would consult a temporary
popularity
?
I tell you that I will have no more teaching
beasts to speak, sing, or whistle: no more coining
money
,
by philosophers stones; or discoveries of perpetual
motions, or any such stuff. Your philosopher may
teach you to catch crabs in a new way, or to open
oysters
;
I look to what will establish the government, and
render it
vigorous;
taxation, and no borrowing from
Jew brokers, like minors that have their estates in
expectancy
.
Does the heart borrow from without; or does
it not take back the blood from the extremities, which it
has circulated to them? It is a cheat and deception of
the people not to tell them truth
Si populus vult decipi, decipiatur,
Said the latin schoolmaster. No, said the governor, they
shall not be deceived by me. I disregard their
caucusing
,
and talking of taking up another candidate for
governor
They may have my bog-trotter, or the
visionary
philosopher, when they please; and they may
impeach
me when out of office, or let it alone: I am at their
defiance, having acted to the best of my judgment, for
their true happiness. Do they take me for a coward in
politics, that am afraid to touch their pockets, and apply
to a philosopher's stone, even if it had the virtue of
making
gold, when the making gold or silver, would do more
harm than good?
You may have my bog-trotter, and welcome, for a
governor
;
I am pretty well tired of bothering myself with
him, to make use of a phrase of his own; I have had as
much trouble on my hands with him as Don Quixotte
had with Sancho Panza; and I cannot but acknowledge,
as some say, that I have resembled Don Quixotte
myself
,
at least in having such a bog-trotter after me; save
that Sancho rode upon an ass, and this O`Regan trots on
foot. But I hope I shall not be considered as resembling
that Spaniard in taking a wind-mill for a giant; a
common
stone for a magnet that can attract, or transmute
metals. It is you that are the Don Quixottes in this
respect
,
madcaps, and some of you from the madcap
settlement, Thady O`Connor and several others, tossing
up your caps at every turn, for a new constitution; not
considering that when a thing gets in the way of
changing
,
it will never stop until it gets to the end of
liberty, and reaches despotism, which is the bourne
from whence no traveller returns. Do you take me
for
Jefferson?
You are mistaken if you think I have
so good an opinion of you. I would ill deserve your
confidence
if I made your whims my guide; or regarded
popularity obtained in such a way. It never came into
my head that, because I had got the chair of government,
there was a millenium about to come, when all men would
do justice, and there would be no occasion for judges
and lawyers; nations could be coerced by
proclamations
;
and no war would ensue. Your philosopher's
stone will stand you in little stead if an army is to be
raised and a fleet supported; and without an army and a
navy, are you safe within or without? Not while you
live in a country where there is a
water on one side
and
savages on the other.
John Bull will come by the water,
and Tecumseh by the wilderness. A navy is the safe
defence of a republic where it must, or at least, will have
commerce. It always rallies round the government,
and not faction. I want money to support a navy and an
army, and this I will have, not by a philosopher's stone,
but by drawing on yourselves; and when you cannot
pay, then borrow; but lay yourselves to the wheels, and
see what you can do first.
The mischief is, you have too much money, and hence
it is we hear of banks in every quarter, depreciating the
medium until a paper dollar comes to be an oak-leaf;
and if
you were to make silver as plenty, it would be the
same thing.
I will have none of your philosophers
stones, I will put my veto on it.
The priesthood have young
John Bull,
I mean New
England, under complete subjection; because they alarm
them with the idea that but for them, the clergy, the
witches would be let loose, and carry them to the red sea.
Now, I neither wish such subordination, or by such
means; but I tell you the truth, that I will resign the
government, and go about my business, bog-trotting as I
used to do, with some new waiter, if I should leave
Teague upon your hands. I neither know nor care, but
I should not be surprized, if some of you should have
your necks in the guillotine, before a fortnight; (and
here he gave a description of the guillotine.) This
happened
in the French revolution, and it will happen with
you, if you give way to your reveries. I will abdicate
this moment. I am off; and I would not wonder if
some of you had a guillotine about your necks before the
morning.
At this, descending from the stump, and making as if
about to go off, a great dismay fell upon the legislative
body, and the multitude without. They had a confused
idea of the matter threatened, but could not well conceive
what it was. Some thought it was at least a hanging
matter that was to come upon them; but all apprehended
some bad consequence, there having been a rumour of
philosophers in France having brought the nation to
much suffering, by
guillotines;
the royal family having
fallen victims to this mammoth kind of execution. They
P 2
began therefore to intreat him to retain his place as
governor
;
and even hinted at a resolution to guillotine the
bog-trotter. It was moved, and seconded, and passed
nemine contradicente, that the bog-trotter should be
guillotined. The
visionary philosopher
afraid that in
this turn of the public mind, he might also be
guillotined
,
fell in with the current of the popular opinion, and
said he was for the guillotine; that he had a model of one
in his pocket. It was the fact, he had a model, not in
the least expecting such a result of things; or that there
would be any occasion for a guillotine; but merely as
the model of a machine that had been in use, at a
distance
,
but not introduced here. I have, said he, the
model of a guillotine, pulling it out, and, I take it, with
the help of a carpenter or two, I could have one
constructed
of a proper size for the bog-trotter in the course
of this evening. Resolved and seconded, that a
guilletine
should be made, and that the bog-trotter should be
executed at ten o'clock the next morning.
I would just observe, said the governor, that the
guillotine
has fallen into disrepute in France.
Deportation
is the modern manner of disposing of the criminal. And
without much time lost, it may be perfectly convenient
to carry a deportation into effect. Here is a tin cart of
one of these young John Bulls; I mean one of those carts
that carry tin-ware, watering-cans, and cullenders. You
can make use of one of these for deportation from the
country, not that I can spare my bog-trotter from digging
potatoes, but here is Thady O`Connor, a loose fish, that
can be put into it. No sooner said than done; Thady
O`Connor was taken up and put into the cart.
CHAPTER XIII.
CONTAINING OBSERVATIONS.
IN some things in the above, I may be considered
as having a fling at president Jefferson, in the article of
not looking at the
nature
of
things,
or judging nicely
upon
them; though, I will acknowledge, that in some
matters
I
erred with him:
approving of an embargo, and not
seeing until a late day, that the policy was ineffectual. I
approved of gun-boats to some extent, and may do so
still; but, not so as to supersede a navy, which was the
error of the president; though, if I recollect right, it
was the project of Thomas Paine.
It is natural for a person to think what he would have
done, had he been in the situation of another, even though
he never had the idea of being in that situation. But
having an interest in common with others in the
management
of the helm, it becomes more essentially natural
for one to think what ought to be done; and it is not an
after thought with me in saying that I saw the first
error
of the Jeffersonian administration; and this was in
the attack upon the
Federal Judiciary,
which was a
cingulum
to bind the states; the belt of Protagoras, to keep
together the bundle of sticks which had been so well
arranged
by the constitution. The next error was the
repeal
of the excise and the stamp duties. The people
had become reconciled to the excise, and I do not
recollect
a single petition for a repeal. The objection to the
stamp duties was founded in a prejudice against the
name; because the Britons had had such an act, and had
attempted to enforce the like upon these colonies, on the
principle that the parliament had the power, as was
declared
,
to bind us in all cases whatsoever, and this
without representation in that body. It was an objection
also, that it was not productive to a great amount; the
remedy for which was
to increase the duty:
it was a
mode of taxation the best that was ever devised. It fell
upon the monied men, and the poor paid little or
nothing
.
The next error was, the not continuing, or reviving
the direct tax, and to a greater amount than before; not
upon improvements by building, and on windows, &c.
but upon the value of the soil, and the proportion holden
by any one. What would I have done with the revenue
arising from these? I would have had a navy augmented
by this time to fifty ships of the line, an hundred
frigates
,
and two hundred sloops of war, with brigs and
schooners in proportion. These things are not an after
thought with me; for I can vouch the new president,
the then secretary of state, James Madison, that in
Philadelphia
,
in the summer of 1805, I stated to him all
these errors; and as a consequence of these, the
paying
tribute to the Barbary powers,
when with a navy
which we might by that time have had, we could have
burnt up their towns like wasps' nests.
It was upon these grounds that I have said a
thousand
times, that Jefferson, so far as respected our
interior
arrangements, was not a great commander. I saw
it before he was three months at the helm of government.
My idea of his talents upon a great scale had been high;
but they were lessened.
But it is only with regard to
the management of the interior, that I had applied
the dignus regnandi si non regnavisset.
I was always
with him in his apprehensions of John Bull; and I
deplored his errors only because he left himself in a
situation
to invite
the horns of that madest of all mad
cattle
Good fences restrain fencebreaking beasts, and
preserve
good neighbourhoods.
All idea of the nonsense of
French influence,
I have
ever rejected from my creed; nor did I go so far as to
be of opinion that Bonaparte had usurped the
government
in France; for there was no government when that
man took the helm; so that if he did usurp it, it was only
as respected the Bourbons, and not as respected the
French people. There was no government in France at
the time he took the helm; there
anarchy, the guillotine,
and despotism.
The people were ready to call upon
the mountains and the rocks to cover them.
But the
now Elba emperor deserves the contempt of the world,
also for his want of true wisdom, and his injustice with
regard to Spain, Russia, Holland, &c. &c. As to his
conscriptions
of the French people, it is nothing more
than our militia laws. It is ridiculous to call in question
the principle; but
the use that was made of it.
This
chapter, when the scenes have passed away
to which it refers, may be struck out, or omitted in the
subsequent editions of this work.
CHAPTER XIV.
INCLINATION prompts me to give some
account
of the locus in quo, as the lawyers say, or the place
where the Governor had pitched himself; I say pitched,
which is a metaphor from the pitching tents by an army.
It is expected that I am to describe the situation of the
hill above, and dale below; shade of tree, or falling
fountain
by the house. Will it not be proper that I first
describe the house itself; which I do not mean to do
minutely; because I have no idea that it will stand many
years; but that he will get a better, as the country
improves
,
and saw-mills erected. What can be expected
from early settlers, but the choice of a situation? and
every thing is not always made with the best judgment.
For it is inconceivable by any one who is not acquainted
with it, how little of the ground can be seen, and
particularly
explored, while it is under wood. The best
situations
will be overlooked; or, if they are seen, some
less superb is chosen with a view to present convenience
of water, or vicinity in some other particular. It was
not such a mansion as would hurt the pride that is
natural
to the mind of man; and might lurk in the bosoms
of other early settlers, not so well lodged themselves.
I do not know that the builder had thought of the
uneasiness
occasioned to Valerius Publicola, by the
loftiness
of his dwelling on the Velian eminence. But his
mind not running upon superb edifices, he had thought
only of convenient accommodation. The simplicity of
his taste was at a distance from every thing of shew and
splendour; so that, not from the reflection of a wise
precaution
,
but from the natural disposition of his mind, he
was satisfied with a structure that could not affect the less
opulent. But what it wanted in grandeur, he
endeavoured
to make up in taste, if that can be predicated of a
building where little cost had been expended. Taste
there was, in having it in such a style, that it would not
have occurred to any one that taste had been thought of;
for there was no ornament, nor was there room for it.
For what ornament could there be bestowed upon an
oblong in the proportion of one hundred and twenty, by
twenty feet; the sides and floor of hewn logs, and the
roof of split timber? What was it but a suit of rooms
under the same cover, divided by entrys, or intervals,
of ten feet transversely to the length; which had the
appearance
more of a range of barracks than of a farm house.
The fact is, the humanity of the governor had intended
it chiefly for that use, the accommodation of individual
families for a night, in their emigration to a new
settlement
.
It stood east and west upon a ridge of ground like a
whale's back, with a stream on each side running in a
direction
contrary from each other, but falling into two
sister
rivers on the east and west, which joined their silver
currents at a small distance, and in prospect of the
building
.
As there was a suit of rooms, so there were stacks
of chimneys on the north of the range, and these of stone,
built strong to resist the tornados not uncommon in that
country. These, with a cellar underneath the whole
length, walled with stone, and the lower timbers of the
building laid half their depth in the wall, there being but
one story above ground, rendered the structure pretty
secure from the most violent blasts of wind.
Having given this outline, it may suffice. I shall say
nothing of the subdivisions, because they may be
imagined
.
Nor shall I describe the extent of level or of
rising ground in view; or the bearing of the mountains at
a distance; or the circling of the floods. What
attracted
my attention more, was a beautiful water fall in one of
those springs that issued from the hill on which the
mansion
house stood. It was a perennial stream, and issued
from a crevice in a moss-covered rock, with a current
of about two inches in diameter. It was as clear as
crystal, and as cool as the Hebrus. The projection was
in its first pitch, clear of the rock, several feet, into a
bason of pure white gravel large enough to bathe in, and
shrouded with a group of wild cherry trees on the sides,
but above with the shade of the tulip-bearing poplar, and
the oak. The spring on the other side of the small
dividing
ridge, and towards the west, at the distance of
perhaps
one hundred feet, issued more abundantly, and fell
from one ledge to another, but with some murmur of the
current, as dissatisfied to quit the fountain. The new
town, as it was yet called, stood in sight, and had begun
to shew two streets of houses at the confluence of the
two rivers, and parallel with each, with the public
buildings
at equi-distance from the banks; and towards the
base of the right angle which the two streets formed.
I shall say nothing of the garden grounds; for these were
laid out but in imagination, save as to a kitchen garden,
with such vegetables and essential roots as could
immediately
be cultivated and were the most necessary. The
collection of indigenous plants, and native flowers, or
sought from abroad, could be the object of a more
leisurely
attention at a future day. People were thinking
more of cutting down trees, than of planting them, which
may be a fault. For individual trees, as well as groves
in some places, ought to be spared, in removing a
wilderness
.
The depth of a native grove in a hot day,
surpasses
all description in the sensations that it gives. The
power of art with all her skill can never equal nature. I
think it a great pity that we have lost so much of the
ancient
mythology as respects the sylvan deities, such of
them to whom no worship was addressed, unless in the
figurative language of the poet, which we still use, but
do not feel, as those who believed in the existence. It
inspired
a tenderness to rural scenery; and in sparing shades
was favourable to taste. One could tell a rustic who had
no conception of the pleasures of imagination, that if he
cut down this or that groupe, he would have all the
Dryads on his back; the Hamadryads would come to
their assistance; the Oreades would not send him storms;
the Naids would order the spring that furnished water
to his reapers to be dried up. But now we have no hold
upon him; and much pain has it given me to see a
fringe of willows by the brook, or a semi-circle of trees
on the brow of a hill, entirely cut away.
Nor, is it only in matters of taste, that the settlers of a
new country are, in most instances deficient. They have
not the most perfect judgment in the use of the small
means they usually possess to establish themselves. I
do not mean to undervalue the good intentions of public
bodies, in sending missionaries among the Indians, to
teach the doctrines of supralapsarian predestination;
but might not other funds be constituted to assist settlers
in removing and in fixing themselves in a new settlement,
and to instruct them in the principle of an agriculture
adapted to the soil and climate? The thoughts of a
scientific
man of experience in agriculture, would be a
great advantage in a district of country, to advise in the
making improvements. Men of public spirit in some
instances, have combined their own interest with the
benefit
of others, in improvements in a new country.
Disputed
titles are the bane of settlements in new districts:
this is owing to a want of specialty in the original granting,
or correctness in the laying out the lands. Would not
the salus propuli justify in such instances, the settling
disputes in a summary manner, by commissioners? Does
not such a transcendental right of government exist in
all cases? It is not enough that the rind of shrubs, or
wild berries, and the juice of the maple, should
constitute
the principal part of the food of a settler for a time;
that he should put up with the shelter of bark stript from
the trees, for the first summer, but after he has cleared
his ground, and has raised corn, his field is taken from
him by an error of the survey, or the equivocal
description
of an office right. The soil of a new country is wet,
the air moist, the winter longer, of course, in the
bosom
of a wooded country; hand-mills for a time must
suffice, and every man must be something of a jack of
all trades. He must be a worker in iron, and in leather,
and in wood. Invention as well as industry, is requisite.
But the principal defect, as in all other objects of human
application, is the want of original thought, to adopt new
modes to new circumstances. Things are rather done in
this or that way, because they have been so done
elsewhere
,
and heretofore. For this reason, I would wish to
see missionary agriculturalists sent into the country;
societies instituted for the propagation of agricultural
knowledge among the people, and the relief of distressed
inhabitants. There might not be just as many Indians
brought into the pale of the church, but there might be
more churches built amongst the whites on the frontier
of the country.
The establishment of churches in the frontier country,
is not amiss; but on the contrary, deserves
commendation
,
where the preachers employ themselves in
explaining
and inculcating the intelligible principles of moral
duty; and even when they take up the time of the
people
in supporting or overthrowing the speculative
opinions
of their adversaries, it amuses the congregation.
That institution is not wholly useless, which supplies
amusement. It reconciles the labouring part of the
community
very much to hear the rich and the luxurious
denounced
as not likely to come so well off hereafter,
having
had their good things in this life. Cold, and heat,
and fatigue are better borne under these impressions;
Vol. IV. Q
there is less murmuring in the community. In a
political
point of view also, religious institutions have their
use. Obedience to the laws, is a christian duty, and the
support of government is favourable to that settled state
of society, in which alone any system of mental
cultivation
can be the object of attention. In the late
commotion
of the public mind in this new government,
respecting
the calling a convention to alter the constitution, we
had an instance of what might be done by an honest open
hearted clergyman, of good sense, among his profession.
He had a few acres of ground to clear, by cutting down
the timber and rolling it away; and for this purpose,
made what is called a frolic: that is, an assemblage for
labour, and a feast at the same time; the feast was in the
fete champetre way; though they did not give it that
name. While they were at work, the pot, which might
be rather called a kettle, was boiling: for it was a large
boiler which had been employed in making sugar from
the maple tree, more like a kettle for distilling, than a pot;
it suited extremely well to make the soup, or broth on this
occasion. A pile of wood had been set on fire, and the
kettle suspended over it on a cross beam, supported by a
fit arm at each end. The maker of the frolic, the owner
of the clearing, going forward, had told the men, as the
truth of the case warranted him in doing, that as the
female
part of his family had not come out to the
settlement
as yet, nor would until he could get some shelter
built and improvement made, they must stand cooks
themselves. There were fleshes of venison, and beef,
and pork, and some fowls, and vegetables, and articles of
seasoning: each might put in according to his liking.
Each did put in according to his notion of making broth;
and like the wierd-sisters in Macbeth, they stirred the
kettle, singing as they stirred, till the pot was boiled, and
taken off the hanger, to assemble round and put their
ladles in. Some thought the broth had too much salt, or
pepper, or cabbage; others too little. The proportion
of every article of fish, flesh, or fowl was found fault
with by some one. My ingredient, said the master of the
entertainment, is yet to come, that is a flask of whiskey;
to which they all assented to have poured in. A ladle of
the broth enlivened with the spirit, put them in good
humour
;
and it was a safe thing to jest with them, and to
slur good hints under the veil of parable. Good folks,
said he, being of an occupation which the wags in their
humour sometimes call pulpit whacking, it is not
difficult
for me to strike a doctrine out of any thing, as easily
as Moses did the water fall out of the rock at Meriba;
and hence it is, that we are apt, even on common
occasions
,
though not in the pulpit, to spiritualize. This I
am not about to do at present, but rather, if you please, to
moralize a little. We have a constitution, or frame of
government, which has stood some time, and for any thing
I can see, might stand a while yet. It was framed by
men of great political skill, at least, great information;
and it was with great deliberation that it was formed. It
was not until lately that any one thought to disturb, and
new model; and in fact to make another. Reform, is a
popular word, and it is that which is chosen. But every
one must foresee an entire overhauling. Now, as I
would wish to see our young timber sawed into planks
to line houses, or to make floors; or by hewing, made
fit for harrows or plough beams, rather than erected into
guillotines, I am for putting up with the constitution
until
we get our fields cleared, and our meadows made;
until we look about us, and get time to think a little, lest
going hastily about it we make it worse. For you see, in
making this broth, where every thing was put in that
any one said he liked, it was not savoury, until a dash of
whiskey made it palatable
CHAPTER XV.
IT may not be amiss, at this stage of our history, to
mention that the governor had not yet been a married
man; and it was not the death of his lady that propelled
him to enter on an unsettled, and rambling way of life;
as was the case with Sir Thomas Graham who, to relieve
his grief for the loss of a beloved wife, sallied out with a
regiment of English troops against the French, to kill all
that he could. It was not the loss of a dear woman that
had made the captain half mad when he set out with the
bog-trotter,
In romantic method.
But it was a cause that had some relation to it;
disappointments
in love. These had happened to him
frequently
and from an early period. His first attachment
that took a strong hold of him was about the twenty
eighth year of his age. He had taken it for granted that
it was a thing of course for the maid to affect coyness,
and to be won with great difficulty. And hence it was
that he persevered too much and too long; and when
repulsed he bore it the more hardly, because he had not
expected it. The effect also was produced, that in his
advances to a future mistress, a very small matter
discouraged
him; in the same manner as a steed in a
curricle, once baulked, will stick at a small impediment,
and refuse to draw. For falling in love with another
beauty, and learning that poetry was essentially necessary
in a matter of love to a young person, he wrote verses,
and presented them. The lady wishing to bring him to
the point, affected to consider his madrigals as a
burlesque
,
returned them to him, telling him that she had
not expected such ridicule from a gentleman of his good
breeding. The poor captain in the honesty of his heart
took her to be in earnest, and never went to see her
more.
The third that he addressed; for a lapse of a long
time intervened before he could muster resolution to pay
his respects to any one; the third I say, that he
addressed
;
or rather purposed to address, was a blue-eyed
beauty, with black hair and a white skin, whom he took
by the hand, which trembled so, that he let it go; and
gave up his pretensions. The truth is, it was sensibility
in the young lady; and her joy in the good fortune that
she had to be addressed by one whom she prized so much.
He mistook it for a feeling of horror at her
situation
.
His next campaign was with one whom his heart
loved but his reason di approved, for she was as
handsome
as an angel, but as ill tempered as Jezabel. He
would have married her; but he was relieved by a
richer wooer who made a present of a bread tray, and
chicken coop to the mother; and having her good wishes,
succeeded with the daughter so far at least as to gain
her consent to matrimony.
His last attack, to speak in a military phrase, was on
the heart of a young widow, who would have yielded
incontinently had he pressed his advances, but her little
boy calling a gentleman pappy who gave him
sweetmeats
,
he took it that the child had the hint from the
mother, and that the other was the favoured lover.
Considering
the matter all over, he resolved not as the
English novelists say, upon a trip to the continent, but a
journey on the continent to dissipate his ennui, and
recover
himself from the softer affections which had
obtained
the ascendant. For a change of objects diverts the
mind; and going to watering places cures love as it does
the rheumatism; not that it has any other primary effect,
than cheating the imagination of its reveries.
The people of the settlement had built the governor a
house. The mansion of his excellency, was spacious,
and furnished with several large tables, and some long
benches, but was deficient in one particular, a lady of the
castle who might attend to household affairs, and
receive
company. His senate thought that he ought to
marry. Having weighty reasons to oppose, he did not all
at once accede to the proposition. The truth is, as
we have seen he was apprehensive of a repulse.
For he had laid it down from his own experience, that
as some attract women, so others repel; and there is no
contending against nature. But though of great candour,
he did not wish to acknowledge, or profess the real
motives which led him to hesitate; but rather to evade,
and raise difficulties.
The setting an example of matrimony for the sake of
peopleing a new country, was suggested as an obligation
upon every good citizen: and that it behooved every good
man to see to it that he multiplied himself. To this he
Q 2
replied, that he was not so sure of the truth of that
proposition
.
That when we saw nature using means to put
people out of the world by pestilence, and earthquakes,
we could not be certain that it was the will of Providence
there should be more brought into it. And as it is of no
consequence to such as have not yet come into life,
whether
they ever come at all, he did not see that those who
did not come had reason to complain of those who were
but the negative causes of the non-existence.
There was a subtilty in this reasoning which the people
could not answer; yet they were not satisfied. It came
to this at last that he was under the necessity of
explaining
to them the delicacy of his situation, that it did not
become him, the governor of a republic, to compel
matrimony
in his own case, or indeed in that of any other;
and that he had no reason to suppose that in any other
way, he could obtain the hand of the inamorata that he
might pitch upon.
It seemed to the multitude a ridiculous idea that there
could be any spinster in the colony who would refuse the
hand of a man of station when offered to her. But that
if there should be any one found so recreant, the voice
of the people should compel an acquiescence: that they
would send out through all their border, and find out a
damsel for my Lord, the governor, as in the case of king
David, Ahasuerus, and others that are read of in the
scripture times.
Appalled at all idea of constraint, he was disposed to
try rather what might be accomplished by fair means.
He had heard of the emigration of the Creoles from St.
Domingo, which happened about this time, being driven
from their own country, by the revolt of the negroes, some
of these half mulattoes themselves; or what are called
mustachees, and not being of the fairest complexion, and
pressed by great necessity, might wish to match
themselves
with any person for a livelihood. Or, as another
expedient, he thought of sending by a trader, a keg or
two of whiskey, to the Indian towns to purchase a
princess
who could be reconciled, for a little calico, to
relinquish
her connections. But the people would hear of no
Creole, nor savage, who would be running back like a
pig that is brought from another settlement; or
bringing
her relations along with her of foreign manners, and
attachments. They insisted on his issuing a
proclamation
to call in all the spinsters, and selecting one from
the assembled; some Abisha, the Shinamite, or Easter;
not for a concubine; for they would have no concubine,
but to be the lady of his hall, in a decent manner, as
became
the magistrate of a christian people.
His excellency could not reconcile it to himself to
procure
an assemblage of females by proclamation; as in
that case one must be rejected, and another chosen,
which could not but wound his own mind as well as that
of the unsuccessful candidate; and he could not marry
them all, even were they so disposed; for a plurality of
wives, in modern times could not agree in one house,
however it might have been in ancient, when women
were better tempered than at present. Besides the
accommodation
of the country would not admit it. If he
took two, some honest settler might be without one.
To obviate the delicacy of a selection, it was
suggested
,
the procuring a number to be got together under the
idea of a spinning match, a thing well known in the
country, and let the best spinner take the prize; or to
draw lots, as marriage is but a lottery, which would be
a way of avoiding all idea of a preference.
That may do, said the Governor, provided that my
man, Teague O'Regan, is put out of the way, or fastened
up; for if they once see him, the matter is at an end; I
shall get none of them to take a chance for me. But all
things considered, it was thought the most convenient
course to do, as others did; and without making
any noise, to ride about the country a little to see the
damsels in their hamlets and at their spinning wheels,
in their virgin state and simple habiliments, with
unadorned
tresses.
In visiting the settlement, his excellency admired
much the spinning wheel, a piece of machinery which
he saw in almost every cabin. The attitude of the
spinster
is unquestionably finer than that of a lady at the forte
piano, or harpsichord; not altogether because it
connects
grace with industry; and charms imagination at
the same time that it engages reason in its favour; but
because the position of the body behind the instrument,
and with a front view to the beholder, has a great
advantage
.
The fact is, that a finely formed woman can be
seen in no possible attitude, to more advantage, than at
the spinning wheel. At the forte piano, at a side view,
which is the best; for you cannot have a front view, but
a side view only, the instrument being in front, you see
but the profile of the face, and the person in an inclined
posture, with the shoulder stooping, somewhat. Even
the fingers, however lightly they touch the
instrument
,
are not seen to more advantage, than those of the
spinster when she draws the lint from the rock with one
hand, and rests the other on her lap. I consider the Irish
harp as but approaching the spinning wheel in
exhibiting
the person to advantage; but independent of
connecting
the idea of utility, figure to yourself this simple
piece of mechanism, combining the circle with the
triangle
,
in its form; the lever, the inclined plane, the axis
in the principle of motion; the orders of architecture in
the rounding of the pillars, from the turning loom; and
the white maple stained in concentric circles of bright
yellow, or scarlet die; the yellow by the rind of the
shumack
,
and the scarlet by the pacoon root, gathered by
the female hand from adjoining woods. The tripod of
Appollo, made of ebony, may present a resemblance;
but the trapezium, on which the foot rests, and puts in
motion the machine, with the neat ankle, and morocco
slipper, is not so easily painted to the fancy. But when
you raise your eye to the auburn, or golden, or hair of
raven wing; with a skin milk white, and a brow of jet,
and eyes of the crystal blue; when you add to this the
finger of Hebe, disporting with the lint; the chest of
Juno, thrown back from the position; the cincture and
the smile of Venus, and the vivacity and sense of
Mnemosyne
,
you may have an idea of what I have seen of
beauty, and loveliness of the use of this instrument. A
woman, on horseback, presents her form to advantage;
but much more at the spinning wheel.
And still she turn'd her spinning wheel,
is a part of an old song; and if we ever get our Don
Quixotte married, it is ten to one, but it will be to a
spinster
.
CHAPTER XV.
WERE I to imitate the action of an epic poem, it
would now be the time to give the history of the
Governor
,
before he was a Governor, and had set out upon his
travels; deducing my narrative from his early years.
His ancestry also might be touched upon; but the fact
is, as I have said, I know little about him prior to the
time of his setting out; and still less of his descent, and
pedigree. I should be better pleased if I had it in my
power to give some account of the progenitors of Teague,
as being a character of greater singularity; but that is
not in my power. From his ambition for eminence, I
should think it very probable that his descent was noble,
and from some of the old Irish kings, if the heraldry
could be traced; but, in the sacking of towns, and
burning
of castles in the civil wars in Ireland, and foreign
conquests by Danes, and by John Bull, all documents of
ancestry have been lost; so that we are at liberty to
imagine
what we please upon this head. Philosophers
dispute
with each other; but the divines all agree that we
all came from Adam. If the divines are right, we are
all relations, tag rag, and bobtail; kings, emperors, and
bog-trotters. I am content to have it so; for it is a way
of thinking, favourable to benevolence; and I do not
know that I should gain any thing by the idea of there
having been different stocks; for though I should get
quit of some rascals, that have sprung from Adam, I
might have others on my hand not much better. The
truth is, I know nothing of my own ancestry, farther back
than the year 1715, where a certain M'Donald did good
service with his claymore at the battle of Killicrankey,
under Dundee. He was the grand father of my father,
by the
maternal line.
I mention him, because he is the
only one I have ever heard spoken of as being a
dead-doing
man. My father's father, called out in a conscription
of feudalists under Argyle, fell at the battle of Culloden;
and this is all I know of him.
It has occurred to me sometimes, that coming from
a remote island, and an obscure part of it, I might feign
an ancestry with coats of arms, as others have done.
The bracken, or brecken, as it is indifferently spelled by
the Scottish poets, is the most beautiful
ever-green
of that
part of the island; and might furnish something towards
an escutcheon. The brecken is introduced by Burns, as
an ornament of Caledonia.
Their groves o' sweet myrtle let foreign lands reckon,
Where bright-beaming summers exalt the perfume;
Far dearer to me yon lone glen o' green brecken,
Wi' the burn stealing under the lang yellow broom:
Far dearer to me are yon humble broom bowers,
Where the blue-bell and gowan lurk lowly unseen:
For there, lightly tripping amang the wild flowers
A listening the linnet, aft wanders my Jean.
Tho' rich is the breeze in the gay sunny vallies,
And cauld Caledonia's blast on the wave;
Their sweet-scented woodlands that skirt the proud
palace
,
What are they? The haunt o' the tyrant and slave:
The slave's spicy forests, and gold-bubbling fountains,
The brave Caledonian views wi' disdain;
He wanders as free as the winds of his mountains,
Save love's willing fetters, the chains o' his Jean.
The
ridge,
o' green brecken, would have done as well
as the
glen;
for it grows on the ridge as well as in the
valley, which is the meaning of the word glen, a narrow
valley, overhung by a ridge on each side; and so lone
or lonely; that is, wild and romantic, by the small stream
murmuring through it. This is the origin of the name
breckan, or brackenridge. But I am running off at a
tangent, and wandering from my subject. Having
nothing
to say of the ancestry of the Governor, or of that of
the bog-trotter, I must omit, or rather cannot accomplish
the dramatic form of the epic, but must proceed in a
prosaic way with the narrative, a parte post, and say
nothing
of the exparte ante.
The Governor was thinking of a lady for his castle, or
mansion house; but does not seem to have succeeded;
for he remains yet unmarried. Teague, as we have seen,
had been heretofore much in request with the ladies;
and still more so from the late reputation of his
generalship
,
and the display of his tumbling at the
camp-meetings
But the circumstance of his having taught a cat
to speak, was against him; for no woman would like to
have a tell-tale of such domestic animal.
It would
render
it unsafe to have a cat about the house.
CHAPTER XVI.
HOW shall we account for this eternal babbling in
our public bodies, which delays and confuses business?
Can it be
French influence?
No. I have no idea that
Bonaparte ever expended a single sous for the purpose
of inculcating this tediousness, or loquacity. The French
themselves are far from being a taciturn people;
nevertheless
I do not find reason to believe that it is from an
imitation of the French orators, that this prolixity
occurs
.
There was no great length of time taken up by
the member of the constituent, or national assembly,
when he ascended the Tribune.
Some have thought that it was a proof of the hypothesis
of Darwin, that men have been once magpies, and
parrots
.
I am of opinion that it resolves itself into one of
two natural causes,
want of self-denial,
or want of sense.
I know there are babbling schools at the present time,
as there were at a former period; debating societies
among
the manufacturers in towns and villages, as there
is in Great Britain. In some of the New-England
seminaries
,
I am told, debating and discussing questions
is made a part of the academic exercises. Of this I do
not approve, if the students are to take, one, one side,
and another a contrary, to whet their wits; and to say
what ingenuity prompts, without a reference to the truth,
and a just decision of the question. It would vary the
exercise, at least that, of the class each should propound
a question in his turn on the science which makes the
subject of his studies; and the one who explains best,
and forms the soundest judgment on the question, and
with the greatest brevity expressed, should take the
prize. I would commend brevity and truth, not the
diffuse
harangue, with sophism and errors. This would
lay a foundation of eloquence for a legislature.
Something
ought to be done to correct this logomachy, or war
of words, and nothing else. The vox, et preterea nihil is
at all times abominable. If those of this class will speak,
let them pronounce the word whippor-will a reasonable
length of time, and that may suffice. Whippor-will;
whippor-will; whippor-will; imitating the sound of that
bird, for a quarter of an hour, might pass for a speech.
O, how I have wished for a gag or a muzzle, when I
have seen four or five columns of a newspaper taken up
with verbosity. I would take it off only on condition of
giving a good instead of these. The fact is, an
amendment
of the constitution would be the reducing the
ratio
of the representation; fewer to speak, there would be
less said. Many hands make light work; but this
applies
to bodily labour only, where a certain object is to
be accomplished; such as the removing a fence, or
cutting
down a wood. Fewer members would do more in
a short time; and perhaps would do it better; for though
in a multitude of counsellors there is safety; yet if all
speak there is delay. Could we not give a power to the
chairman, or president of a deliberative body, to knock
down a member, when he had seemed to trespass on the
patience of the house. At any rate, he might be
permitted
to give him a wink, or a nod, which it should be
understood
as a hint to have done. But there is great
difficulty
in breaking bad habits; and there are some whose
tongues, according to the expression of the poet,
speaking
of a stream,
Which runs, and runs, and ever will run on.
Things have come to such a pass, that I generally
take it for granted, that the man who gives his vote, and
says nothing, is the man of sense. Adonizabee, in the
scripture, had three score and ten kings, having their
thumbs cut off. Why did he cut off their thumbs?
It must have been to keep them from writing out their
speeches. At least I have been led to think that it would
be a gain to our republic if Adonizabee had
our
members
of Congress in hands a while.
Vol. IV. R
CHAPTER XVII.
LOOKING back upon this work; for I do not
know that I shall add any more; it occurs to me
to reflect whether it will do good or harm. I cannot
think it will do harm. It contains a good deal of moral
sentiment, the result of my own reading, observation and
experience; All which I saw and part of which I
was. I have myself been of the bar; have had to do,
in a canvass for elections; and have been of a legislative
body; like all young orators, I have babbled as others
have done. This day do I remember my faults; and if
I were to go over the same ground again, I would make
one word do where two were used. The fact is that I
have spoken upon subjects I did not understand; and
had an ambition to display oratory. In correcting the
errors of ambition for place, or the mere display of
powers
,
this book may be of service in a republic. It is a
caricatura doubtless; but it is by caricatura, that the
ridiculous is discovered. For this painting I claim
credit
;
but I have more the useful in view than the amusing
of the work. I will acknowledge that I value myself a
good deal upon the performance. Any animal of the
human
species, with a mediocrity of talents, may come to be
a judge, and may appear pretty well in a book of reports,
provided he cites precedents; but how many are there
in an age that could write such a book as this? And yet
to my astonishment, it has not got up in the world as I
think it ought to have. But a great deal depends upon
having a felicitous introduction. When it comes to be
published with drawings, or what are called cuts, it will
look quite another thing to grown gentlemen; and will
come into vogue, and be a stock book.
I do not affect to be the first in this line of writing that
has appeared in America. There is a New-England
publication
entitled,
the Cobbler of Wagram,
which I have
never seen, but have heard of; and which, I would thank
some of the New-England literati to procure for me.
For though I have made some flings at our young John
Bull, yet I have had in view, but a few persons of the
present time,and as touching a political way of thinking
in alluding to them under the appellation of young
Johnny; but as to their literary standing, I have a high
respect for them; and at the same time am sensible, that
the great body of them are true men, and err only in
particulars; and this, a good deal from the not having
the helm in their hands. They will get it in due time, as
much as will fall to their share. But they expect too
much, and cannot have every thing their own way. A
separation of the Union they never thought of; it is all
in Terrorem; but such talk may lead to the catastrophe
which of all people, as they border on the British
settlements
it concerns their safety most to avoid. When I
say the states of New-England never thought of a
disunion
,
I distinguish individuals, who, for ambition, and
the hope of obtaining power from a change, may not
talk,
but
think,
of such a thing. I am persuaded, there
are in those states, at this moment, a minority,
perhaps
approaching a majority, that are as much
anti-John
Bull, as any other part of the Union. This
is said as explanatory of what may be thought
otherwise
from my allusions to young Johnny Bull. I call
them young Johnny, because old England, is old Johnny,
and they are New-England; and because there are some
of their editors at least who advocate British politics,
and call the
war unjust.
I do not say
British interest;
because it is not less the interest of Britain to yield her
claims of domination on the sea than it is for us to resist
them. If the war continues seven years, I do not
wonder
if we should burn London; at least then that we have
it in our power to burn it. For I should be sorry to burn
any thing, or kill any one. But, I will acknowledge
myself
an enragee against uncle John on account of the
injustice
of his claims, and the
barbarities
of his allies. I
am confident there are few of the people of that island,
who if they were to see a single scalp taken, as I have
done, and hear the savage yell, would not have the same
impression. The war
in disguise
upon the western parts
of the Union, in furnishing with implements, not of
agriculture
,
but of hatcheting and
scalping,
the Indian tribes,
was a cause of war long before it was declared by our
republic. The invasion, was justifiable only on the
ground, and it was
expedient
on the ground, of
interposing
between the vendors of scalping knives, and the
purchasers, the Indians. The
love of gain propels
all
the measures of John Bull; I speak of the government.
It is an inconsistency, and a calamity at the same time,
that a people who have the character of humanity,
generally, and bravery, should exhibit with regard to
nations, a conduct so profligate.
CHAPTER XVIII.
A KEY TO THE PRECEDING.
THIS will be found in the history of the times; and
especially of that of the state of Pennsylvania. And
indeed
,
I flatter myself, that it is not a little owing to this
book, published in portions, from time to time, that a
very
different state of things now exists. I do not believe,
there has been a single bog-trotter, as I may designate
them, admitted by the
American Philosophical Society,
for many years past; at least I have not heard of any
since Oric M`Sugan, the house carpenter, who did the
inside
work of a stable for one of the members, and was
therefore admitted.
In the winter of 1787, being then of the legislature of
Pennsylvania, it was signified to me that I might be put
in nomination, with several others, that were about to be
balloted for, if I thought proper to skin a cat-fish, or do
something that would save appearances, and justify the
society in considering me a man of philosophic search,
and resources. Enquiring who these might be, that had
been nominated, and put upon the list, and not chusing
to be of the
batch,
I thought proper to decline the
compliment
.
It was this which gave rise to my idea of such
a candidate as Teague O`Regan for that honour. Some
time after this, when delegates were about to be chosen
from the county where I resided, to frame a constitution
for the United States, after the adoption of the federal
government
,
I offered myself for this, as considering it a
special occasion; but to my astonishment, and before I
was aware, one of Shakespear's characters, Snout, the
bellows mender, was elected. This led me to introduce
Teague as a
politician.
An excise law, under the federal government, having
been carried into effect; and, it being obnoxious in the
western country, and excise officers
tarred and
feathered
,
as you would a sheep, or an Indian arrow, it was with
no view, but to burlesque the matter, that I made Teague
a
guager,
or exciseman; and being a sans-culotte; which
signifies,  I thought, a pair of breeches, might not be
amiss of any sort.
R 2
Being in a public station from the year 1800, I had to
pay the usual
tax of obloquy
to men in office, from
Paddy
from Cork,
&c.; and, paying more than I thought my
proportion, it was natural for me, to think of my
bog-trotter
as one who would make just such an editor as some
of these were. It was for this purpose, therefore, that
it came into my mind to give him a journal to edit.
It was a
retrospection
to a past period
when a
batchelor
,
and recollecting the competition of those whom I
thought undeserving persons, that I was led to
caricature
their pretensions with the success of my bog-trotter.
The fact is, I thought it might be of service to the young
women in the choice of a husband, and save them from
swindlers, who differed little from the quadruped, but
in the horn and the hoof, which they had not about them.
I have had
individuals
in my eye, in all these matters,
no doubt; but I do not name them; because they are not
worth naming; nor would the subject admit it. General
strictures of human nature, is all that can be expected, in
these matters.
From the talents of some new editors of papers, who
had never yet fleshed their maiden swords in a republic,
but were from Ireland, Scotland, or England, and some
that were from neither, but
turf-born,
in this country,
the
press
came to daggers-drawing with the
law.
The
types disposed themselves; 1, against the
judges;
2,
against
the
law,
and finally against the
constitution.
They
got help from partisans on all sides; and these
establishments
were likely to be blown up. Learning was
decryed
and it was no uncommon thing to hear members
of the legislature thanking God that they had never
been within a college. There is now a considerable
reform
of the public way of thinking; candidates for state
trusts begin to value themselves for having been
at school,
and find their account in being thought able to read. It
is not as it used to be, the enquiry altogether, whether
a man be a plain unlettered person; or has had a
tincture
of the law to poison his faculties. There is now actually
a lawyer a speaker of the senate.
Heretofore you might
have seen caucus-holding men at their wits end for some
extraordinary kind of dunce to send to the house; upon
the same principle, that the philosophers dig into the
earth for a mineral, a science which is called
Oryctognosy
;
or that they look for a shell on the sea-shore, or a
beetle in the woods, to send to a museum.
The enquiry now is by these caucus people in every
county, not only who is
honest,
but, who is
capable?
There are said to be
sixty-two new
members in the
present
session; I cannot say whether in the two houses, or
in one, the old having been left out; and this on the
principle
,
that they had missed a figure in calculation, and
read four for three dollars.
In the courts of judicature, in this state, there had
always
been much delay; and this, in a great degree,
owing
to the length of speeches; and note-taking. What
else but this book has put that down. Does any body
now hear of much excess in harangues? On the
contrary
,
there is the utmost precision of thought, and brevity
of expression.
Nor has it only been in forensic eloquence that there
has been a curtailing, but in that of deliberative bodies.
It is not from Pennsylvania, that those interminable
speeches come, which we hear of on the floor of congress.
Is it not to be hoped that, when my book gets a
circulation
beyond the state, and into other parts of the Union,
a retrenchment will be perceptible in the verbosity of
members from other places, and that quality will begin
to be consulted, and the quantity reduced. I could wish
a tax were laid upon the time taken up in a debate. Why
is it that congress do not buy up an edition of my book,
and distribute among the members? It would be of
more use to them than the library of Monticello. If it
lay with the President, I am confident he would not
hesitate
,
had there not been so much said about the $50,000
to John Henry.
The people of Pennsylvania are so sensible of the use
that it has been in this state, that there is scarcely a
parlour
window without a MODERN CHIVALRY. Five
booksellers have made a fortune by it; for I have never
asked a cent from any of them for the privilege of
printing
an edition, save in this last instance, where a few
copies
have been stipulated for the amanuensis to whom I
have dictated what has been added to the work, and this
for the purpose of distributing to his uncles, aunts, and
first cousins, as the members of congress do the copies
that are ordered to be printed, of President's messages,
reports of ambassadors, &c.
I have said that I do not know that I shall write more,
though I have some transactions in my mind, that I could
wish to Chronicle; and characters that might be drawn.
I know, that after the present war, which, in the nature
of things, cannot last always, an ambassador will be sent
to England; and Teague may be a candidate. I can
carry
him it I will; but, in that matter, I shall hesitate,
because
I should have to take the trouble of presenting him
after
his outfit;
and going through the ceremonies of an
introduction, with which I am not so well acquainted.
For though a great deal might be said in favour of a
republican
going from a republican government, being less
in need of a
knowledge of etiquette,
like an Indian prince
that comes from the woods; yet, as those who had
preceded
him. Adams, Jay, King, Pinkney, &c. had not
gone with their
coats buttoned behind,
but
accommodated
themselves to the dress, and the customs of the
courts of Europe; my
bog-trotter
could not well depart
from precedent.
END OF VOL. IV.